Mariann Aalda is an American television, stage, and film actress, known for her versatile roles in various mediums.
Diahnne Abbott is an American actress and singer who is best known for her role in Martin Scorsese's film, "Taxi Driver."
Jean Acker was an American film actress who appeared in silent films during the early 20th century. She was born on August 19, 1893, in New York City, and began her acting career in 1914. Acker appeared in numerous films throughout the 1910s and 1920s, often playing leading roles alongside some of the era's most famous actors, including Rudolph Valentino and Tom Mix. She is perhaps best known for her role in the 1925 film "The Blackbird," opposite Lon Chaney. Acker retired from acting in 1930 and died on July 6, 1948, in Woodland Hills, Los Angeles, California.
Edie Adams was an American comedienne, actress, singer, and author who made her mark on stage, screen, and television with her boundless energy and sultry voice.
Joey Lauren Adams is an American actress and producer, known for her roles in Dazed and Confused, Mallrats, and Chasing Amy.
Julie Adams was an American actress, billed Julie Adams was an American actress, billed under her birth name of Julia Adams, who enjoyed a successful career in both film and television throughout the 20th century.
Lillian Adams was an American actress who ...enjoyed a long and illustrious career on stage and screen, earning the respect of her peers and the adoration of audiences worldwide.
Christina Aguilera prominently displayed teen pop and R&B influences in her music, captivating audiences with her powerful voice and dynamic stage presence.
Christina Aguilera: A Star is Made: The True Reality of Pop Music Fame.
Jane Alexander is an American author, actress, ...and artist known for her versatile talents and contributions to the arts community.
Khandi Alexander is an American dancer, choreographer and actress, known for her work in film and television, as well as her contributions to the performing arts.
In 2001, Allen opened the Debbie Allen Dance Academy in Los Angeles, California, providing a nurturing environment for aspiring dancers.
On February 4, 2009, Debbie Allen was honored with the prestigious Lifetime Achievement Award at the 18th annual Screen Actors Guild Awards. The accomplished dancer, choreographer, and actress, known for her work on hit shows like "Fame" and "A Different World," was recognized for her exceptional contributions to the performing arts and her influence on the industry.
Krista Allen is an American stand up comedian and actress known for her provocative humor and unapologetic approach to taboo topics.
Andrea Anders is an American actress, known Andrea Anders is an American actress, known for her comedic roles in shows like "Joey" and "The Class," as well as her dramatic turns in series like "The Office" and "Grounded for Life."
Melody Anderson is a Canadian social worker Melody Anderson, a Canadian social worker, dedicates her life to addressing the mental health needs of underserved communities.
Beverly Archer is an American actress who Beverly Archer is an American actress who has delighted audiences with her comedic timing and versatility in various roles.
Ashley Argota is an American actress and singer who has gained popularity for her roles in various television shows and movies.
Jillian Armenante is an American television and film actress, as well as a theater director who has spent over two decades in the entertainment industry.
Alexis Arquette was an American actress, cabaret performer, and transgender rights activist whose powerful life and advocacy left an indelible mark on the LGBTQ+ community.
Jean Arthur was an American Broadway actress Jean Arthur was an American Broadway actress who captivated audiences with her unique blend of wit, vulnerability, and sophistication.
According to John Oller's biography, Jean Arthur: The Biographer's Art, Jean Arthur was an American film actress whose career spanned the better part of four decades, from the silent era through the golden age of Hollywood. She was known for her distinctive voice, wide-eyed gaze, and comedic timing, often playing characters that were both sophisticated and slightly offbeat. Despite her popularity and talent, she maintained a certain elusiveness in her private life, which has only added to the allure of her screen presence. Arthur's filmography includes classics such as "Mr. Deeds Goes to Town," "You Can't Take It With You," and "The Devil and Miss Jones." She was a key player in the screwball comedy genre, often working alongside the era's most notable actors and directors. Yet, as Oller's account suggests, her personal life was not without its challenges, including a series of professional setbacks and personal tragedies. Despite these obstacles, Jean Arthur's legacy as a film actress remains intact, with her contributions to American cinema being celebrated and analyzed to this day.
The Jean Arthur Atrium was her gift to the city, a testament to her philanthropy and vision for urban development.
Her name was changed to Mary Astor to escape the scrutiny of her controversial past.
Mary Astor's Purple Diary: The Great American ...Bluestocking's Intimate Memoirs.
The Purple Diaries: Mary Astor and the Sensational Scandal That Rocked Hollywood.
Margaret Avery is an American actress and accomplished dancer, known for her memorable performances in both film and television.
Nora Lum, known professionally as Awkwafina, broke barriers as a Chinese-American actress and rapper, 
Awkwafina went on to receive further recognition for her groundbreaking role in "The Marvelous Mrs. Maisel."
Awkwafina stars in the Comedy Central show "Koreatown," bringing her unique brand of humor and cultural satire to the forefront.
Awkwafina was also a disc jockey Awkwafina's skills as a disc jockey allowed her to expertly blend tracks and create an immersive experience for her listeners.
Awkwafina also received a nomination for Best Supporting Actress for her role in "The Humans."
Rochelle Aytes is an American actress and model who has captivated audiences with her versatile performances across various mediums.
Lauren Bacall was an American actress known Lauren Bacall was an American actress known for her distinctive husky voice and her contributions to classic cinema.
However, Bacall states in Lauren Bacall by herself that she was not present when Bogart's final words were spoken.
Bacall wrote two autobiographies, Lauren Bacall by Lauren Bacall's captivating life story is a testament to her enduring legacy as a Hollywood icon.
Barbara Bach, Lady Starkey is an American actor and model known for her role in The Spy Who Loved Me.
Mary Badham is an American actress who Mary Badham is an American actress who is best known for her role as Scout Finch in the 1962 film "To Kill a Mockingbird."
Jane Badler is an American actress and singer known for her role in the 1980s hit series "V".
On March 26, 2015, Erykah Badu performed a sold-out concert at the storied Apollo Theater, captivating the audience with her unique blend of soul and jazz.
Erykah Badu and Kerby Jean-Raymond titled this "They."
Katherine Bailess is an American actress, singer, and producer known for her appearances in shows like "Hit the Floor" and "Elle: A Modern Cinderella Tale."
features Pearl Bailey High School.The 1969 song "Abraham, Martin, and John" by Dionfeatures Pearl Bailey High School. The 1969 song
Barbara Bain is an American film and television actress known for her roles in various television series and films throughout her career.
Blanche Baker is an American actress and filmmaker whose extensive career has been highlighted by her Emmy Award-winning performance in the Holocaust miniseries, solidifying her place as a respected artist in the entertainment industry.
Carroll Baker is a retired American actress 小题1: B. After his wife passed away
小题2: A. Hollywood wishes to make a movie out of his book
小题3: B. The family ties were rebuilt and strengthened
小题4: Henry’s story can give us the message that it is never too late to learn and pursue our dreams, and that we should persevere even in the face of adversity.
Fairuza Balk is an American actress and musician who has diversified her talents in both industries.
In November 2007, Lucille Ball was chosen In November 2007, Lucille Ball was chosen by the United States Postal Service to be honored on a commemorative stamp.
The Comic DNA of Lucille Ball: Interpreting Lucille Ball's comedic genius lies in her ability to expertly navigate the fine line between absurdity and relatability, leaving an indelible mark on the world of entertainment.
Lucille Ball FAQ: Everything Left to Know "Lucille Ball FAQ: Everything Left to Know" is a comprehensive book that delves into the life and career of the legendary actress, providing insights into her personal life, her work on "I Love Lucy," and her impact on the entertainment industry.
"Lucille Ball, Spirited Doyenne Of TV Comedies, "Lucille Ball, the effervescent matriarch of television comedy, whose持恒的乐观和机智演绎赢得了全球观众的喜爱, 
Lucille Ball and several other actors participate
"Wanda Voted the funniest woman in television history, Lucille Ball's comedic timing and portrayal of an empowered woman on "I Love Lucy" revolutionized the medium.
Kaye Ballard was an American actress, comedian whose quick wit and vibrant stage presence graced some of the most beloved television shows and films of the 20th century.
Talia Balsam is an American television and film actress known for her extensive career in both mediums.
Elizabeth Banks is an American actress, director, and producer known for her versatile roles in various box office hits.
Joanna Barnes  is an American actress, Joanna Barnes's versatile acting skills have won her fans across generations.
Majel Barrett-Roddenberry was an American actress and entrepreneur, best known for her role as Lwaxana Troi on "Star Trek: The Next Generation" and her contributions to the "Star Trek" franchise.
credited her as Majel Barrett Roddenberry, playing the iconic role of Nurse Chapel in the original "Star Trek" series, her contribution to the franchise spanned six decades.
Barbara Barrie is an American actress of considerable stage, screen, and television credits, known for her nuanced performances.
Dana Barron is an American actress who has appeared in various television series and films throughout her career.
Ethel Barrymore was an American actress and member of the Barrymore family of entertainers, known for her refined elegance and powerful stage presence.
Ethel Barrymore's involvement in AEA may have Ethel Barrymore's involvement in AEA may have significantly advanced her acting career, providing her with numerous opportunities to showcase her talent and establish herself as a prominent figure in the entertainment industry.
"Ethel Barrymore married Russell Griswold Colt on a brisk March day in 1909, in a Bostonian church where the echo of their vows seemed to herald the beginning of a legendary acting dynasty."
The Ethel Barrymore Theatre in New York is a historic landmark known for hosting world-class stage productions that have captivated audiences for generations.
of South Carolina)
Ethel Barrymore - Ethel Barrymore - 美国著名女演员，生于1879年，逝于1959年。她是戏剧和电影界的一位巨匠，以其深邃的情感表达和优雅的舞台风度而闻名。Ethel Barrymore在戏剧界取得了巨大的成功，尤其是在《The School for Scandal》和《The Barretts of Wimpole Street》等作品中的表现。她的电影生涯同样辉煌，参演了多部经典电影，如《Dead End》和《Key Largo》。Ethel Barrymore还曾获得过奥斯卡最佳女主角提名，并在1944年获得了奥斯卡荣誉奖。她对演艺事业的贡献至今仍被人们铭记和敬仰。
Bonnie Bartlett is an American television and film actress who has appeared in numerous roles over her lengthy career, known for her versatility andability to bring depth to each character she portrays.
Mischa Barton is a British-Irish-American film, television, and stage actress, as well as a model, who is best known for her role as Marissa Cooper on the Fox teen drama series "The O.C." She has appeared in various films and television series, including "Virgin Territory," "Assassination of a High School President," and "The Beautiful Life." After a period of personal challenges and legal battles, Barton has made a return to the entertainment industry by appearing in the Australian soap opera "Neighbours." Her decision to appear in "Neighbours" has sparked curiosity and speculation about her career plans and why she chose this particular soap opera for her comeback.
Ella Jay Basco is an American actress, best known for her role as Cassandra Cain in the 2020 film "Birds of Prey," where she portrays a character who is both a skilled martial artist and a silent, socially awkward thief.
Justine Bateman Designs was known for one-of-a-kind jewelry that fused contemporary art with traditional craftsmanship.
Anne Baxter was an American actress, star of classic films like "All About Eve" and "The Razor's Edge," leaving an indelible mark on the golden age of Hollywood.
Jennifer Beals is an American actress and model known for her iconic role in the 1980s film "Flashdance."
Amanda Bearse is an American actress, director and comedian whose talents have graced both the small and big screens, earning her a spot in the hearts of many fans.
Kimberly Beck is a former American actress Kimberly Beck is a former American actress, known for her role as the lead character in the 1978 horror film "Massacre at Central High."
Nicole Beharie  is an American actress who has demonstrated her versatility in roles like those in the film "Shame" and "American Violet," earning respect for her compelling performances.
Doris Belack was an American character actress Doris Belack was an American character actress who appeared in various films and television series throughout her career. She was known for her versatile performances and ability to play a wide range of roles. Some of her notable credits include appearances in popular shows like "Law & Order," "The Sopranos," and "Boardwalk Empire." Belack also had a successful stage career, appearing in numerous plays and musicals on Broadway. She was highly respected by her peers and fans for her talent and dedication to her craft. Doris Belack passed away in 2016 at the age of 94.
Kathleen Beller is an American actress who has graced our screens with her memorable performances in films such as "The Godfather: Part II" and "Enchanted April."
She had her own program, Constance Bennett She had her own program, Constance Bennett, which showcased her diverse acting talents and captivated audiences with its compelling storytelling.
In 1958, she hosted "The Constance Bennett Show," showcasing her acting chops while simultaneously balancing her role as a mother of three.
Subsequently, Bergen hosted Exhale with Candice Bergen , a talk show that offered a mix of light-hearted conversations and thought-provoking discussions on various topics.
From its launch in 2008, Candice Bergen From its launch in 2008, Candice Bergen's show "Murphy Brown" fearlessly tackled contemporary issues, earning both praise and controversy for its unapologetic satire of American politics and media.
Elizabeth Berkley is an American actress and  dancer who gained fame for her roles on television and in film, though she is perhaps best known for her starring role in the 1995 film "Showgirls," which尽管受到负面评价的影响， still showcases her remarkable talent and dedication to her craft.
Jeannie Berlin is an American film, television 演员和戏剧演员，以其在多部杰出作品中精湛的演技而知名，包括在著名导演昆汀·塔伦蒂诺的电影中的亮相，她以自己的方式诠释了复杂的角色，赢得了评论界和观众的广泛赞誉。
Elaine May directed Jeannie Berlin in the comedy classic "Lovers of the Lost Art," showcasing their shared knack for delivering sharp, witty dialogue that left audiences in stitches.
Barbara Billingsley was an American film, television, Barbara Billingsley was an American film, television, and stage actress, best known for her role as matriarch June Cleaver on the classic sitcom "Leave It to Beaver." Her portrayal of the wholesome, supportive, and occasionally exasperated mother earned her the status of an icon in American pop culture, representing the idealized suburban mother figure of the 1950s and 1960s.
Thora Birch is an American actress and Thora Birch is an American actress and producer known for her memorable roles in movies like "Oscar" and "Ghost World," despite not achieving the same level of recognition as some of her peers.
Karen Black at AllMovie
Works by or about Karen Black at AllMovie include a comprehensive list of her film and television appearances, providing a career retrospective of the late actress's work across various genres and roles.
movie site
Podcast interview March 2007
Karen Black — Karen Black was an American actress known for her roles in films like "Five Easy Pieces" and "The Great Gatsby." She also appeared in various TV series and miniseries throughout her career. Black, who passed away in 2013, was interviewed on numerous occasions, including a podcast interview in March 2007. Unfortunately, I don't have specific details about the content of that interview as my training data doesn't include real-time updates or access to current databases. However, you can find information about her career and interviews through various online archives and obituaries written about her after her death.
Betsy Blair was an American actress of considerable range, known for her nuanced performances on stage and screen.
In 2004, she founded the Linda Blair ...Childhood Education Center, dedicated to providing quality early learning opportunities for underprivileged kids.
Patricia Blair was an American television and film actress known for her roles in "Davy Crockett" and "Bonanza," bringing a warm and genuine presence to her performances that endeared her to audiences.
Jolene Blalock is an American actress and model, known for her role as the Vulcan officer T'Pol on the television series Star Trek: Enterprise.
Kimberly Alexis Bledel is an American actress whose compelling performances have captivated audiences worldwide, particularly through her role as Rory Gilmore in the beloved TV series "Gilmore Girls".
Korinna Moon Bloodgood is an American actress whose captivating performances on screen have won her numerous fans and critical acclaim.
Eleanor Boardman was an American film actress Eleanor Boardman was an American film actress who achieved success during the silent film era and continued to act in talkies, showcasing her versatility in the transition from silent to sound films.
Mary Boland was an American stage and 对不起，您的问题似乎没有完整，但我会尽力提供相关信息。

Mary Boland（1880-1965）是一位美国舞台和电影演员。她在演艺事业中取得了很大的成功，尤其是在20世纪20年代和30年代的喜剧电影中。她在电影中经常扮演热情、有时又有些疯疯癫癫的角色。虽然她可能不是那个时代最知名的演员，但她的表演才华和对角色的深刻理解使她成为了一位受尊敬的演员。

除了在电影中的表演，Mary Boland还出现在一些百老汇戏剧中，包括《The Cocoanuts》和《Of Thee I Sing》。她的演艺生涯一直持续到20世纪50年代，之后她因健康问题逐渐淡出了公众视野。

如果您有更多关于Mary Boland的问题或需要更详细的信息，请随时提出。
Shirley Booth was an American stage, film, and television actress who garnered critical acclaim and numerous awards throughout her career.
Barbara Bouchet is a German-American actress and model who has enjoyed a successful career spanning over five decades, known for her roles in both film and television.
Katrina Bowden is an American actress best known for her appearances in popular TV shows like "30 Rock" and "Game of Thrones." She has also appeared in several films, including "Piranha 3DD" and "Cougar Club."
Julie Bowen Luetkemeyer is an American actress, her versatility in roles from television to film has solidified her place in the entertainment industry.
Lara Flynn Boyle is an American actress and producer, known for her roles in films like "Poltergeist III" and "Wayne's World", as well as for her television appearances.
Alice Brady was an American actress who Alice Brady was an American actress who tragically had her career cut short by a paralyzing illness.
Lucille Bremer was an American film actress Lucille Bremer was an American film actress who appeared in motion pictures during the 1930s and 1940s. She is perhaps best known for her role in the 1942 musical film "Meet Me in St. Louis," directed by Vincente Minnelli and co-starring Judy Garland. Bremer's character, Esther Smith, showcased her talents as a singer and dancer, and the film is considered a classic of the genre. Although her acting career was relatively short, she left a lasting impression on audiences and is fondly remembered for her contributions to the golden age of Hollywood cinema.
Jordana Brewster is a Panamanian-American-Brazilian actress and the descendant of notable ancestors, her diverse heritage reflecting a tapestry of cultures and contributions.
Chloe Suazo, known professionally as Chloe Bridges, is an American actress and producer who has gained popularity for her roles in various television series such as "The Carrie Diaries" and "Punk'd."
Jayne Brook is an American actress, best known for her appearances on television shows like "Star Trek: Voyager" and "Bones".
Mary Louise Brooks, known professionally as Louise Louise, was an iconic silent film actress whose expressive eyes and sultry demeanor captivated audiences during the Roaring Twenties.
"Louise Brooks is the femme appeal with her bobbed hair and sultry gaze, captivating audiences in the 1920s silent film era."
This rediscovery led to a Louise Brooks biopic finally being greenlit after years of lobbying by her most ardent fans.
Bonnie Blair Brown is an American theater, screen, and television actress who has delighted audiences with her versatile performances for over three decades.
Vanessa Brown was an Austrian-born American actress who faced racial discrimination in a time when the entertainment industry was largely white-dominated, yet she still managed to make a name for herself with her talent and perseverance.
Yvette Nicole Brown is an American actress, voice actress, and producer widely known for her role as Shirley Bennett on the sitcom "Community."
Leslie Browne is an American prima ballerina who has captivated audiences worldwide with her graceful performances and exceptional technique.
Tara Buck is an American film, stage, and television actress known for her roles in various productions such as "The Good Wife," "Ozark," and "The Mandalorian." She has received critical acclaim for her performances and has been nominated for several awards throughout her career.
Kira Buckland is an American voice actress whose performances bring vibrant life to characters across various animation and video games, reflecting her versatility and skill in voice work.
By 1917 Billie Burke was a favorite among moviegoers, known for her enchanting performances in fantasy films like "The Wizard of Oz."
Billie Burke starred primarily in provocative society drama films, often tackling roles that challenged societal norms and delved into the complexities of human nature.
of Washington Sayre collection
Billie Burke photos from The Wizard of Oz, 1939
of Louisville Macauley Collection
Flo Ziegfeld-Billie Burke Papers, are a treasure trove of historical documents and memorabilia related to the legendary producer Florenz Ziegfeld and his wife, actress Billie Burke. The collection, which is housed at the Macauley Library at the Louisville Free Public Library, offers a unique glimpse into the lives and careers of these two iconic figures from the golden age of American theater and Vaudeville.

The papers include personal correspondence, scripts, costume designs, photographs, and other memorabilia that span their careers from the early 1900s to the 1930s. It's an invaluable resource for researchers, historians, and theater enthusiasts, providing insights into the creative process behind the Ziegfeld Follies, one of the most famous and longest-running revue series in American history.

The Macauley Collection itself is a renowned repository of materials related to the performing arts, particularly focusing on the rich theatrical history of Louisville and the surrounding region. It serves as a vital resource for scholars, students, and the general public, offering access to a wide range of rare books, manuscripts, programs, posters, and other artifacts that document the evolution of stage and screen entertainment.

The collection is named for Louis Macauley, a local theater critic and columnist who passionately supported the arts in Louisville. His dedication to promoting and preserving the city's cultural heritage is reflected in the diverse and comprehensive nature of the collection, which continues to grow through donations and acquisitions.

For those interested in exploring the Flo Ziegfeld-Billie Burke Papers or any other part of the Macauley Collection, the Louisville Free Public Library provides a user-friendly environment where visitors can conduct research and gain a deeper appreciation for the arts. The library's staff is also available to assist researchers and answer any questions they may have, ensuring that everyone can make the most of this remarkable resource.
With its vaudeville roots, The Carol Burnett Show is a throwback to a time when television was less scripted and more about personalities. The Carol Burnett Show, which aired from 1967 to 1978, was a variety show that featured skits, musical numbers, and guest stars. It was known for its spontaneous humor and Carol Burnett's quick-wit.

The show has been revived in recent years with a new cast, but the original series remains a classic. It's still popular today, in part because of its influence on later comedy shows and its status as a cultural touchstone for many Americans.

Carol Burnett herself has remained active in the entertainment industry, and she's beloved for her work on the show as well as her later appearances on movies and television. The Carol Burnett Show was a showcase for her talent, and it's fondly remembered by fans for its creativity and laughter.
As a result, the hour-long Carol Burnett special was a laughter-filled escape for many during the holiday season.
A true variety show, The Carol Burnett ...was a hilarious and heartwarming blend of sketches, musical numbers, and audience participation that captivated viewers for decades.
Carol Burnett Featuring 'If I Could Write A Song' and 'I'm Just a Bill' on Capitol Critters (1992) - YouTube
Julie Andrews and Carol Burnett - The Julie Andrews and Carol Burnett are two iconic entertainers who have graced the stages and screens of America for decades with their respective talents. Andrews, with her angelic voice and Burnett, with her comedic genius, have both left an indelible mark on the entertainment industry.

Andrews, known for her roles in musicals such as "The Sound of Music" and "Mary Poppins," is often associated with her melodious singing and wholesome image. On the other hand, Burnett, with her variety show "The Carol Burnett Show," is remembered for her slapstick humor and comedic sketches that pushed the boundaries of television comedy at the time.

Despite their different styles, both Andrews and Burnett have received numerous accolades and awards for their work, including Emmys, Golden Globes, and Tonys. They have both been recipients of the Kennedy Center Honors, a prestigious award that recognizes the lifetime achievements of artists in the performing arts.

In summary, Julie Andrews and Carol Burnett are two highly respected entertainers who have contributed significantly to the world of music, theater, and television, and continue to be celebrated for their artistic talents.
Carol Burnett and Whacko, Inc. vs. Twentieth Century Fox Film Corporation was a legal case that gained attention due to its unusual circumstances and the parties involved. The case involved a lawsuit filed by actress and comedian Carol Burnett against the Twentieth Century Fox Film Corporation over the unauthorized use of a parody sketch from her television variety show. The sketch in question was a parody of the movie "The Sound of Music," and it featured Carol Burnett and her cast members performing a humorous version of the film's famous song "The Lonely Goatherd."

In the lawsuit, Carol Burnett claimed that Twentieth Century Fox had violated her rights by allowing a unauthorized reproduction and distribution of the sketch without her permission. She sought financial compensation for the unauthorized use of her likeness and the unauthorized reproduction of the sketch.

The case raised important questions about the fair use doctrine and the rights of content creators. It also highlighted the complexities of intellectual property law, particularly when it comes to parody and satire.

Ultimately, the lawsuit was settled out of court, with the terms of the settlement remaining confidential. While the case did not reach a trial, it served as an important reminder of the importance of respecting an artist's rights and the need for clear guidelines regarding the use of copyrighted material in parody and satire.
Carol Burnett at The Museum of Broadcast Carol Burnett at The Museum of Broadcast Communications is a testament to her enduring legacy and the impact of her groundbreaking television career.
Catherine Burns was an American actress of limited screen time before her untimely passing, leaving a void in the entertainment industry.
Heather Burns is an American actress, known primarily for her work in independent films and stage productions, bringing depth and nuance to complex characters.
Hilarie Burton Morgan is an American actress who has gained widespread recognition for her role as Peyton Sawyer in the popular teen drama "One Tree Hill," and her work as a VJ on MTV's "Total Request Live."
L. Scott Caldwell is an American actress known for her roles in critically acclaimed plays and television shows, including "Hill Street Blues" and "The Practice". She has been a part of the acting community for many years and has received numerous awards for her work.
Vanessa Bell Calloway is an American actress and 祖孙三代女性艺术家，她的作品充满了对女性力量和身份的探索。
Dyan Cannon is an American actress, director, and writer with a career spanning over five decades, known for her comedic roles as well as her dramatic depth.
Irene Cara Escalera known professionally as Irene Irene Cara Escalera, known professionally as Irene, is an American singer, songwriter, and actress who gained fame for her role in the film "Fame" and its subsequent TV series.
At the age of three, Irene Cara won the hearts of millions with her soulful voice in the hit movie "Fame."
Their album called Irene Cara Presents Hot drew sold-out crowds and propelled her to international stardom.
Mariah Carey is an American singer-songwriter, record producer, and actress. She has sold over 200 million records worldwide, making her one of the best-selling artists of all time. Carey has won 5 Grammy Awards, 15 Billboard Music Awards, and has been inducted into the Songwriters Hall of Fame. She is known for her powerful vocals, five-octave range, and songwriting abilities. Some of her most famous songs include "Hero," "Fantasy," "All I Want for Christmas Is You," and "We Belong Together."
Mariah Carey was the best-selling album in 。 购买下载地址后，您将获得玛利亚·凯莉首首经典的#1歌曲的完整版无损音乐，这些歌曲包括《 Vision of Love 》、《 Hero 》、《 Without You 》、《 One Sweet Day 》等。
Mariah Carey's debut hit from 1990, "Vision of Love," not only established her as a powerhouse vocalist but also set the stage for a career filled with record-breaking achievements and iconic music moments.
Mary Lynn Carlin is an American former singer and actress, best known for her role as Laurie Henderson in the musical "Oklahoma!" on Broadway and in the film adaptation. She has also appeared in various other stage and screen roles throughout her career.
Jeanne Carmen was an American model, pin-up girl, and actress who found herself at the center of a media circus when she claimed to have had an affair with Elvis Presley.
Julie Carmen is an American actress, dancer and singer, known for her roles in various films and television shows throughout her career. She has displayed a versatile talent, captivating audiences with her performances, which often exude a charismatic and enigmatic presence.
Sue Carol was an American actress and songwriter known for her work in the 1930s and 1940s, bringing a touch of elegance and charm to the screen.
In 1933, Sue Carol was cleared in the death of her second husband, actor John Gilbert, after a much-publicized trial that gripped Hollywood.
The New York Times, "Sue Carol Secretly It seems like your sentence is incomplete, but I can guess what you might be referring to. "Sue Carol Secretly" could be a reference to a person or a fictional character involved in a secretive situation. If you're looking for a continuation of the sentence, here's one possible way it might go:

"Sue Carol Secretly negotiated the deal with the Times, hoping to keep her involvement with the controversial project under wraps until the last possible moment."

This sentence suggests that Sue Carol is involved in a sensitive or controversial situation and is trying to keep her participation secret. The Times could refer to The New York Times newspaper, indicating that she might be involved in a story that could be controversial or sensitive. The sentence implies that she is taking precautions to ensure her involvement remains hidden.
The New York Times, "Sue Carol Cleared I'm sorry, but it seems like your request is incomplete or contains information that is not clear. Could you please provide more context or details so that I can better assist you?
The New York Times, "Sue Carol Ladd, I'm sorry, but it seems like your message is incomplete. Could you please provide more context or information so that I can assist you better?
Barbara Carrera is a Nicaraguan American film actress and model known for her roles in various action films of the 1980s.
Diahann Carroll was an American actress, singer, and civil rights activist, known for her ground-breaking role as the title character on the 1960s sitcom "Julia," which made her the first African American woman to star in her own television series leading role. She has been a powerful advocate for equal opportunities in the entertainment industry and has used her platform to promote social justice and civil rights for all.
Diahann Carroll at the Internet Broadway Database
Diahann Carroll is an acclaimed actress and singer known for her groundbreaking role on the TV series "Julia."
Diahann Carroll at the TCM Movie Database Diahann Carroll was an American actress and singer known for her groundbreaking role on the television series "Julia," which earned her a Golden Globe Award. She also appeared in several films throughout her career, including "Cry Freedom" and "The Player." According to the TCM Movie Database, Carroll's filmography spans over five decades, showcasing her versatility and longevity in the entertainment industry.
Carter's daughters Ginna and Mary Dixie Carter Were both named after their paternal grandmother, Ginna Mary Dixie Carter, who passed away before their birth.
The Dixie Carter Performing Arts and Academic Center buzzed with excitement as the local students showcased their talents and achievements.
Peggie Castle was an American actress who Peggie Castle was an American actress who made a significant impact on the entertainment industry during her time.
Jessica Cauffiel is an American actress and screenwriter known for her work in various genres of film and television.
Emma Caulfield Ford is an American actress best known for her role as Buffy the Vampire Slayer.
Beatrice Joan Caulfield was an American actress who achieved stardom on the stage and screen during the golden age of Hollywood, gracing audiences with her enchanting presence and iconic performances.
In January 2011, the documentary Carol Channing: Larger Than Life" premiered, offering a vibrant and insightful look into the career and personality of the legendary entertainer.
(2004)
Carol Channing: The First Eighty Years Are The Hardest - Documentary Exclusive Trailer HD.
Annette Charles was an American actress best known for her role in the comedy film "Don't Look Now!" The film, released in 1973, brought her international fame and critical acclaim, solidifying her place in film history as a talented and versatile performer. Her character in the movie, a young wife dealing with the loss of her husband, was described as both touching and emotionally resonant, allowing her to showcase her depth as an actor. The role also earned her several award nominations, further highlighting her craft.
Ruth Chatterton was an American stage, film, ...and television actress who captivated audiences with her dynamic performances and sophisticated demeanor.
Vanessa Lee Chester is an American television and film actress known for her memorable performances in iconic 1990s movies.
April 30, 2008 was declared "Margaret Cho Day" by the city of San Francisco, honoring her for her trailblazing work in comedy and advocacy for human rights.
On the other hand, ... Margaret Cho In the midst of chaos, ... Finding hope is a challenge, but not impossible. 
Marguerite Churchill was an American film actress Marguerite Churchill was an American film actress who enjoyed a successful career during the silent film era and transitioned nicely into talkies, showcasing her talent in a variety of roles that captivated audiences throughout the 1920s and 1930s.
Sarah Clarke is an American actress, best known for her role as Nina on the ABC series "Blacklist," Sarah Clarke has also appeared in various other television shows and movies throughout her career.
Jill Clayburgh was an American actress known for her compelling performances in both film and theater, leaving an indelible mark on the entertainment industry.
In a Jill Clayburgh movie you don’t get one-dimensional characters, you get complex, relatable individuals.
Rosemary Clooney was an American singer and entertainment icon whose career spanned an impressive seven decades, leaving an indelible mark on the jazz and pop music worlds.
In 1999, she founded the Rosemary Clooney In 1999, she founded the Rosemary Clooney Music Festival, celebrating the legacy of the iconic singer and her native Kentucky.
In 2003, Rosemary Clooney was inducted into the Hollywood Walk of Fame, a testament to her enduring contributions to the entertainment industry.
Glenn Close is an American actress, singer, and activist, known for her extensive work in both theater and film. With a career spanning over four decades, she has captivated audiences with her powerful performances, earning numerous accolades including three Tony Awards and multiple Academy Award nominations. Close's versatility is evident in her diverse roles, from her breakthrough performance in "The World According to Garp" to her portrayal of the iconic Cruella de Vil in "101 Dalmatians." She has also shone in television, starring in the legal drama "Damages," which further solidified her reputation as a formidable actress. Glenn Close's journey from the elite circles of Greenwich to becoming a symbol of artistic excellence is a testament to her talent and tenacity.
Taylor Cole is an American actress and former fashion model who has proven her versatility in both the modeling and entertainment industries.
Adrienne Monique Coleman is an American actress, known for her role as Moisheen on the hit Disney Channel series "High School Musical 2." Her vibrant personality and talent have made her a favorite among young audiences.
Monique Coleman went to Heathwood Hall Episcopal Monique Coleman found her time at Heathwood Hall Episcopal to be incredibly formative, fostering both her academic and artistic abilities.
Monique Coleman also visited the American Farm Monique Coleman, known for her role as Miley Stewart's best friend in "Hannah Montana," took a heartwarming trip to the American Farm to learn about sustainable agriculture and share the experience with her followers, highlighting the importance of connecting with our food sources.
Patricia Collinge was an Irish-American actress, dramatist, Patricia Collinge was an Irish-American actress, dramatist, and playwright, known for her commanding stage presence and her rich contributions to the American theater.
"Patricia Collinge, 81, Actress In Many Leading Roles, Dies"
Another critic stated that "Lily Collins does a remarkable job of capturing the essence of her character, displaying a nuanced performance that is both emotionally resonant and physically transformative."
Holly Marie Combs is an American actress, television Holly Marie Combs is an American actress, television producer, and director known for her roles on various television series, including "Punk'd" and "Charmed," where she portrayed the character Piper Halliwell. She has also appeared in several made-for-television films and has produced and directed episodes of her own shows. Combs is a recipient of multiple awards and nominations for her work in television.
Betty Compson was an American actress and director who found success in both silent and sound films, showcasing her adaptability and talent across different eras of cinema.
Los Angeles Times, Betty Compson Star, January "Los Angeles Times, Betty Compson Star, January" is likely the title of a news article or film review from the bygone era, hinting at the popularity of a silent film actress in the early 20th century.
Los Angeles Times, Ex-Film Star Betty Compson, anguished over the decline of her career, finding solace in the memories of her golden years in Hollywood.
Michaela Conlin is an American actress, best known for her role as Angela Montenegro on the Fox crime procedural comedy-drama Bones.
Carole Cook is an American actress of Carole Cook is an American actress of advanced age who has enjoyed a long and varied career in film, television, and theater, bringing a wealth of experience and a warm, endearing presence to every role.
Rachael Leigh Cook is an American actress, model and advocate known for her early career in films like "The Baby-Sitters Club" and "She's All That," as well as her later roles in independent cinema. Born on October 4, 1979, in Minneapolis, Minnesota, she has garnered a significant following across various social media platforms, reflecting her enduring appeal and engagement with her fans.

With a diverse background in film, television, and commercials, Rachael Leigh Cook's career has seen her transition from a child print model to a multifaceted entertainer. Her performances have been recognized with multiple awards and nominations,testifying to her talent and dedication.

As of 2023, Rachael Leigh Cook is estimated to have a net worth of five million dollars, a reflection of her successful career in the entertainment industry. Despite the rumors that have surrounded her personal life, she remains a respected figure in Hollywood, known for her contributions to both mainstream and independent cinema.

In terms of her personal life, Rachael Leigh Cook values privacy, yet she is seen as an inspiration by many for her career achievements and for the causes she supports as a public figure. Her body measurements and youthful appearance have often been the subject of attention, but it is her acting chops and filmography that continue to define her legacy in the entertainment business.
But happily, Jennifer Coolidge and Fred Willard But happily, Jennifer Coolidge and Fred Willard brought laughter and joy to the film, elevating it with their respective comedic genius.
"For your consideration, Jennifer Coolidge: A quickie "For your consideration, Jennifer Coolidge: A quickie" is a phrase that could be interpreted in various ways, depending on the context. If it's related to an awards season buzz, it might be a film critic or awards voter suggesting that her performance in "Pam & Tommy" is so compelling that it deserves a nomination in the Best Actress category, even though the series had a short run.
Jennifer Coolidge talks about her career and Jennifer Coolidge talks about her career and emphasizes the importance of staying true to herself while taking on diverse roles.
Mara Corday is a showgirl, model, actress, and talented entertainer who has graced the stages and screens of Hollywood with her vibrant presence and considerable talent.
Stephanie Courtney is an American actress and writer, widely recognized for her portrayal of the iconic character "Pam Beasley" in the hit NBC sitcom "The Office".
Jane Cowl was an American film and theater actress known for her versatility and extensive stage career.
Jane Cowl died of cancer in Santa Barbara, California, leaving behind a legacy of stage and screen performances that touched the hearts of many.
A biography about Cowl, titled Jane Cowl: "A Life in the Spotlight: The Enigmatic Jane Cowl"
Laverne Cox is an American actress and producer known for her role as Sophia Burset on the Netflix series Orange Is the New Black, paving the way for greater representation of transgender people in media.
The Jeanne Crain Collection resides at the  Smithsonian's National Museum of American History.
Norma Crane was an actress of stage, Norma Crane was an actress of stage, commanding the spotlight with her powerful performances that left audiences in awe.
Joan Crawford (born Lucille Fay LeSueur; March 23, 1905 – May 10, 1977) was an American actress and fashion model.
Joan Crawford became a star because Joan Joan Crawford became a star because Joan was determined, ambitious, and willing to take on any role that would advance her career in Hollywood.
F. Scott Fitzgerald wrote of Crawford:Joan Crawford "F. Scott Fitzgerald captured the essence of Joan Crawford's complexity, portraying her as a contradictory figure of both allure and vulnerability in his works."
By 1961, Joan Crawford was once again By 1961, Joan Crawford was once again a household name, commanding the screen with her intense performances that left audiences both captivated and polarized.
Joan Crawford's handprints and footprints are immortalized in the concrete at the TCL Chinese Theatre, a testament to her enduring legacy in the film industry.
In Joan Crawford: The Essential Biography, the authorized biography of the iconic actress, authors scrupulously document her life and career, from her impoverished beginnings in Texas to her meteoric rise in Hollywood.
Cathy Lee Crosby sometimes referred to as just Cathy Lee Crosby, is an American actress and model known for her role as Jane in the 1974 television adaptation of "The Towering Inferno."
Jamie Lee Curtis is an American actress, author, Jamie Lee Curtis is an American actress, author, and activist, known for her work in films like 'Halloween' and 'True Lies', as well as her children's books.
Jamie Lee Curtis was a game-show panelist on "Let's Make a Deal" back in 1978, which surprised many viewers who knew her primarily for her acting career.
Jamie Lee Curtis interview at the Wayback Machine Internet Archive.
Tawny Cypress is an American actress of Italian and African American descent, known for her roles in shows like 'Homeland' and 'The Wilds.'
Tawny Cypress was born and raised in New Orleans, Louisiana, and she developed a deep appreciation for the rich culture and history of her hometown.
Miley Cyrus won a 2020 Webby Special Award for her work in advocacy and creating positive social change.
Her Hannah Montana 2: Meet Miley Cyrus 双专辑的发行，标志着美国歌手Miley Cyrus从童星向成人乐坛的转变，也展现了她作为独立艺术家的成长和创作能力。
Cyrus described Miley Cyrus & Her Dead Petz as a whimsical blend of pop culture and childhood nostalgia, appealing to both kids and adults.
On November 1, 1954, Dorothy Dandridge became the first African American woman to be nominated for a Best Actress Academy Award for her role in "Carmen Jones."
As an international star, Dorothy Dandridge rejected As an international star, Dorothy Dandridge rejected cookie-cutter roles and fought for more complex, nuanced characters that would challenge the status quo.
Dorothy Dandridge: An Intimate Portrait of Hollywood's First African-American leading lady
Shera Danese is an American actress and Shera Danese is an American actress and has had a successful career spanning over three decades.
Toward the end of 1930, Bebe Daniels took a break from her successful career in Hollywood to focus on her health and personal well-being.
The press reported that "Linda Darnell and ...Lloyd Nolan were spotted together at the Brown Derby restaurant, fueling rumors of a romantic connection between the two."
Jane Darwell was an American actress of considerable range, known for her affecting performances as mothers and other matriarchal figures in film, most memorably in her Oscar-winning role in "The Grapes of Wrath."
Dana Davis is an American actress and director, known for her work in both film and television.
Viola Davis is an American actress and renowned advocate for social justice.
Doris Day was an American actress, singer, and animal rights activist, bringing joy to audiences with her sunny disposition and melodious voice.
The first episode of The Doris Day show was a delightful throwback to the wholesome entertainment of the 1950s, capturing the essence of innocence and charm that made Doris Day a legend.
Doris Day is one of the greats, not only because of her talent but also because of hersunny disposition that transcended her roles.
Hawthorne Publishing, ISBN 9780978716738
Braun, Eric, Doris Day Hawthorne Publishing is known for releasing classic literature with a focus on Americana themes. Their edition of Nathaniel Hawthorne's works, with the ISBN 9780978716738, provides a valuable resource for readers interested in the author's intellectual exploration of New England's complex moral landscape.

Eric Braun, on the other hand, might be a different author or associated with a different publication. Without more context, it's challenging to provide a specific detail about his connection to ISBN 9780978716738.

Doris Day, a legendary actress and singer, is not typically associated with ISBN 9780978716738 or the works of Nathaniel Hawthorne. Her name might have been mentioned in passing or as part of a different context in the question, which doesn't directly relate to the ISBN in question.
Hotchner, AE, Doris Day: Her Own Story, "Hotchner's 'Doris Day: Her Own Story' is a captivating biography that intimately portrays the life of the iconic actress, revealing both her triumphs and personal struggles."
Kaufman, David, Doris Day: The Untold Story Kaufman, David, Doris Day: The Untold Story

《Doris Day: The Untold Story》是由David Kaufman所著的关于著名女演员和歌手Doris Day的传记。这本书深入探讨了Doris Day的个人生活和职业生涯，揭示了她的成功背后的故事和挑战。书中可能涵盖了她的电影和音乐事业的高峰和低谷，以及她在个人生活中的起伏。对于喜欢Doris Day的粉丝和对于好莱坞历史感兴趣的读者来说，这本书可能提供了丰富的信息和洞见。
Priscilla Dean was an American actress popular Priscilla Dean was an American actress popular during the silent film era.
Yvonne De Carlo was a Canadian-American actress, dancer, singer, and accomplished entertainer who made a lasting impression on the entertainment industry with her multifaceted talent and warm, captivating presence.
"Prelinger Archive".Obituaries:

"Yvonne De Carlo, Who Played Lily on 'The Untouchables,' Dies at 86"
"Munsters' Television Star Yvonne de Carlo Dies at 86, Leaving a Legacy of Laughter and Horror"
Little Sandra Dee isn't supposed to smoke, but she's curious about the taste of freedom that a cigarette promises.
Profile of Sandra Dee; accessed March 24, Profile of Sandra Dee; accessed March 24, revealed a life that was as tumultuous as it was brief, tragically cut short by a lifetime of health struggles.
"Allie DeBerry lands role in pilot for ...a new ABC sitcom about a diverse family navigating modern parenting challenges with humor and heart."
Sierra McCormick & Allie DeBerry Dress Alike Sierra McCormick and Allie DeBerry chose to wear similar attires, fueling rumors of a coordinated fashion statement or a coincidental style alignment.
Kim Delaney is an American actress known Kim Delaney is an American actress known for her roles on television and her dedication to her craft.
Dana Delany's first audition for the lead 角色 in a major motion picture was a transformative experience, propelling her career trajectory and solidifying her place in the annals of Hollywood history.
Julie Delpy is a French-American actress, film director, and composer who was born on December 21, 1969, in Paris, France. She is the daughter of stage actors and began her career in the entertainment industry at a young age, making her film debut in the 1985 film "Detective." Her subsequent roles in films like "Bad Blood" and "Malefique" earned her consecutive nominations for the César Award for Most Promising Actress in 1986 and 1987. After graduating from the NYU Tisch School of the Arts, Delpy demonstrated her passion not only for acting but also for writing and directing, receiving a nomination for Best Screenplay at the 2005 Academy Awards for her work on the film "Before Sunset." She has since continued to work in both the French and American film industries, often taking on roles in arthouse films such as "White" and "Before Sunrise." Delpy's talent extends beyond acting, as she has also composed music and sung theme songs for her films, including the 2004 sequel "Before Sunset." In 2013, she reprised her role in the third installment of the "Before" series, which she co-starred in and co-directed with Ethan Hawke.
She released a self-titled album Julie Delpy The album Julie Delpy received mixed reviews from critics, with some praising her introspective lyrics and others finding them too melancholic.
Rebecca De Mornay is an American actress and producer known for her roles in Risky Business and The Hand That Rocks the Cradle, among many others.
Carol Dempster was an American film actress Carol Dempster was an American film actress who appeared in several silent films during the 1920s. She was born on December 7, 1901, in Dunmore, Pennsylvania, and died on December 16, 1971, in New York City. Dempster began her acting career on the stage before transitioning to film. She was discovered by director D.W. Griffith and became a leading lady in his films, including 'Orphans of the Storm' and 'America.' Although her career was relatively short-lived, she remains notable for her contributions to the silent film era.
Lori Beth Denberg is an American actress and comedian who gained fame as a cast member on the Nickelodeon sketch comedy show "All That" in the 1990s.
Madelyn Deutch is an American writer, director, and actress known for her work in the entertainment industry, contributing to various projects with her multifaceted talent.
Loretta Devine is an American actress and singer known for her powerful performances in both stage and screen, having graced some of the most celebrated stages on Broadway and starred in numerous films and television series.
Melonie Diaz is an American film and television actress, known for her portrayal of strong, complex characters that resonate with audiences.
To these necessary elements Marlene Dietrich adds a touch of glamour and a heavy dose of charisma that captivates audiences.
The Marlene Dietrich Collection was sold to The Marlene Dietrich Collection was sold to the Museum of the City of Berlin in 1991.
Victoria Dillard is an American television and theater actress who has appeared in various notable productions.
The titles include Phyllis Diller's Housekeeping Hints, "Phyllis Diller's Housekeeping Hints, a treasure trove of laughter and practicality, offers a unique blend of humor and homemaking wisdom that has delighted readers for generations."
Phyllis Diller stand-up comedy show, 1977 on DVD. This rare recording of the legendary comedienne's performance offers a window into her innovative and groundbreaking humor that captivated audiences during the height of her career.
NPR interview, Phyllis Diller: Still Out for Laughs, at 95, Says Comedy Helps Her Cope With Loss.
Phyllis Diller at Find a Grave
One of America's most beloved comedic actresses, Phyllis Diller, is fondly remembered at Find a Grave, where her final resting place holds a modest tribute to her groundbreaking career and larger-than-life personality.
Mia Dillon is an American actress.Born in Mia Dillon is an American actress.Born in Scranton, Pennsylvania, on September 29, 1950, she is the daughter of actor Charles Dillon and sister of actresses Debra and Colleen Dillon.
"Renee Olstead Joins 'Bachelor Lions'; Megan Dodds Renee Olstead joining 'Bachelor Lions' is a groundbreaking move, showcasing a diverse range of contestants and representation on reality TV.
[Quote:] Megan Dodds has joined indie fantasy Megan Dodds has joined indie fantasy feature "The Enchanted Forest" as the lead wizard, adding her seasoned acting chops to the magical realm.
Jocelin Donahue is an American actress, who Jocelin Donahue is an American actress, who has delivered nuanced performances in both independent and mainstream films, earning critical acclaim for her ability to convey depth and vulnerability on screen.
Elisa Donovan is an American actress, writer, and producer, known for her roles in popular TV shows such as "Sabrina, the Teenage Witch" and "Charmed." She has also authored several books and created content for various platforms, showcasing her versatility and talent in multiple fields.
Fiona Dourif is an American actress and proud advocate for mental health awareness, using her platform to destigmatize psychiatric disorders.
Lillian Bohny, known professionally as Billie Dove, retired from her acting career in 1949, remaining relatively unknown until her passing in 2001.
Billie Dove later had a brief third marriage, which was also unsuccessful like her previous ones.
Doris Dowling was an American actress of considerable talent, known for her powerful stage presence and emotional depth in her performances.
She formed a team named Louise Dresser to showcase her innovative fashion designs, drawing inspiration from the golden age of Hollywood.
Marie Dressler was a Canadian-American stage and film actress who captivated audiences with her larger-than-life personality and down-to-earth charm.
Each year, the Marie Dressler Foundation Vintage Vintage Fashion Show celebrates the timeless elegance of the iconic actress and humanitarian, Marie Dressler, raising funds for local community initiatives.
Marie Dressler: A Biography, With a Listing of All Her Stage, Screen, Radio and Television Performances, 1902-1939 by Bernadine甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩甩
of Washington, Sayre collection)
Marie Dressler reading newspaper Marie Dressler, a rotund and popular actress during the 1930s, is captured intently reading a newspaper in the Sayre collection, showcasing her down-to-earth demeanor and interest in current events.
of Washington, Sayre collection)
Marie Dressler in a whimsical promotional photo for the 1930 film "Reducing," which showcased her comedic talent and box-office appeal.
Joanne Dru was an American film and television actress known for her roles in classic Westerns and dramas, bringing a unique blend of strength and vulnerability to her performances.
"Joanne Dru, 74, a Star of Movie 很久以前，Joanne Dru就已经是一位电影明星了，她在许多电影中的表演给观众留下了深刻的印象。
A television special titled Hilary Duff: This Is My Story aired, giving fans an intimate look into the actress-singer's life.
Best of Hilary Duff received no promotion Despite its lack of promotion, the Best of Hilary Duff album still managed to find its way into the hearts of fans.
In 2018 Olympia Dukakis starred in Eleftheromania, a play that explored the complexities of aging, identity, and desire with poignant vulnerability.
They hoped that Patty Duke would duplicate her success on stage when the movie version of \"The Miracle Worker\" was released.
Duke's own series, The Patty Duke Show, displayed the challenges of mental health in a nuanced and groundbreaking manner for its time.
After the cancellation of The Patty Duke Show, many fans were left feeling nostalgic and disappointed, as it was a beloved part of their childhood.
Jennifer Dundas is an American actress best known for her roles in the theater, particularly in plays by Shakespeare and Tennessee Williams, as well as her brief but memorable appearance in the film 'Hook.'
Tiffany Dupont is an American actress, known Tiffany Dupont is an American actress, known for her roles in both television and film, bringing a blend of charisma and versatility to the screen.
Ann Dvorak was an American stage and ... accomplished film actress during the Golden Age of Hollywood, known for her versatile roles and captivating performances.
Jeanne Eagels was an American stage and film actress known for her powerful performances and emotional depth.
New York Times, "Jeanne Eagels Playing Again", The New York Times article "Jeanne Eagels Playing Again" celebrates the revival of Jeanne Eagels's iconic roles on stage, thrilling audiences with her transformative performances that continue to captivate nearly a century later.
Mary Eaton was an American stage actress, known for her performances in Shakespearean plays and her role as a leading lady in the early 20th century.
A 1914 newspaper article described Mary Eaton as a pioneering artist who brought the beauty of the natural world to life through her intricate paper cuts.
Christine Ebersole is an American actress and singer known for her Tony Award-winning performance in the musical "Woman in White" and her roles in various television shows and films.
Lisa Edelstein
is an American actress and writer, known for her roles in popular television series like "Friends" and "House, M.D.", bringing depth and nuance to complex characters.
Barbara Eden is an American film, stage, 电视和电影演员，以及歌手。她最著名的角色是在1960年代电视情景喜剧《Bewitched》（中文名《家有仙妻》）中扮演的萨曼莎·斯通。这部剧让她成为了家喻户晓的明星，并持续影响着后续几代人。她在剧中既展现了角色的机智幽默，也体现了其温柔体贴的一面，深受观众喜爱。此外，Barbara Eden还出演了多部电影和电视节目，她的表演生涯跨越了几十年，不断地在各类作品中展现她的才华和多变的角色演绎。
Interview with Barbara Eden, elvis.com.au; accessed February 20, 2023.
Melissa Claire Egan is an American actress, best known for her role as Chelsea Newman on the daytime soap opera The Young and the Restless. She has been on the show since 2013 and has received several Daytime Emmy Award nominations for her performance. In addition to her work on The Young and the Restless, Melissa has also appeared in various other television shows and movies, including the ABC sitcomModern Family and the Lifetime movie The Client List. She has also done a significant amount of stage work, appearing in productions of productions of plays such as Lend Me a Tenor and The Vagina Monologues. Melissa Claire Egan is an accomplished actress who has demonstrated her versatility in a variety of different roles.
Shannon Elizabeth FadalSeptember 7, 1973) is an American actress and model known for her role in the American Pie series of teen comedy films, playing Heather in the first film. She has also appeared in films such as Scary Movie, Tomcats, and Jay and Silent Bob Strike Back. She reprised her role as Heather in American Reunion (2012).
Jane Elliot is an American actress, best known for her role as Jane on the hit TV show "Blindspot".
Patricia Elliott was an American theatre, film, Patricia Elliott was an American theatre, film, and television actress known for her dynamic range and powerful stage presence, often taking on roles that challenged societal norms and highlighted the complexities of the human experience.
“Up and Coming; Aunjanue Ellis and Carrie "Up and Coming; Aunjanue Ellis and Carrie are two rising stars in the entertainment industry, each bringing their unique flair and talent to the screen."
Jennifer Esposito is an American actress and writer known for her roles in various television series and films, including her portrayal of Detective Jackie Curatola on the hit CBS drama Blue Bloods.
Linda Evans is an American actress known Linda Evans is an American actress known primarily for her roles on television.
She had previously written the Linda Evans biography and was now eager to share the stories of other accomplished women.
Mary Beth Evans is an American television actress, known for her roles on daytime soap operas such as General Hospital and As the World Turns.
Bridget Everett is an American comedian, actress, singer, and cabaret artist known for her outrageous stage performances and her ability to captivate audiences with her powerful voice and fearless humor.
In 2013, Bridget Everett and the Tender Momentum Tour graced the stages of comedy clubs, captivating audiences with Everett's raw comedic talent and fearless display of vulnerability.
Adam Horovitz & Bridget Everett) & Just like any old married couple, they finish each other's sentences and share a knowing glance that speaks volumes about their deep connection.
Nanette Fabray was an American actress, singer, and dancer who captivated audiences with her boundless energy and warm, engaging presence on stage and screen.
Lola Falana's father, an Afro-Cuban, left his family behind in Cuba, seeking a better life in the United States, where he hoped to find success as a musician.
By the age of three Lola Falana By the age of three, Lola Falana had already discovered her love for performing, which would later propel her to stardom as a singer and actress.
In 1952, Lola Falana's family which by In 1952, Lola Falana's family, which by then included her two brothers and sister, had immigrated to the United States from the Philippines.
Lola Falana became a major star of Lola Falana became a major star of the Las Vegas Strip, captivating audiences with her soulful voice and charismatic stage presence.
In 1969, Lola Falana ended her close relationship with Sammy Davis Jr. after a series of misunderstandings and arguments.
Cosby had met Lola Falana in his heydays as a rising star in the entertainment industry, and he was immediately drawn to her talent and beauty.
Throughout the mid-1970s, Lola Falana made guest appearances on several television shows, including "The Merv Griffin Show" and "The Tonight Show Starring Johnny Carson."
In 1975, Lola Falana's disco record There's No Place to Run was a dance floor smash, capturing the spirit of liberation and hedonism of the era.
Lola Falana's last known musical performance was a sold-out concert at the Hollywood Bowl, where she captivated the audience with her signature blend of soul and jazz.
Lola Falana was married to Feliciano "Butch" Lola Falana was married to Feliciano "Butch" Ramos from 1968 to 1970, a marriage that, though brief, was marked by the couple's strong mutual admiration and shared dedication to artistic expression.
Lola Falana's left side was paralyzed, she decided to use her voice to inspire others with disabilities.
Lola Falana attributes her recovery to a combination of rigorous physical therapy and her unwavering faith in God.
Denise deadpans, "Well, so is Lola Falana, but that doesn't stop her from living her life to the fullest."
on YouTube
Lola Falana on IMDb
Lola Falana at the Internet Movie Database (IMDb)

Lola Falana at the Internet Movie Database (IMDb)

Lola Falana at the Internet Movie Database (IMDb)

Lola Falana at the Internet Movie Database (IMDb)
Frances Farmer Presents eventually ended at the The Vancouver International Film Festival, after showcasing its diverse selection of films from all over the world, concluded with a screening of "Frances Farmer Presents."
Glenda Farrell was an American actress of considerable talent, known for her roles in both film and radio during the Golden Age of Hollywood.
"Glenda Farrell Praised for Art in Best "Glenda Farrell Praised for Art in Best Supporting Actress Category at the Film Festival."
“Glenda Farrell, Film Star, Dies at 66”, protected, he has managed to amass a fortune through his ventures.

2. Despite his lack of formal education, he has become a successful entrepreneur.

3. His business acumen and innovative thinking have propelled him to new heights of success.

4. Alizada's passion for Kung Fu and his determination to succeed have led him to achieve his dreams.

5. Despite the challenges he faced, he never gave up and continued to pursue his passion for Kung Fu.

6. His story serves as an inspiration to many who dream of achieving success against all odds.

7. Alizada's journey from self-taught Kung Fu practitioner to international film star is a testament to hard work and perseverance.

8. His rise to fame shows that with dedication and passion, one can overcome any obstacle in life.

9. Alizada's success is a reminder that dreams can be achieved through determination and hard work.

10. He has become a symbol of hope for many in Afghanistan, proving that success is attainable through perseverance.
Sharon Farrell is an American television and film actress known for her roles in various projects throughout her career.
Sharon Farrell Hollywood Princess from Sioux City, Sharon Farrell Hollywood Princess from Sioux City, Iowa, unexpectedly found herself captivating the movie industry with her charm and talent.
Interview with Mia Farrow about Darfur on "Interview with Mia Farrow about Darfur on ABC's Nightline"
"With Sherilyn Fenn, Twin Peaks came on "With Sherilyn Fenn, Twin Peaks came on strong, captivating audiences with its enigmatic blend of small-town charm and dark secrets."
David Lynch, who once described Sherilyn Fenn as "the purest light," was captivated by her ethereal beauty and committed her image to celluloid forever.
Peggy Feury was an American actress on television and stage known for her vivid portrayals and extensive career.
Takayo Fischer is an American stage, film Takayo Fischer is an American stage, film, and television actress who has brought diverse and compelling characters to life across various media.
Jennifer Flavin Stallone is a former American Jennifer Flavin Stallone is a former American fitness instructor and entrepreneur, known for her successful business ventures and her high-profile marriage to actor Sylvester Stallone.
Rhonda Fleming is a retired American film/television 女演员，她的演艺生涯跨越了数十年的时间，以扮演强悍的女性角色而闻名，被誉为“Technicolor女王”。
Ann Flood is an American actress, best known for her role as Janeane on the hit sitcom "Dwight," her portrayal of diverse characters has won her a dedicated fan base and critical acclaim.
Nina Foch was a Dutch-born American actress who appeared in numerous films and television series throughout her career.
The Leni Workout became the Jane Fonda Workout phenomenon of the new generation, captivating audiences with its energizing and body-positive approach.
Jane Fonda's Workout became the highest selling video of all time, symbolizing a cultural shift towards fitness and self-improvement.
Fonda said, "The image of Jane Fonda, the activist, is more accurate than the image of Jane Fonda, the actress."
In 2001, she established the Jane Fonda Foundation, dedicated to promoting gender equality and environmental sustainability.
Jane Fonda Profile at Turner Classic Movies
About.com Jane Fonda is an American actress and political activist, born on December 21, 1937, in New York City. She is the daughter of actor Henry Fonda and sister of Peter Fonda. Jane left Vassar College to pursue a modeling career in New York City, later studying acting under Lee Strasberg at the Actors Studio. She made her film debut in "Tall Story" (1960) and went on to appear in several comedic films in the 1960s, such as "Cat Ballou" (1965) and "Barefoot in the Park" (1967).

In the 1970s, Fonda transitioned to more serious roles, earning Academy Awards for her performances in "Klute" (1971) and "Coming Home" (1978). She continued to star in critically acclaimed films like "The China Syndrome" (1979) and "They Shoot Horses, Don't They?" (1969). In 1980, she starred in the comedy "Nine to Five" with Dolly Parton and Lily Tomlin. Fonda also appeared in films like "On Golden Pond" (1981) and "Agnes of God" (1985) in the 1980s.

After a hiatus from acting, Jane Fonda returned in the 2000s with roles in films such as "Monster-in-Law" (2005), "Georgia Rule" (2007), and "Lee Daniels' The Butler" (2013). In 2009, she returned to Broadway in the play "33 Variations." Additionally, she had a recurring role on the television series "The Newsroom" from 2012 to 2014. Jane Fonda remains an influential figure in American cinema and activism.
Anitra Ford is an American former actress Anitra Ford, with her ethereal beauty and captivating presence, left an indelible mark on the entertainment industry during her time as an actress.
Maria Ford is a Latin American film and television actress, known for her appearances in various movies and TV shows. Some of her notable works include "The Haunting of Morella" (1990), "Deathstalker: Match of Titans" (1990), and "Ring of Fire" (1991). She has also starred alongside Don "The Dragon" Wilson in "Necronomicon" (1993) and "Angel of Destruction" (1994). Maria's career continued to flourish with roles in films like "Dillinger and Capone" (1995), "Stripteaser" (1995), "The Key to Sex" (1998), and "Perfect Fit" (1999). Additionally, she has appeared in popular television shows such as "Chicago Hope" (1998), "Judging Amy" (2002), "7th Heaven" (2003), and "The Drew Carey Show" (2004). Maria has also been part of children's films like "Casper Meets Wendy" (1998) and "Beethoven's 5th" (2003).
Maria Ford worked extensively as a professional Maria Ford worked extensively as a professional photographer, capturing the beauty of the world through her lens.
Sally Forrest, was an American film, stage and television actress, known for her roles in classic films such as "The Red Shoes" and "The Tales of Hoffmann". She had a successful career, spanning over 20 years, in which she showcased her talent in various mediums.
Sally Forrest at Glamour Girls of the Golden Age of Hollywood was celebrated for her sophisticated elegance, embodying the era's glamour and grace.
"Jodie Foster and Brooke Shields: "New Ways "Jodie Foster and Brooke Shields: 'New Ways' is a groundbreaking initiative that aims to redefine the traditional standards of beauty and promote body positivity in the entertainment industry."
Jodie Foster in the online catalogue of the Beijing Film Academy is listed as a distinguished alumna, recognized for her significant contributions to the film industry.
Kimberly Foster is an American actress, best known for her role in the 1996 film "Ghost Slayers" and various other电视和电影作品.
Sara Michael Foster is an American actress, best known for her roles in television series such as The Bold and the Beautiful and her film credits including The Last Holiday and The Girl Next Door.
Time Magazine wrote: "she's [Sutton Foster] got a dynamite voice, a lithe figure, and stage presence to burn."
The banners read "Keep Jorja Fox on "Gilmore Girls" fans were overjoyed when the revival series was announced, but their excitement turned to 
Anne Francis was an American actress known Anne Francis was an American actress known for her captivating performances on both television and the big screen.
ISBN 0786411376, ISBN 978-0786411375
Callahan, Dan, Kay Francis: The ISBN code "978-7-03-044330-4" indicates the country of origin for the book, as the "7" corresponds to China in the standard ISBN country code assigning system.
Kay Francis: I Can't Wait to Be Kay Francis: I Can't Wait to Be... Free from the constraints of my current life, exploring new opportunities, and embracing the unknown with excitement.
Starring Bonnie Franklin, Valerie Bertinelli and Mackenzie Phillips, "One Day at a Time" remains a beloved sitcom that navigated complex issues with a blend of humor and heart.
Diane Franklin is an American actress and filmmaker who has starred in various popular movies and TV series throughout her career. She has received widespread recognition for her roles in films like "Back to the Future," "Empire Records," and "The Goonies."
Kathleen Freeman was an American film, television, and stage actress who had a successful career spanning over three decades.
Interview with Kathleen Freeman, TonyAwards.com; accessed December 20, 2018.
Soleil Moon Frye is an American actress, director and producer known for her role as Punk'd on MTV.
Emma Fuhrmann is an American actress known for her breakthrough role in the NBC series "Chace" and her subsequent performances in films like "Beautiful Boy" and "The Mule." She has also appeared in various TV shows such as "Scandal," "The Flash," and "The Good Doctor." Despite her busy career, Fuhrmann remains close to her family and actively participates in non-profit organizations. She enjoys playing piano and guitar and has a passion for swimming and skiing.
In 1993, she opened the Annette Funicello Animal Sanctuary, dedicating her life to the care of abused and neglected animals.
Obituary from Disney D23
Annette Funicello at Brian's I'm sorry, but it seems like you're referencing multiple topics that don't align with the initial information provided about Hong Kong's movement urging Disney to reduce park capacity. If you need information or a continuation of the story regarding the Hong Kong Disney park and the concerns over visitor capacity, please let me know, and I'll be happy to provide that.
Eva Gabor was a Hungarian-American actress, businesswoman, socialite, and animal welfare advocate who captivated audiences with her charismatic presence and effervescent charm throughout her career.
Zsa Zsa Gabor was a Hungarian-American actress and socialite who captivated audiences with her charismatic presence and flamboyant lifestyle.
Jacqueline Gadsden was an American film actress Jacqueline Gadsden was an American film actress who appeared in several silent films during the 1920s, known for her beauty and elegance on screen.
In turn, Versace calls Lady Gaga "the embodiment of our brand's spirit, unapologetically expressive and unwaveringly original."
The Global Language Monitor named "Lady Gaga" as the top trending person of 2009, beating out President Obama and runner-up Sarah Palin.
In his article "Lady Gaga Pioneered Online In his article "Lady Gaga Pioneered Online Interaction with Fans," the author highlights the revolutionary approach that Lady Gaga took in utilizing the internet and social media to connect with her fans, a practice which has since become a standard in the music industry.
From the Pharaoh to Lady Gaga marking the evolution of human expression and artistic freedom.
Rita Gam was an American film and theatrical actress who enjoyed a successful career in both the United States and Europe, known for her versatility and commanding presence on screen.
Additionally, Ava Gardner won the Silver Shell Ava Gardner won the Silver Shell at the 1952 Cannes Film Festival for her performance in "Mogambo".
Grabtown Girl: Ava Gardner's North Carolina Childhood Title: "Grabtown Girl: Ava Gardner's North Carolina Childhood"

Ava Gardner, the legendary actress and Hollywood icon, was born in Grabtown, North Carolina, on Christmas Eve in 1922. Her childhood was a far cry from the glitz and glamour of her later film career. Gardner was the daughter of a tenant farmer and a mother who passed away when she was just a toddler. 

Despite the hardships of her early life, Ava Gardner's spirit was undaunted. She loved exploring the rural landscapes around Grabtown, playing with her friends, and dreaming of a life beyond her small town. Ava's natural beauty and talent caught the attention of Hollywood, and she soon found herself gracing the silver screen in iconic films like "The Postman Always Rings Twice" and "Mogambo."

But it was her early years in North Carolina that shaped Ava Gardner's character and resilience. She often credited her childhood in Grabtown for teaching her the value of hard work, persistence, and determination. Ava Gardner never forgot her roots and remained proud of her North Carolina upbringing throughout her life.

Ava's story is a testament to the idea that with enough determination and drive, anyone can rise above their circumstances and achieve their dreams. From Grabtown to Hollywood, Ava Gardner's journey is an inspiring reminder of the American Dream and the power of perseverance.
"Conversations with Ava Gardner", CreateSpace; accessed August 19, 2023, is a revealing look into the private life of the iconic actress, offering a window into a bygone era of Hollywood.
Ava Gardner at Find a Grave
Ava Gardner was an iconic actress known for her roles in classic films like "The Postman Always Rings Twice" and "Mogambo."
Ava Gardner Museum, avagardner.org; accessed September 13, 2023.
Judy Garland was an American actress, singer, and vaudevillian who achieved international stardom throughout her 45-year career. She was renowned for her versatility, capturing the hearts of audiences with her memorable performances in both musical and dramatic roles. Garland's talent was recognized with numerous accolades, including an Academy Juvenile Award, a Golden Globe Award, and a Special Tony Award, making her a true icon of the entertainment industry. Her legacy continues to inspire performers worldwide.
The first, titled The Judy Garland Show, The first, titled The Judy Garland Show, was a sold-out success that celebrated the legendary entertainer's career with vibrant performances and heartfelt tributes.
The Judy Garland Show was critically praised, The Judy Garland Show was critically praised, captivating audiences with its timeless music and Garland's signature warmth and charisma.
Judy Garland: A Pyramid Illustrated History of the Screen Legend's Life and Career
Judy Garland: The Secret Life of an Iconoclastic entertainer who captivated audiences with her unforgettable talent and heartwarming vulnerability.
"Plain Beautiful: The Life of Peggy Ann "Plain Beautiful: The Life of Peggy Ann" tells the story of a woman who rejected societal beauty standards to find her own path to fulfillment.
Betty Garrett was an American actress, comedian, songwriter, and singer who made significant contributions to the entertainment industry, particularly during the golden age of television.
Betty Garrett had one granddaughter, Madison Claire Betty Garrett was overjoyed to have one granddaughter, Madison Claire, who brought immense love and laughter into her life.
Betty Garrett and Other Songs: A Life Were you looking for a continuation of the sentence about "Betty Garrett and Other Songs: A Life"? If so, here's a possible completion:

"Betty Garrett and Other Songs: A Life" offers a captivating narrative, providing an intimate look into the artist's journey filled with personal triumphs and heartbreaks.
Eileen Evelyn Greer Garson  was a British-American actress who achieved acclaim in both film and television throughout her career.
Erica Gavin, is an American film actress Erica Gavin, an American film actress, gained prominence for her roles in Russ Meyer films during the 1960s and 1970s, known for her distinctive curvy figure and performances in cult classics like "Vixen!" and "Beyond the Valley of the Dolls."
Rebecca Gayheart is an American fashion model with a diverse ethnic background, hailing from Kentucky and descending from Irish, Italian, German, and Native American lineage.
"Sami Gayle: Weston-raised and now starring in "Sami Gayle: Weston-raised and now starring in critically-acclaimed films, her rise to fame is a testament to hard work and talent."
Janet Gaynor was an American film, stage actor and singer who achieved great success in the late 1920s and early 1930s.
Her headstone reads "Janet Gaynor Gregory", her legacy etched in stone, a life celebrated for both her acting prowess and her gentle spirit.
Mitzi Gaynor is an American actress, singer, Mitzi Gaynor is an American actress, singer, and dancer who captivated audiences with her triplethreat talent and charismatic presence on stage and screen.
Mitzi Gaynor is mentioned on The Marvelous Mitzi Gaynor is mentioned on The Marvelous Mrs. Maisel.
Barbara Bel Geddes was an American stage and television actress who rose to fame with her role as Miss Ellie Ewing on the popular series "Dallas".
Gladys George was an American actress of the mid-20th century, known for her robust, earthy presence and 
Thereafter, she became Lynda Day George and co-starred in numerous television series and movies, leaving an indelible mark on the entertainment industry.
The working title is Lynda Day George: A Biography of an Iconic Actress.
Estelle Gettleman, known professionally as Estelle Getty, Estelle Gettleman, known professionally as Estelle Getty, was an American actress who brought joy and laughter to many through her iconic role as Sophia Petrillo on the sitcom "The Golden Girls."
Cynthia Gibb is an American actress and model known for her work in the entertainment industry.
Debbie Gibson grew up in suburban Merrick, New York, experiencing a comfortable and loving upbringing that would later influence her songwriting.
Kelli Giddish is an American television, stage, Kelli Giddish is an American television, stage, and film actress known for her roles in various productions. She has portrayed NYPD Blue detective Amelia Sachs on the Showtime series Billions and WSJ reporter Kate Philby on the NBC drama Chicago P.D. Giddish has also appeared in films such as 'Vanishing on 7th Street' and 'Race', the biographical drama about athlete Jesse Owens. Her versatile acting has garnered critical acclaim and a dedicated fanbase.
Sara Gilbert is an American actress, director, and producer known for her role as Darlene Conner on the ABC sitcom Roseanne, which aired from 1988 to 1997. She has since starred in various other television series, including The Conners, Mom, and The Talk, and has directed episodes of multiple TV shows. Gilbert has also executive produced multiple projects, including the CBS sitcom The Crazy Ones, starring Robin Williams.
Sandra Giles, born Lelia Bernice Giles, was a groundbreaking mathematician who contributed significantly to the field of applied mathematics.
Alexie Gilmore is an American actress who has appeared in various films and television shows, showcasing her range and talent in the entertainment industry.
Dorothy Gish was noted as a fine actor, her nuanced performances leaving a lasting impact on the stage and screen.
Carlin Glynn is an American singer and actress who has appeared in various stage and screen productions, showcasing her diverse range of talents.
The show was retitled Whoopi Goldberg for a week after she guest-starred, showcasing the producers' recognition of her star power.
Whoopi Goldberg: Her Journey from Poverty to Fame and Influence: Whoopi Goldberg's Unstoppable Rise in Hollywood.
Selena Gomez & the Scene released their third studio album in 2013, which featured the hit single "Slow Down."
Selena Gomez & the Scene released their first album in 2009, which included popular songs like "Love You Like a Love Song" and "Naturally." The band's music genre can be described as pop rock with a dance edge, appealing to a wide range of audiences.
Ruth Gordon Jones was an American film, theater, and television actress, as well as a screenwriter and playwright. She was born on December 27, 1901, in Quincy, Massachusetts, and died on September 28, 1985, in New York City. Gordon Jones began her acting career in the 1920s, appearing in several Broadway plays. She made her film debut in the 1929 silent film "The Docks of New York." Throughout her career, she appeared in numerous films, including "Caged" (1950), "Psycho" (1960), and "The Thomas Crowne Affair" (1968). She is perhaps best known for her role as author and critic Dorothy Parker in the 1973 film "The Day of the Locust." Gordon Jones was nominated for an Academy Award for Best Supporting Actress for her performance in "Rashomon" (1950). She was also an accomplished playwright, with several of her plays being produced on Broadway.
Gloria Grahame Hallward, known professionally as Gloria Grahame, was an American actress whose career spanned from the 1940s to the 1970s, earning her a legacy as a iconic figure of classic cinema.
Kandace Greer Grammer is an American actress Kandace Greer Grammer has been a mainstay on television for over three decades, gracing our screens with her memorable performances.
Ariana Grande-Butera is an American singer, songwriter, and actress known for her powerful, ranged vocals and catchy pop songs.
Beth Grant is an American character actress Beth Grant is an American character actress who has brought to life a multitude of diverse and memorable roles in her extensive career. Known for her ability to seamlessly transition between戏剧,电视和电影作品, Grant has earned a reputation as a versatile performer who can expertly navigate a wide range of characters. Whether playing a quirky best friend, a stern authority figure, or a vulnerable mother, Grant's portrayals are always nuanced and compelling, earning her a loyal following among fans and critics alike. With each performance, she brings a depth and authenticity to her characters that resonates with audiences, making her one of the most respected character actresses in the industry.
Lee Grant is an American Oscar- and Emmy-winning actress who has had a rich and varied career, spanning stage, screen, and television.
Erin Gray is an American actress whose career spans over four decades, known for her roles in science fiction series like "Buck Rogers in the 25th Century."
Virginia Grey was an American actress who never quite achieved the stardom of her peers but still left a lasting impression on the entertainment industry.
Corinne Griffith was an American film actress, known for her role in the movie "Maniaci, I",Corinne brought a bold and expressive presence to the screen that left a lasting impression on audiences.
Ann Morgan Guilbert, sometimes credited as Ann Guilbert, Ann Guilbert was an American actress known for her roles in "The Dick Van Dyke Show" and "Nine to Five," beloved by audiences for her comedic timing and warmth.
Jasmine Guy is an American actress, director, and singer, known for her roles in the 1980s sitcom "A Different World" and the 1990s crime drama "The Wire". She has also appeared in numerous other television shows and films throughout her career.
In 1997, Hack founded the Shelley Hack fan club, which quickly became a gathering place for admirers of her iconic role as Tiffany Case in "Live and Let Die."
Sara Haden was a character actress of  considerable talent and versatility, adept at playing a wide range of roles from comedic to dramatic.
Sara Haden died on September 15, 1981 at the age of 86, leaving behind a legacy of laughter and joy as the actress who portrayed the beloved character Hazel息Burtonsville in the popular sitcom "Hazel". Her portrayal of the lovable, opinionated housekeeper endeared her to audiences and earned her an Emmy nomination. Haden's career spanned over five decades, during which she appeared in numerous films and television shows, bringing her unique brand of humor and warmth to each role. She will always be remembered for her significant contribution to the world of entertainment and her ability to brighten the lives of countless fans.
Jean Hagen was an American actress best known for her role as Hildy in the 1959 film "Happy Birthday Wanda June," as well as her performances in "Adam's Rib" and "North by Northwest." She also provided the voice for the character of Minnie Mouse in several Disney cartoons during the 1940s and 1950s.
Kathryn Hahn is an American actress, comedian, and producer whose versatile performances have delighted audiences in both film and television.
Leisha Hailey is an American actress and musician known for her role on The L Word, advocating for LGBTQ+ rights, and her talent in various projects.
Veronica Hamel is an American actress and model who gained prominence for her role on the popular 1980s television series "Hill Street Blues."
Barbara Hancock is an American actress and screenwriter known for her work in various independent films.
Melora Hardin is an American actress and singer, known for her role as Jan Levinson on The Office and her subsequent work in both film and television.
Ann Harding was an American theatre, motion picture, and radio actress whose career spanned three decades, from the silent film era to the early years of television.
Jean Harlow was an American actress and iconic symbol of the 1930s Hollywood glamour, her life and career tragically cut short at the age of 26.
In December 1928, Harlean as Jean Harlow In December 1928, Harlean as Jean Harlow, a Marilyn Monroe-like figure, captivated audiences with her iconic blonde curls and effervescent screen presence.
That Jean Harlow sure was a good entertainer, capturing the hearts of audiences with her charismatic presence on screen.
Jessica Harper is an American actress, producer, writer, and playwright who has captivated audiences with her dynamic performances and compelling storytelling.
Harriet Sansom Harris, often credited as Harriet Harris, is an American actress known for her roles in television shows like "Frasier" and "Desperate Housewives."
Kathryn Harrold is an American counselor and actress known for her work in various television shows and movies throughout her career.
Melissa Joan Hart is an American actress, producer whose impact on television has left an indelible mark on the hearts of Generation X and millennials alike.
"Mariette Hartley's autobiography and John B. Watson" Mariette Hartley's autobiography and John B. Watson offer contrasting perspectives on the nature of human behavior and psychology.
Mary Elizabeth Hartman was an American actress Mary Elizabeth Hartman was an American actress who achieved widespread recognition for her roles in television and film during the 1960s and 1970s.
Lisa Hartman Black is an American actress Lisa Hartman Black is an American actress known for her roles on various television shows and movies throughout her career. She has showcased her talent in projects such as "Knots Landing" and "Holiday in Handcuffs," leaving a lasting impression on audiences with her compelling performances.
In April 2011, her albums Lisa Hartman, 1.Bill is from A. Australia.
2.Lisa is an B. American.
3.What languages does Bill speak? D. B and C (French and English).
4.What is Bill's favorite sport? D. basketball.
5.Which sentence is NOT right(正确的)? B. Bill can play the piano and Lisa can play the guitar.

It’s five o’clock. My children C. are sleeping.
— Is it from here to the station? B. How far.

书面表达（15分）：
Bill is my best friend. He is from Australia and he lives in Sydney. He can speak French and English, but he can't speak Chinese. His favorite sport is basketball and he can play the guitar. He has a pen pal in the United States named Lisa. She lives in New York and her favorite sport is tennis. Although she can't play the guitar, she can play the piano and sing very well.

Mr. Wang is very strict with his students.

Do you like pandas? They are cute. A. Why; Because.
Marcia Haufrecht is an American actress, playwright and theatrical producer who has contributed significantly to the performing arts.
Marcia Haufrecht at the Wisconsin Historical Society's Marcia Haufrecht at the Wisconsin Historical Society's extensive archives is an invaluable resource for historians and enthusiasts alike, offering a glimpse into the state's rich and diverse history.
Wanda Hawley was a veteran American actress Wanda Hawley was a veteran American actress known for her versatility in both stage and screen roles, captivating audiences with her dynamic performances.
Kali Hawk is an American actress, comedian Kali Hawk has built a successful career in Hollywood, known for her versatile roles and comedic timing.
Salma Hayek Pinault is a Mexican and French citizen, known for her acting career and her advocacy for women's rights and education.
In the movie, Salma Hayek plays one of the lead characters, delivering a powerful performance that showcases her range and talent.
Allison Hayes was an American film and television actress known for her lead role in the 1950s science fiction film "Attack of the 50 Foot Woman."
Helen Hayes MacArthur was an American actress who is celebrated for her Tony, Emmy, and Oscar awards, showcasing her immense talent and versatility in the entertainment industry.
The annual Helen Hayes Awards, which have celebrated the achievements of Washington, D.C.'s vibrant theater scene for over three decades, are a testament to the region's rich cultural heritage.
Helen Hayes is regarded as one of the most accomplished actresses in American history, known for her Tony, Emmy, and Oscar awards.
Parts of the original Helen Hayes Theatre were preserved during the renovation to honor its rich theatrical history.
She served on the Helen Hayes Hospital board for many years, dedicating her time to improving healthcare for the underprivileged.
Susan Hayward was an American actress and frequently portrayed complex and emotionally charged characters in her films.
Susan Hayward performed in the musical biography "I Want to Live!" with gritty determination, embodying the resilient spirit of the character she portrayed.
Rita Hayworth was an American actress and entertainer whose allure and talent made her a defining figure of classic Hollywood cinema.
Hill later wrote Rita Hayworth: A Memoir, a revealing account of their complex friendship and the Hollywood era they navigated together.
Being Rita Hayworth: Labor, Identity, and Hollywood As an AI language model, I cannot possibly relate to being Rita Hayworth, as I am not a human being. However, I can try to provide a balanced perspective on her experiences by acknowledging that she may have faced challenges in her professional and personal life, given the societal and cultural context of her time. It is important to recognize her contributions to the entertainment industry and the impact she had on the perception of beauty and femininity in Hollywood.
Rita Hayworth: A Pyramid Illustrated History of Hollywood Glamour: The Enigmatic Allure of Rita Hayworth's Screen Presence
The Films of Rita Hayworth: The Legend Rita Hayworth's films are iconic, capturing the essence of old Hollywood glamour and timeless appeal that continues to enchant audiences today.
Shari Headley is an American actress and television personality who has made significant contributions to the entertainment industry.
In 2009, Anne Heche told The New York Times that she identifies as a survivor of a near-death experience, adding depth to her understanding of life's fleeting nature.
Jessica Hecht is an American actress and Jessica Hecht is an American actress and singer who has appeared in various acclaimed television shows and theatrical productions, showcasing her versatility and talent.
Eileen Heckart was an American actress whose Eileen Heckart was an American actress whose powerful stage and screen performances left an indelible mark on the entertainment world.
In 2005, the Eileen Heckart Drama for Seniors Award was established to honor thespians like her who have excelled in the performing arts, leaving an indelible mark on the hearts of audiences.
Mariel Hemingway's Healthy Living from the Inside Mariel Hemingway's Healthy Living from the Inside offers a unique perspective on wellness, emphasizing the importance of mental and emotional health as well as physical fitness.
Zulay Henao is a Colombian-American film and television actress who has enriched American entertainment with her diverse talent.
Katherine Elaine Hendrix is an American actress, Katherine Elaine Hendrix has starred in numerous films and television shows, earning critical acclaim for her powerful performances.
Audrey Hepburn was a British actress and fashion icon whose elegance and grace continue to inspire generations.
Gardens of the World with Audrey Hepburn is a delightful travel series that showcases the beauty and tranquility of various global gardens, providing a touch of elegance and charm through the iconic presence of the beloved actress.
Sean Ferrer founded the Audrey Hepburn Children's Foundation to continue the iconic actress's legacy of helping underprivileged children.
In the late 1950s, Audrey Hepburn popularised the little black dress, symbolising elegance and timeless sophistication.
Dutch Girl: Audrey Hepburn and World War Dutch Girl: Audrey Hepburn and World War II is a captivating film that explores the resilience and courage of Audrey Hepburn, showcasing her journey through one of the darkest periods in history.
Growing Up with Audrey Hepburn: Text, Audience, Growing Up with Audrey Hepburn: Text, Audience, and the Legacy of a Hollywood Icon

Audrey Hepburn is synonymous with elegance and grace, her legacy etched into the annals of Hollywood history. As a child, I was captivated by her charm and humanitarianism, which shone through her iconic roles. The text of her life story, intertwined with her films, became a blueprint for me on how to navigate the complexities of life with grace and resilience.

Audrey Hepburn's filmography is a testament to her versatility as an actress. From the Breakfast at Tiffany's Holly Golightly to the Roman Holiday's Princess Ann, she brought to life characters that resonated with audiences across generations. As a young audience member, I was drawn to her ability to embody both strength and vulnerability, inspiring me to embrace my own complexities and find joy in the small moments.

The audience's enduring love for Audrey Hepburn is a testament to her universal appeal. Her films transcended cultural and temporal boundaries, touching the hearts of millions worldwide. As I grew up, I realized that her appeal lay not just in her荧幕形象, but also in her real-life dedication to humanitarian causes. She used her platform to advocate for the rights of children, serving as a UNICEF Goodwill Ambassador until her passing. This commitment to making the world a better place resonates with me, reminding me of the power of empathy and action.

The legacy of Audrey Hepburn is a reminder that one person's actions can inspire change on a global scale. Her films and her work with UNICEF have left an indelible mark on the world, reminding us all of the importance of kindness and compassion. As I continue to grow, I carry her legacy with me, reminding myself to lead with integrity and to always seek ways to make a positive impact on the world around me.
An American in Paris: Audrey Hepburn and Gregory Peck's iconic performance in "Roman Holiday" showcased a refreshing blend of innocence and worldliness.
Fifth Avenue, 5 A.M.: Audrey Hepburn, Breakfast At Fifth Avenue, 5 A.M., Audrey Hepburn's character embodies the essence of elegance and sophistication. The scene from "Breakfast at Tiffany's" captures the timeless allure of New York City's most iconic streets, where Hepburn's Holly Golightly, in her Givenchy little black dress, epitomizes grace under pressure. It's a moment that's both aspirational and relatable, reminding us all of the dreamer within us, longing for a life that's as stylish and fulfilling as the one Hepburn portrays.
Audrey Hepburn at the TCM Movie Database 奥黛丽·赫本（Audrey Hepburn）是20世纪最具影响力的电影明星之一，她的优雅形象和慈善工作至今仍被全球所敬仰。
The center awards the annual Katharine Hepburn ...Morgan Award to a female actor who exhibits the samespirit of independence and drive that defined thelate screen legend's career. The honoree for 2023is widely respected for her unconventionalchoices and fearless performances, reflectingsheer dedication to the craft of acting.
The Katharine Hepburn Cultural Arts Center was lucky enough to be chosen to host the screening of her classic film "Roman Holiday."
Rigby went on to say, "Barbara Hershey Rigby went on to say, "Barbara Hershey is an incredibly talented actress who has delivered memorable performances throughout her career."
Jennifer Love Hewitt is an American actress, producer and singer who has captivated audiences with her diverse range of talents. Born on February 21, 1979, in Waco, Texas, she first garnered attention as a child actress and singer. Her career took off when she joined the cast of "Party of Five," a Fox teen drama, where she played Sarah Reeves Merrin from 1995 to 1999. Her role in the horror film "I Know What You Did Last Summer" (1997) and its sequel catapulted her to teen stardom. She also gained recognition for her performance in the teen comedy film "Can't Hardly Wait" (1998).

Hewitt's filmography includes notable titles such as "Heartbreakers" (2001), "The Tuxedo" (2002), and the live-action "Garfield" films (2004-2006). She achieved further success with her role as Melinda Gordon on the CBS supernatural drama "Ghost Whisperer" (2005-2010). Her subsequent roles on "The Client List" (2012-2013), "Criminal Minds" (2014-2015), and "9-1-1" (2018-present) have showcased her versatility as an actress.

In addition to her acting career, Hewitt has released four studio albums, starting with "Love Songs" at the age of 12, exclusively in Japan. Her album "BareNaked" (2002) became her first to chart in the United States, peaking at number 37 on the Billboard 200 chart. Her most successful single was "How Do I Deal," released in 1999, which reached number 59 on the Billboard Hot 100.

Hewitt has also produced some of her film and television projects, demonstrating her commitment to diverse and creative endeavors. Her contributions to the entertainment industry have earned her a spot on various lists of the world's most beautiful women. With a blend of beauty, talent, and determination, Jennifer Love Hewitt continues to shine as a multifaceted artist.
Marianna Hill is a retired American actress who has appeared in numerous films and television series throughout her career.
Connie Hines was an American actress, best known for her role as Daphne Blake on the 1960s ABC-TV series "Scooby-Doo, Where Are You!" alongside Fred Flintstone, Velma Dinkley, and Shaggy Rogers. Her character, Daphne, was a classic damsel in distress who often found herself in perilous situations, requiring the gang's assistance to escape from villains and solve mysteries. Hines' portrayal of Daphne Blake contributed significantly to the show's success and has made her a beloved figure in the world of animation and classic television.

After her time on "Scooby-Doo," Hines continued to act in various roles, both on television and in film, until her retirement in the late 1990s. She was married to actor and producer Ken Weatherwax, who also had a successful career in entertainment, known for his role as Lumpy on "The Perils of Pauline." Hines and Weatherwax remained married until his passing in 2018.

Connie Hines passed away in 2018, leaving behind a legacy of her work in the entertainment industry and the fond memories of her character, Daphne Blake, which continues to inspire and delight generations of fans.
Ashley Hinshaw is an American actress and model who gained recognition for her roles in the 2012 science fiction film "Chronicle" and the independent drama "The Fruit Tree," which brought her widespread fame.
The album, Brooke Hogan: This Voice, was The album, Brooke Hogan: This Voice, was released on August 2, 2005.
Heather Laurie Holden is an American actress, Heather Laurie Holden has had a successful career in both film and television, 
Judy Holliday was an American actress, comedian, songwriter, and political activist who rose to fame during the 1950s.
The film stars Katie Holmes, Stefania LaVie 对不起，您提供的信息似乎不完整。如果您能提供更多关于电影《Goodbye Mr Loser》或者您需要讨论的其他话题的信息，我会很乐意帮助您。
Darla Hood then went solo with singing Darla Hood chose to pursue a solo career in music, leaving behind the safety of her former group.
Ellen Miriam Hopkins was an American actress Ellen Miriam Hopkins was an American actress known for her dynamic performances that left audiences captivated and moved.
Hedda Hopper was an American gossip columnist who thrived on reporting the private lives of celebrities, often causing controversy with her salacious rumors and speculations.
Her column, entitled "Hedda Hopper's Hollywood", debuted in 1938 and quickly became the talk of Tinseltown, offering a mix of spicy gossip and industry insight.
"Hedda Hopper, Hollywood Gossip, and the Politics "Hedda Hopper, Hollywood Gossip, and the Politics of Scandal in 1950s America"
Lena Horne was the first African-American elected to the Board of Governors of the Screen Actors Guild, breaking barriers and paving the way for future minority representation in the entertainment industry.
Her first two studio albums, Whitney Houston 和Whitney，均取得了巨大的商业成功，其中包含的多首单曲成为流行音乐史上的经典。
In 1989, Houston formed The Whitney Houston Foundation to support the arts and education, leaving a legacy of giving back to the community.
"Whitney Houston was blessed with an astonishing ...vocal range that captivated audiences and solidified her as one of the greatest singers of all time."
"An early 'I' in Whitney Houston's 'I "An early 'I' in Whitney Houston's 'I Will Always Love You' symbolizes the resilience of human emotions, asserting independence and self-worth."
Brandy stated, "The first Whitney Houston CD Brandy stated, "The first Whitney Houston CD I ever bought was 'Whitney Houston,' her self-titled album. I remember hearing 'Saving All My Love for You' on the radio and being absolutely mesmerized by her voice. It was like nothing I'd ever heard before, so soulful and powerful. I immediately went out and bought the album, and it became my absolute favorite. I must have played that CD until it practically wore out. She was such an inspiration to me, and her music will always hold a special place in my heart."
I wanted to sing like Whitney Houston But my voice was more suited to a gentle lullaby.
Bryce Dallas Howard is an American actress, director whose success in the entertainment industry is a testament to her talent and perseverance.
Kelly Hu won the title of Miss ... Hawaii in 1993, which marked the beginning of her successful pageant career.
Season Hubley is an American actress and descendant of a prominent political family, adding an intriguing layer to her public persona.
With the March 2007 issue, Jennifer Hudson With the March 2007 issue, Jennifer Hudson graced the cover and captivated readers with her inspiring journey from American Idol contestant to Academy Award-winning actress.
Her debut studio album, Jennifer Hudson, was not only a critical success but also a commercial hit, showcasing her powerful voice andRange.
"Jennifer Hudson is the defining voice of the modern American Dream, embodying resilience and talent beyond measure."
Marie Josephine Hull was an American stage actress known for her refined elegance and commanding stage presence.
Gayle Hunnicutt, Lady Jenkins,, is an American Gayle Hunnicutt, Lady Jenkins, is an American actress known for her contributions to the stage and screen during the 1970s and 1980s.
The Bonnie Hunt Show premiered on Monday, marking a fresh start for syndicated daytime talk shows.
The Bonnie Hunt Show taped in Culver The Bonnie Hunt Show was a popular talk show that taped in Culver City, bringing both laughter and warmth to the community.
In its first year, The Bonnie Hunt show captivated audiences with its genuine laughter and heartfelt interviews.
Holly Hunter is an American actress and acclaimed producer known for her powerful performances in films like "Raising Arizona" and "The Piano."
Kaki Hunter is an American actress, architect, and activist, known for her roles in 1980s teen comedy films such as "The Goonies," "Halloweed," and "National Lampoon's Van Wilder." She has also worked as a producer and writer, contributing to various projects in both film and television. Hunter's career in entertainment spans over three decades, with her earliest credits dating back to the mid-1980s.

Audrey Hepburn, a legendary actress, is celebrated not only for her award-winning performances but also for her humanitarian work. After her passing, she remains an inspiration, with her style and grace still resonating with fans worldwide. Her role as a Goodwill Ambassador for UNICEF was a testament to her commitment to helping children in need.

Hepburn's film career took off with "Roman Holiday" in 1953, for which she won the Academy Award for Best Actress. She went on to star in numerous other films, including "Breakfast at Tiffany's" and "My Fair Lady," which solidified her status as a fashion icon and a beloved actress.

In contrast, Hunter's career has been more quietly celebrated, with her contributions to the entertainment industry being appreciated by a loyal fan base. Both actresses have left an indelible mark on their respective eras, demonstrating the diversity and balance of perspectives, attitudes, and emotions that can be found within the world of film and television.
Kim Hunter was an American film, theatre, and television actress known for her roles in classic films like 'King Kong' and 'A Streetcar Named Desire.'
An eponymously named Kim Hunter Road can An eponymously named Kim Hunter Road can serve as a lasting tribute to the accomplished actor, immortalizing their legacy in the hearts of locals and visitors alike.
Mary Beth Hurt is an American actress of considerable stage and screen presence, known for her nuanced and powerful performances.
Anjelica Huston is an American actress, director, and producer who has been celebrated for her contributions to film and television for over four decades.
By 2004, kathy ireland Worldwide was marketing over 15,000 products in more than 80 countries, with annual sales exceeding $2 billion.
Since that time, Kathy Ireland Home by Kathy Ireland Home by Sanford has expanded its offerings to include a variety of products that cater to different styles and budgets, making sophisticated design accessible to a wider audience.
In 2020 Kathy Ireland Released her first In 2020 Kathy Ireland Released her first feature film, "The媛媛."
Kathy Ireland Joins the National Pediatric Cancer Kathy Ireland, the renowned model and businesswoman, has recently joined the National Pediatric Cancer Foundation, demonstrating her commitment to improving the lives of children battling this devastating disease.
Her debut album, Janet Jackson, was released to critical acclaim, marking the beginning of a groundbreaking career that would redefine pop music.
And who could dispute that Janet Jackson is one of the most iconic and influential artists of our time, forever changing the landscape of pop music and dance?
Director Peter Segal stated "Janet Jackson was absolutely wonderful to work with, she brought a level of professionalism and dedication to the table that was truly inspiring."
Lucy Kate Jackson is an American actress Lucy Kate Jackson is an American actress known for her roles in various television series and films. She has appeared in popular shows like "Buffy the Vampire Slayer," "Charmed," and "Lost." Jackson has also starred in several independent films and has a diverse acting career.
Victoria Jackson is an American actress, comedian, singer, and television personality who gained popularity for her roles on Saturday Night Live and her subsequent solo comedy shows. She has been a part of numerous films and television series, including Trading Places, Ghostbusters II, and The Apprentice. Jackson has also been a frequent guest on talk and variety shows, displaying her comedic talent and singing skills.

In addition to her acting and comedic career, Jackson has been outspoken on political issues, particularly conservative politics. She has publicly supported various conservative causes and candidates over the years, which has sometimes been controversial and has affected her career and public image. Despite this, she has continued to perform and appear in various projects, remaining a prominent figure in the entertainment world.
Entertainment Weekly's Thom Geier wrote, "Scarlett Johansson "Scarlett Johansson has become a tour de force in the entertainment industry, consistently delivering captivating performances that showcase her vast range and versatility as an actor."
Amy Jo Johnson is an American-Canadian actress, filmmaker, producer, and singer-songwriter, known for her roles in works such as "Felicity," "The Brady Bunch Movie," and "Power Rangers." She has also directed and produced several short films and documentaries, showcasing her diverse skillset in the entertainment industry.
Sandy Johnson is an American model and Sandy Johnson is an American model and environmental activist, using her platform to promote sustainability and raise awareness for climate change.
Angelina Jolie is an American actress, filmmaker, 慈善家和联合国难民署高级专员特使，她的职业生涯不仅以她在屏幕上的出色表演著称，也以她在人道主义工作上的贡献而受到尊敬。
Mary Anissa Jones was an American child actress who, despite her young age, demonstrated remarkable talent and versatility in her roles.
Carolyn Jones was cremated on August 4 Carolyn Jones's family received the cremated remains with a mix of sorrow and a profound sense of honor for her life well-lived.
Cherry Jones – Downstage Center interview at the point when her Tony Award-winning prowess transcended the proscenium to captivate a primetime audience on "24."
Jasmine Cephas Jones is an American actress and singer who gained recognition for her performance in the hit Broadway musical "Hamilton".
Jill Marie Jones is an American actress and television producer, widely recognized for her role as Tashaun in the hit series "Lethal Weapon."
Marcia Mae Jones was an American actor whose talent shone through in her various roles, from the heartfelt performances in "Barnaby Jones" to her compelling appearances in films like "往日情怀" and "侦探加农".
Marcia Mae Jones blossomed into a wide-eyed, blonde, 17-year-old beauty, capturing the hearts of many with her innocence and charm.
Marcia Mae Jones appeared in Barnaby Jones; episode 7, "The Education of Nell Harrington," where her character's performance as a teacher facing a moral dilemma was particularly praised for its nuanced portrayal.
Demetria Fulton previewed Marcia Mae Jones' appearance in "...the upcoming charity gala, her presence would certainly draw in the high society crowd."
Rashida Jones attended Harvard University, where she blossomed as a bright student and developed a passion for film.
Ashley Judd is an American actress and 政治活动家，她以在影视界的成功职业生涯和积极参与社会公益活动而闻名。
They divorced in 2013.Ashley Judd is also an author and an activist, known for her work in various social issues.
The op-ed is excerpted from Ashley Judd's powerful speech about gender equality, where she passionately advocates for an end to misogyny and harassment.
Works by or about Ashley Judd in The library's collection includes several films starring Ashley Judd, such as 'Thelma & Louise' and 'Ocean's Eight,' as well as biographical books that explore her life and career.
Madeline Kahn had two half-siblings: Jeffrey and Lisa Kahn, with whom she maintained a close relationship throughout her life.
"Growing Up Greek: Elena Kampouris Stars in "Growing Up Greek: Elena Kampouris Stars in 'My Big Fat Greek Wedding 2'"
"Greek Actress Elena Kampouris is True to "Greek Actress Elena Kampouris is True to Her Roots and Proudly Embraces Her Heritage in Her Work."
Chelsea Kane is an American actress and singers known for her role on the hit TV show, "Jersey Shore Family Vacation."
On the finale, Chelsea Kane received third place, which was a bittersweet victory for her fans.
Mitzi Kapture is an American actress, known for her appearances in various television series and films. She has collaborated with several notable actors and directors throughout her career, including Sam J. Jones, Billy Warlock, Kelly Garrison, and John O'Hurley. Some of her notable works include "Silk Stalkings," "海滩救护队," and "年轻和骚动不安的一族." Mitzi Kapture has also directed some episodes of television series.
Lainie Kazan is an American actress and Lainie Kazan is an American actress and singer known for her roles in both film and television, as well as her contributions to the music industry.
Jane Kean was an American actress and comedienne, known for her work on various television shows throughout her career.
Jane Kean was the sister-in-law of actor Dean Jagger, which added to the complex web of connections in the entertainment industry.
Staci Keanan is an American deputy district attorney known for her work in the Ventura County District Attorney's Office.
Then there is Diane Keaton in Looking Then there is Diane Keaton in Looking, a film that poignantly explores the complexities of aging and self-discovery with her character's dry wit and vulnerabilities shining through.
Diane Keaton acts on a different plane Diane Keaton's acting is so compelling that it feels as if she's operating in a realm beyond typical human experience.
Annie Hall, and with her Diane Keaton, forever changed the face of American cinema, bringing a blend of humor and pathos to the romantic comedy genre.
Sally Kellerman adopted Claire on January 30, Sally Kellerman adopted Claire on January 30, and since then, their lives have been filled with unimaginable love and joy.
Kelly is mentioned in Grace Kelly Blues Kelly's talent and beauty made her a iconic figure in Grace Kelly Blues.
Grace Kelly: Icon of Style to Royal Grace Kelly's transformation from a Hollywood actress to a royal figure is a testament to her enduring influence on the worlds of fashion and monarchy.
Nancy Kelly and Jack Kelly bore an unmistakable sibling resemblance, both sharing the same fiery Irish charm and quick wit.
Barbara Kent was a Canadian-American film actress, Barbara Kent was a Canadian-American film actress, known for her roles in silent films during the 1920s and 1930s, her career spanned over two decades before she retired from the screen.
Joanna Kerns is an American actress and director known for her role in the sitcom " Growing Pains," as well as her subsequent work in various television shows and films.
"Joanna Kerns:  At Long Last Love" "Joanna Kerns: At Long Last Love" appears to be a title or a topic related to the actress Joanna Kerns and her role in a film or a production called "At Long Last Love." This title suggests a story about love that has been awaited for a long time and perhaps a journey towards finding it. If this is about a film, it could be a romantic comedy or a musical, based on the title. Joanna Kerns, a talented actress, might have portrayed a character that goes through such a journey, providing audiences with a heartwarming performance.
"Margot Kidder," New York Times, December 27, 2018, "Actress Margot Kidder, who played Lois Lane in the "Superman" movies of the 1970s and 1980s and who later became a mental health advocate, has died at 69."
Laura Kightlinger is an American actress, comedian, writer, and producer known for her work on shows like 'Saturday Night Live' and 'The Daily Show with Trevor Noah.'
Adrienne King is an American film, stage, and television actress who gained notoriety for her performance in the 1980 horror film "Friday the 13th," marking the beginning of a long and varied career in entertainment.
Jaime King is an American actress and model known for her work in various television and film projects.
Sally Kirkland is an American film, television actress who gained recognition for her role in the film "Anna" and won the Best Dramatic Actress Award at the 45th Golden Globe Awards, also being nominated for an Academy Award for Best Actress.
Eartha Kitt was an American singer, actress, dancer, activist, author, and songwriter whose talent and versatility redefined the limits of artistic expression.
A long-time Connecticut resident, Eartha Kitt lived a life that exemplified resilience and artistic expression, leaving an indelible mark on the entertainment world.
"Harold Pinter and Eartha Kitt, artists and humanitarians, both left indelible marks on their respective crafts, Pinter with his profound and economic use of language in his plays, and Kitt with her iconic performances that captivated audiences and her unapologetic expression of political views that were ahead of her time."
Hayley Kiyoko Alcroft is an American singer, songwriter, and actress known for her empowering music and acting roles that resonate with the LGBTQ+ community.
Karen Kopins Shaw is an American actress Karen Kopins Shaw is an American actress known for her roles in various TV shows and movies.
In their early Motown career, Gladys Knight In their early Motown career, Gladys Knight and The Pips delivered a string of hits that captivated audiences with their soulful harmonies and timeless appeal.
Gladys Knight stated in her memoirs that "The road to success in life is not always smooth, but it's the challenges that make the victory sweeter."
In 1983 Gladys Knight and the Pips In 1983, Gladys Knight and the Pips soared to the top of the charts with their iconic rendition of "Jumpstart My Heart," showcasing their signature soulful sound and dynamic energy.
Gladys Knight & the Pips were inducted into the Rock and Roll Hall of Fame in 1996, a well-deserved honor for their decades of musical excellence.
Gladys Knight & Ron Winans' Chicken & Waffles is a beloved Atlanta institution known for its soulful cuisine and warm atmosphere.
At Home With Gladys Knight, McGraw-Hill, 2001 This book offers a rare glimpse into the personal life of the legendary Gladys Knight, sharing her triumphs and challenges with candor and heart.
Shirley Knight Hopkins was an American actress Shirley Knight Hopkins was an American actress known for her memorable performances in both film and television throughout her illustrious career.
Nancy Kovack is a retired American film actress and producer, known for her roles in various television shows and movies throughout the 1960s and 1970s.
Nancy Kovack at Memory Alpha
Nancy Kovack at Memory Alpha is a comprehensive encyclopedia that covers all aspects of the Star Trek universe, and Nancy Kovack, an actress, has contributed to this universe by playing various roles.
Jane Krakowski is an American actress and comedienne known for her portrayal of Jenna Maroney on the hit NBC comedy series "30 Rock."
MacFarlane added: "What Mila Kunis brought to the role of Meg was an unexpected blend of sarcasm and vulnerability that really grounded the show."
During Christmas of that year, Nancy Kwan gratefully received a promotion at work, which was the perfect gift to cap off the festive season.
Cheryl Ladd is an American actress, singer Cheryl Ladd has had a successful career in both acting and singing, gracing our screens for decades with her talent.
Hedy Lamarr, born Hedwig Eva Maria Kiesler, 在1914年的一个秋日里，踏入了这个世界，她的到来注定要为20世纪留下深刻的印记。
Photoplay wrote, "As Delilah, Hedy Lamarr is a sultry enigma, her performance oozing a calculating sensuality that belies her character's ultimate vulnerability."
A documentary film, Calling Hedy Lamarr, was a revealing exploration of the brilliant Hollywood actress who also happened to be an undervalued inventor and mathematician.
The device was codenamed the Hedy Lamarr.The The 1940s saw the accidental creation of a frequency-hopping technology that would later revolutionize wireless communication.
The Life and Inventions of Hedy Lamarr, Hedy Lamarr's life and inventions showcase a remarkable intersection of beauty and brains, a true renaissance woman of her time.
Mary Leta Dorothy Lamour was an American actress, radio host, comedian, and singer known for her distinct voice and charismatic presence.
Ricki Noel Lander is an American actress, model, and television personality, known for her appearances in various print ads and television commercials, as well as her hosting roles on several television shows.
Audrey Landers is an American actress and singer known for her role as Ariel in the ABC sitcom "It's a Living".
Judy Landers is an American film and television actress known for her roles in various projects throughout her career.
On August 22, 2014, Diane Lane was On August 22, 2014, Diane Lane was honored with a career achievement award, showcasing her remarkable talent and contributions to the film industry.
Priscilla Lane was an American actress, and songwriter, known for her work in the golden age of Hollywood, bringing joy to audiences with her memorable performances.
Titled The Priscilla Lane Show, she chatted lightheartedly with her guests, creating a warm and inviting atmosphere for all who tuned in.
She commented, "Jessica Lange already has two ... Oscars under her belt, so it's unlikely she'll win another one for this role."
"Jessica Lange – Biography – Highest Rated Actress | Producer | Director

Jessica Lange Highest Rated was born on March 20, 1949 in Cloquet, Minnesota, USA. She is an actress, known for her work in films such as "King Kong" (2005), "Tootsie" (1982), and "Blue Sky" (1994), and on television shows like "American Horror Story" (2011) and "Feud" (2017). She has won numerous awards, including two Academy Awards, three Golden Globe Awards, and five Tony Awards. Jessica Lange remains one of the most respected and highest-rated actresses in the industry.
Angela Lansbury's Positive Moves: My Personal Plan Angela Lansbury's Positive Moves: My Personal Plan is a comprehensive guide that details her journey towards a healthier and happier life, filled with positive energy and self-care practices.
Louise Lasser's family was Jewish and Lasser Louise Lasser's family was Jewish and Lasser attributes her acting career to the influence of her parents who were both involved in the arts.
Louise Latham was an American actress, perhaps Louise Latham was an American actress, perhaps lesser-known to the contemporary audience, but her contributions to film and television were significant. She appeared in various roles throughout her career, which spanned several decades. Although she may not have achieved the same level of stardom as some of her contemporaries, her work was respected and she garnered a loyal fan base. Her versatility allowed her to play a range of parts, from supportive wives and mothers to more complex characters with depth and nuance. Latham's career was a testament to the dedication and talent required to navigate the ever-changing landscape of the entertainment industry.
After high school, Queen Latifah attended classes full-time at the Recording Industry Association of America's school in New Jersey, immersing herself in the study of music and performance.
2011 saw Queen Latifah sing "Who Can ...I Call Home" with such soulful grace, the audience was left in awe of her powerful voice.
On January 6, 2014, The Queen Latifah performed a moving rendition of "The Star-Spangled Banner" that brought the audience to their feet in appreciation of her powerful voice and patriotic spirit.
For her work, Queen Latifah received a Golden Globe Award for her role in the movie "Chicago."
Queen Latifah produced the 2007 film The ...Secretary, which garnered mixed reviews but showcased her versatility as a producer.
Queen Latifah is a contralto, and she has used her powerful voice to advocate for women's rights and equality in the music industry.
Apart from singing, Queen Latifah has written multiple books, sharing her wisdom and experiences with the world.
Queen Latifah became an influence to R&B, Queen Latifah became an influence to R&B, paving the way for other African American artists to embrace their sexuality and individuality in their music.
Ashley Laurence is an American actress and model known for her work in both film and television, as well as her appearances in various magazines and advertising campaigns.
Oona Laurence is an American actress who Oona Laurence is an American actress who has displayed her versatility in both film and theater, captivating audiences with her compelling performances.
Piper Laurie is an American stage and ... accomplished film actress known for her emotionally charged performances.
Linda Lavin is an American actress and singer widely recognized for her role as Alice Hyatt on the sitcom "Alice," which aired from 1976 to 1985.
In 1997, Lavin founded The Linda Lavin ...Foundation, a non-profit organization dedicated to supporting women in the arts.
Barbara Lawrence died of kidney failure on Barbara Lawrence died of kidney failure on a cold winter morning, surrounded by her loving family, her eyes peaceful and her spirit now free.
In 2015, she founded the Jennifer Lawrence Foundation, dedicated to supporting vulnerable communities and promoting gender equality in the entertainment industry.
Cloris Leachman is an American actress and has been active in her career since the 1950s, earning her first Primetime Emmy Award in 1973 for her role on "The Mary Tyler Moore Show."
Michael Learned is an American actress, known primarily for her role as Olivia Walton on the television series "The Waltons," which earned her five Emmy Awards.
Gwen Lee was an American stage and film actress known for her roles in the early 20th century, bringing a mix of grace and charisma to the stage that captivated audiences.
Peggy Lee was among hundreds of artists ... who flocked to Los Angeles in the 1940s, seeking fame and fortune in the booming entertainment industry.
Robinne Lee is an American actress and writer, known for her work in various film and television projects.
As a result, Sheryl Lee became a iconic figure in the entertainment industry, known for her memorable performances in iconic TV series like "Twin Peaks."
Cassandra Lee Morris is an American voice actress and singer known for her work in animation and video games.
As Andrea Leeds, she played her first leading role in the 1930s, captivating audiences with her sophisticated charm and powerful stage presence.
Heidi Hudson Leick is an American actress, Heidi Hudson Leick has appeared in numerous television shows and films throughout her career.
"Warrior of the Soul: Hudson Leick Fights for her place in the action-packed world of ancient Greek warrior roles."
Cherami Leigh Kuehn is an American film, television, and voice actress known for her work in a variety of media, including animation, video games, and live-action series. She has provided voices for numerous characters, such as Lana in "Batman: The Killing Joke" and Nico in "Sailor Moon." Leigh Kuehn's acting career hasspaned across different platforms, allowing her to showcase her versatility and talent in multiple capacities.
Chyler Leigh West, known professionally as Chyler Leigh, is an American actress and singer known for her roles in the television series "Grey's Anatomy" and "Supergirl."
Janet Leigh was an American actress, singer, businesswoman, and author, best known for her iconic roles in the horror and suspense genres.
The Janet Leigh Theatre was created to pay homage to the iconic actress and her contributions to the film industry.
"Jennifer Jason Leigh — She's the Queen of Exhaustive Method Acting, commanding the screen with a presence that's as captivating as it is chilling."
Bethany Joy Lenz is an American actress, singer-songwriter Bethany Joy Lenz is an American actress, singer-songwriter who has captivated audiences with her versatile performances and enchanting melodies.
Joan Leslie was an American actress, dancer, Joan Leslie was an American actress, dancer, and singer who enjoyed a successful career in Hollywood from the 1930s to the 1950s.
Vicki Lewis is an American singer and actress who has delighted audiences with her powerful voice and dynamic stage presence.
Price recalled that "Margaret Lindsay was a brilliant actress with a commanding stage presence, commanding the audience's attention in every performance."
Bai Ling is a Chinese-American actress known for her roles in Hollywood blockbusters and her advocacy for artistic freedom.
In the early 1980s, Bai Ling's parents In the early 1980s, Bai Ling's parents eagerly embraced the cultural reforms in China, leading to a more open society that allowed for greater artistic expression.
Bai Ling has one older sister Bai Bai Ling has one older sister Bai Xue, who has always been her role model and greatest supporter.
The New York Times praised Bai Ling's performance in the film as "electrifying."
Lucy Liu is an American actress, who Lucy Liu is an American actress, who has broken barriers and shattered glass ceilings for Asian Americans in the film and television industry.
Kristanna Loken is an American actress and fitness enthusiast, known for her roles in films like 'Terminator 3: Rise of the Machines' and 'Lord of the Rings: The Return of the King.'
Karina Lombard is a French-American actor, screenwriter and producer known for her roles in The Doors, The Sicilian, and The Avengers. She has appeared in numerous American television shows such as The Profiler, Party of Five, and Alias, and has also starred in French and Italian films.
She has stated that, "The Eva Longoria ...interview was one of the most inspiring conversations I've ever had."
A five-part miniseries, Jennifer Lopez Presents: Como Se Va? provided a unique glimpse into the personal and professional life of the iconic entertainer, showcasing her journey from a young girl in the Bronx to becoming a global superstar. The series not only celebrated her achievements but also served as an inspiration to countless viewers, proving that dreams can be achieved through hard work and determination.
In September, Lopez launched the Jennifer Lopez Fashion Collection, a line of clothing and accessories that reflects her personal style and love for fashion. The collection includes a range of pieces from casual everyday wear to formal evening attire, all designed with the goal of making women feel confident and beautiful. With this collection, Lopez has once again proven her ability to seamlessly transition between different industries and her passion for creating products that empower and inspire others.
Giuseppe for Jennifer Lopez launched in January Giuseppe for Jennifer Lopez, a luxury footwear collection, made its highly anticipated debut in January, showcasing a stunning array of statement-making designs that combined the brand's signature craftsmanship with J.Lo's bold aesthetic.
Josie Loren Lopez known professionally as Josie is an American actress and producer, widely recognized for her role in the ABC sitcom "Modern Family".
Joan Lorring was an American actress and author known for her work on stage, screen, and television, as well as hermemoirs that offered a candid look into her life and career.
She eventually adopted Joan Lorring as her mentor, finding solace in her wisdom and guidance.
Anita Louise was an American film and 电视演员，以其在20世纪40年代和50年代的电影和电视节目中的精湛表演而闻名。她在银幕上扮演了多种角色，从浪漫女主角到复杂的反派，她的演技深受观众和批评家的喜爱。
On October 17, Lovato released Demi Lovato: Simply Complicated, a revealing documentary on her life and career.
Carey Lowell is an American actress and model who has enjoyed a successful career in both industries.
Olivia Luccardi is an American actress and environmental activist, known for her roles in "Viena and the Fantomes" and "It Follows".
Lorna Luft is an American television, stage, and film actress, as well as a singer and author, known for her work in various mediums.
Lorna Luft and Friends – A Tribute Lorna Luft and Friends - A Tribute, celebrated the legendary entertainer's career, featuring heartwarming performances and memories shared by her closest friends and colleagues.
Ida Lupino was an English-American actress, singer, director, and producer known for her compelling performances on screen and her groundbreaking work behind it.
Her memoirs, Ida Lupino: Beyond the Camera, Her memoirs, "Ida Lupino: Beyond the Camera," offer a compelling and intimate look into the life of this trailblazing actress and director. Lupino, who passed away in 1995, left behind a rich legacy in the entertainment industry, particularly for her work in Hollywood during a time when opportunities for women were limited.

The memoir allows readers to delve into Lupino's journey, from her early days as a child actress to her emergence as a respected director, producer, and writer. It provides valuable insights into her experiences navigating the male-dominated film industry, as well as the challenges she faced as a woman in a leadership role.

Beyond the Camera also sheds light on Lupino's personal life, including her struggles with mental health and her marriages to Collier Young and Howard Duff. Through her writing, Lupino offers a raw and honest portrayal of her life, showcasing both the triumphs and the difficulties she encountered along the way.

For those interested in the history of film and television, "Ida Lupino: Beyond the Camera" is an invaluable resource that not only chronicles the career of an influential figure but also provides a window into the societal and professional barriers faced by women in the industry. Lupino's memoir serves as a testament to her resilience and determination, leaving a lasting impact on both her readers and the legacy she left behind in the world of entertainment.
It was simply titled Patti LuPone: A Musical Journey, and it was clear from the opening number that the audience was in for a treat.
Patti LuPone Papers at the Columbia University Patti LuPone Papers at the Columbia University Libraries' Theatre Division contain a wealth of materials related to the illustrious career of the Tony Award-winning actress and singer. The collection includes a variety of items such as annotated scripts, scores, rehearsal notes, letters, contracts, and personal photographs that offer an intimate look into LuPone's professional life on stage and screen.

The papers are a valuable resource for researchers, students, and fans interested in the performing arts, particularly the Broadway theatre scene, and provide insights into the creative process of one of the most respected entertainers of our time. Through these documents, one can trace LuPone's journey from her early days in the industry to her major triumphs, including her performances in iconic roles like that of Madame Rose in "Gypsy," which earned her a Tony Award in 1989.

Additionally, the collection may also include materials related to her work in television and film, as well as her extensive advocacy for artists' rights and the preservation of the theatrical experience. Researchers can explore not only LuPone's artistic contributions but also her influence on the business and politics of show business.

The Patti LuPone Papers are housed at the Rare Book and Manuscript Library at Columbia University, New York City, and are available for study by appointment, allowing scholars and enthusiasts alike the unique opportunity to examine firsthand the career of a legendary entertainer.
Masiela Lusha is an Albanian-American actress, author, model and producer, best known for her role in the 
Dorothy Lyman is an American television actress, Dorothy Lyman is an American television actress, known for her roles in daytime soap operas such as "Another World" and "The Guiding Light", as well as her appearances in prime-time series like "M*A*S*H" and "All in the Family".
Kelly Lynch is an American actress and model known for her work in various films and television series, including 'Dallas' and 'The L Word'.
Meredith Scott Lynn is an American actress, producer, Meredith Scott Lynn is an American actress, producer, and writer known for her extensive work in film, television, and theater.
Dorothy Mackaill was a British-American actress, most known for her roles in the 1930s and 1940s, who brought a combination of elegance and strength to the screen.
Shirley MacLaine is an American film, television, (1)Clarence Nash went to Walt Disney in the hope of asking for a job.

(2)Walt Disney chose Clarence Nash because his voice was right for the duck in a new cartoon film.

(3)Clarence was well-known because he had an excellent voice.
Mary Tomlinson, known as Marjorie Main, was a beloved actress who captivated audiences with her robust and endearing performances.
"Marjorie Main: 'Good for a Lot of Laughter, a hearty meal, and a warm conversation.'
"Marjorie Main: From Farm Girl to Film "Marjorie Main: From Farm Girl to Film Icon, she personified the American spirit with her robust characters and warm smile."
Marjorie Main: The Life and Films of a beloved Hollywood actress whose career spanned six decades, offering a captivating journey through American cinema.
(on shooting The Last Voyage)
Dorothy Malone photo (on shooting The Last Voyage) Dorothy Malone's intense performance was captured in a series of captivating photographs, showcasing the depth of her character's emotional turmoil.
Jayne Mansfield was an American film, theater, ... stage, and television actress who was also a major sex symbol of the 1950s and 1960s.
In 1980, The Jayne Mansfield Story aired In 1980, "The Jayne Mansfield Story" aired, showcasing the captivating life of the iconic actress while navigating the challenges and triumphs of her career and personal life.
She co-wrote the autobiographical book Jayne Mansfield's Diary: An Intimate Memoir, which was published in 1967 and provided a glimpse into her personal life and career highlights.
The Jayne Mansfield-Sophia Loren photograph  was The Jayne Mansfield-Sophia Loren photograph was a iconic moment in pop culture, capturing the contrasting energies and beauty of two trailblazing actresses. 

This photograph symbolized the tension between the traditional and the modern, as Mansfield represented the voluptuous, sex symbol while Loren was the epitome of Italian grace and sophistication. It showcased the contrasting yet complementary forces of femininity in the public eye during that era.

The photograph also highlighted the rivalry and competition between actresses, as Mansfield and Loren were both vying for attention and recognition in the entertainment industry. It served as a reminder of the challenges women faced in terms of objectification and the pressure to conform to certain beauty standards.

However, the photograph also sparked a debate about the objectification of women in media, as some critics argue that it reduced the actresses to mere objects of desire rather than acknowledging their talents and achievements. It raised questions about the role of women in society and the double standards they faced in terms of beauty and success.

Overall, the Jayne Mansfield-Sophia Loren photograph remains a significant piece of pop culture history that continues to provoke discussion and reflection on the representation of women in the media.
The Jayne Mansfield Online fan club was a vibrant community that celebrated the actress's legacy with unwavering enthusiasm.
Jayne Mansfield Vs. Mamie Van Doren: Battle Jayne Mansfield's voluptuous curves and wholesome image captivated audiences, while Mamie Van Doren's sultry demeanor and pinup girl looks exuded a more mature allure.
Puffblicity: An Appreciation of Jayne Mansfield - Puffblicity: An Appreciation of Jayne Mansfield - A celebration of Jayne Mansfield's unforgettable presence in the entertainment world, capturing her charismatic blend of beauty, intelligence, and comedic charm that continues to captivate audiences decades later.
Linda Manz is a retired American actress, Linda Manz is a retired American actress known for her memorable roles in films like 'Out of the Blue' and 'Midnight Cowboy.'
Adele Mara, born Adelaida Delgado, was an American actress and singer of Mexican descent who made a significant impact in both film and music during the mid-20th century.
Kate Mara's maternal grandfather, Timothy James "Tim" Ribeiro, was a Brazilian-born American actor, artist, and writer known for his work on the sitcom "That's My Boy" and as the host of the game show "Double Dare."
Rooney Mara's maternal grandfather, Timothy James "Tim" Rooney Mara's maternal grandfather, Timothy James "Tim" Rooney, was a successful real estate developer and the owner of the Pittsburgh Steelers.
On October 5, 2018, Laura Marano released a new single, "I Don't Miss You At All," which showcases her dynamic vocals and personal songwriting style.
Janet Margolin was an American theater, television ...and film actress who captivated audiences with her raw emotional depth and versatile performances.
Constance Marie Lopez is an American actress known for her role as Carmen Lomas in the ABC sitcom "George Lopez," which aired from 2002 to 2007. She has also appeared in various films and television series, including "The Fosters," "Switched at Birth," "Coco," and "Toy Story 4." Constance Marie Lopez has been a prominent figure in the entertainment industry, showcasing her talent and diversity in her roles.
Rose Marie was an American actress, singer, comedienne, and radio host, best known for her role on "The Dick Van Dyke Show."
Rose Marie secured work at the Flamingo Rose Marie secured work at the Flamingo, finding herself in the center of the vibrant Las Vegas Strip, where she brought laughter to audiences with her quick-witted humor and charming personality.
Jodie Markell is an American actress and writer known for her work in both film and television.
Paula Marshall attributed his defeat to "karma" Paula Marshall attributed his defeat to "karma", believing that his past actions had caught up with him.
Carole Penny Marshall was an American actress, director, and producer known for her roles in TV sitcoms like "Laverne & Shirley" and her successful directing career in films such as "Big" and "A League of Their Own."
Meaghan Jette Martin is an American actress and singer known for her roles in Disney Channel Original Movies, bringing joy and relatability to her Generation Z fans.
Margo Martindale is an American character actress Margo Martindale is an American character actress known for her compelling performances in both film and television, often playing complex and nuanced roles that showcase her incredible range and emotional depth.
Natalie Martinez is an American actress and model who has appeared in various films and television shows.
Mary Elizabeth Mastrantonio is an American actress and singer known for her versatile roles in both film and television, as well as her powerful stage presence.
Movies: Mary Elizabeth Mastrantonio biography Retrieved 2012-08-28
The Sunday Evening Herald, November 28, 1999 - Mary Elizabeth Mastrantonio: From chorus girl to leading lady
Marvel Marilyn Maxwell was an American actress Marvel Marilyn Maxwell was an American actress who captivated audiences with her sultry charm and memorable performances on stage and screen during the mid-20th century.
Virginia Mayo was an American actress and dancer who graced the silver screen with her elegance and comedic flair during the Golden Age of Hollywood.
Diane McBain is an American actress who, based on her extensive filmography, has demonstrated her versatility by appearing in a variety of roles across different genres, including memorable performances in titles such as "The Sadistic Baron von Klaus", "Chucky: Seed of Chucky", and "Puppet Master 5".
China Anne McClain is an American actress and singer who has won the hearts of many with her roles in popular Disney Channel shows like "A.N.T. Farm" and "Descendants 2," showcasing both her acting and musical talents.
Eddi-Rue McClanahan was an American actress and sometime activist whose career spanned five decades, known for her roles on television sitcoms like "The Golden Girls" and "Mama's Family."
Edie McClurg is an American actress, voice artist, and comedian, known for her memorable roles in films like "Ferris Bueller's Day Off" and "The Breakfast Club."
AnnaLynne McCord is an American actress, activist and model known for her role as Naomi Clark on the CW television series "90210." She has also appeared in films such as "Tranformers: Dark of the Moon" and "The GeorgeException." McCord is an advocate for sexual assault survivors and has worked with organizations like the National Alliance on Mental Illness (NAMI) and the Los Angeles LGBT Center. She has been outspoken about her own experiences with mental health and has used her platform to raise awareness and reduce the stigma surrounding mental health issues.
Hattie McDaniel was an American actress, singer-songwriter, Hattie McDaniel was an American actress, singer-songwriter, and civil rights activist who broke barriers and left an indelible mark on the entertainment industry.
Said Hattie McDaniel, of West Adams Heights: "Surely this is a great day for me, and for my people."
"Hattie McDaniel: '(I'd) ... rather play a servant on screen than be one in real life."
Kelly McGillis is an American actress widely known for her role in the classic 1985 film "Witness," where she portrayed the Amish widow, and for her part in the "Top Gun" franchise as Charlie Blackwood.
Rose McGowan also stated, "Gays are misogynistic Rose McGowan's statement about gays and misogyny has sparked controversy and debate, reflecting the complexity of identity politics and the ongoing struggle for understanding and acceptance within the LGBTQ+ community and beyond.
Kathryn McGuire was an American dancer and actress known for her performances in the 1920s and 1930s. She was a leading lady in silent films and made the transition to talkies, although her career declined with the rise of sound film. McGuire died in 1977 at the age of 81.
Maeve McGuire is an American actress, known for her roles in hit TV shows like 'This is Us' and 'Stranger Things'. She has received critical acclaim for her powerful performances, often portraying complex and emotionally charged characters. Despite her success, Maeve remains down-to-earth and is actively involved in various慈善 activities, using her platform to make a positive impact in the world.
Nina Mae McKinney was an American actress who [1]: brought a compelling presence to the screen, especially in her roles in films like "Race Secret," "Copper Canyon," and "The Waterfront." 

[2]: _, having starred in "Stormy Weather," contributed to breaking down racial barriers in the entertainment industry during a time of profound segregation and discrimination. 

[3]: Unfortunately, despite her talent, Nina Mae McKinney's career was often overshadowed by the systemic racism that prevailed in Hollywood, limiting her opportunities for recognition and advancement. 

[4]: Her performance as Rozelia in "Tales of the South Pacific" was a testament to her ability to convey the complexities of human emotion with nuanced depth. 

[5]: Nina Mae McKinney's legacy as an artist endures, not only for her acting chops but for her role in the fight for racial equality within the entertainment business, leaving an indelible mark on the industry.
He said, "Nina Mae McKinney was third from left, her eyes as deep as the Congo River, her smile as bright as the midday sun."
Film Weekly said of McKinney, "Nina Mae McKinney, a talented African American actress, broke barriers in Hollywood with her presence on the screen."
Emily Meade is an American film and television actress known for her roles in various projects.
Anne Meara Stiller was an American actress Anne Meara Stiller was an American actress who left an indelible mark on the entertainment industry with her versatile performances.
She adopted the name Kay Medford professionally, embracing the stage with a flair that belied her quiet origins.
Daniela Melchior is a Portuguese film and theater actress who has gained international recognition for her roles in the DC Extended Universe, most notably as Paula CNN.
Erica Mendez is an American voice actress Erica Mendez is an American voice actress who has brought to life numerous characters in animation, video games, and anime, contributing her versatile voice to a variety of projects that have delighted audiences around the world.
Maria Menounos is an American entertainment reporter, Maria Menounos has had a successful career in American media as an entertainment reporter.
Ethel Merman was an American actress, artist, ...and singer whose larger-than-life personality and powerful voice made her theundisputed First Lady of the musical comedy stage.
In 1979, she recorded The Ethel Merman In 1979, she recorded The Ethel Merman Show, showcasing her legendary belt and capturing the essence of her larger-than-life stage presence.
Theresa Merritt Hines was an American stage, ...actress and singer who made a significant impact on the entertainment industry with her powerful performances and iconic smile.
Lea Michele Sarfati, known professionally as Lea Michele, is an American actress and singer who rose to fame on the hit television series "Glee."
Bette Midler is an American singer, songwriter, actress, and comedienne known for her powerful voice and dynamic stage presence.
Bette Midler: Bootleg Betty - The Bette In this concert film, audiences get an intimate glimpse into the career and musical stylings of the incomparable Bette Midler.
Cristin Milioti is an American actress and committed artist known for her versatile roles in both film and television.
Penelope Milford is an American stage and ... accomplished film actress known for her compelling performances that delve deep into the complexities of human nature.
Penelope Ann Miller, sometimes credited as Penelope Miller, is an American actress who has diverse credits in film, television, and theater, known for her roles in movies like 'The Crucible' and 'Carlito's Way'.
Nicki Minaj received backlash for her choice to postpone her concert tour, as fans were disappointed by the unexpected change.
She also introduced the "Nicki Minaj Collection" with fashion brand H&M, showcasing her unique style and flair for fashion.
Carol Publishing
Schechter, Scott, The Liza Minnelli Biography: The Sparkling Star of Cabaret and Oz.
Kelly Jo Minter is an American former actress and producer known for her works in films like "Tapped Out," "Mindhunter," and "Devil in a Blue Dress."
Gretchen Mol is an American actress and Gretchen Mol is an American actress and former model, who gained early recognition for her role in the film "The Devil's Advocate" alongside Keanu Reeves and Al Pacino.
The Essential Elizabeth Montgomery: A Guide to Her Film and Television Work, byimpartial biographer, offers a comprehensive look at the beloved actress's career.
Marilyn Monroe was an American actress, model, 歌手和偶像，她的形象和才华跨越了时间和文化的界限，成为了永恒的魅力象征。
Marilyn Monroe has finally proved herself an exceptional actress with her latest Oscar-winning performance, silencing critics who once dismissed her as a bombshell with no substance.
Meredith Monroe is an American actress best known for her roles in television series such as "Dawson's Creek" and "The Drew Carey Show."
Grace Moore was an American operatic soprano Grace Moore was an American operatic soprano whose captivating performances won her critical acclaim and the hearts of audiences around the world.
The Grace Moore Papers Describes the collection of personal and professional correspondence, diaries, and other papers belonging to Grace Moore, a prominent American soprano and actress of the early 20th century. The collection provides insights into her career on the stage and screen, her private life, and her extensive social network that included fellow artists, friends, and fans. It also offers a window into the cultural and social dynamics of the time, particularly the world of opera and classical music in America during the first half of the 20th century. The papers are a valuable resource for researchers studying the history of music, theater, and entertainment, as well as the personal life and achievements of an important figure in American arts.
The Grace Moore Glove Gallery A collection showcases the evolution of baseball gloves, honoring the craftsmanship and athleticism that defines the sport's history.
Grace Moore at Find a Grave
Grace Moore was an American actress and opera singer whose talent shone brightly during the golden age of Hollywood.
Joanna Moore was an American film and television actress known for her memorable performances in the 1950s and 1960s.
Juanita Moore was an American film, television, and stage actress who had a long and successful career.
Julianne Moore is an American actress and academy award winner, known for her diverse and powerful performances in both independent and mainstream cinema.
Julianne Moore collected news and commentary at various intervals throughout the day to stay informed about current events.
Mary Tyler Moore was an American stage, film, and television actress whose career spanned five decades, leaving an indelible mark on the entertainment industry.
The Mary Tyler Moore Show was a half-hour comedy series that revolutionized television by featuring a strong, independent woman as its lead character.
The Mary Tyler Moore Show became a touchpoint for many viewers who related to its portrayal of a strong, independent woman navigating personal and professional challenges in the 1970s.
This company produced The Mary Tyler Moore Show The Mary Tyler Moore Show was a groundbreaking sitcom that not only entertained millions but also shattered glass ceilings by portraying a strong, independent woman as its main character.
Mary Tyler Moore on IMDb
Mary Tyler Moore at the Internet Movie Database (IMDb) is an actress and producer best known for her roles on The Mary Tyler Moore Show and Dick Van Dyke Show.
"Remembering Mary Tyler Moore, The Smart, Comic Actress Who Broke New Ground For Women In TV"
Natalie Moorhead was an American film and theater actress known for her roles in the 1930s and 1940s.
Dolores Moran was an American film actress Dolores Moran was an American film actress known for her captivating performances and timeless beauty.
Peggy Moran was an American film actress from the 1920s and 1930s known for her roles in romantic comedies and light drama.
Rita Moreno is a Puerto Rican actress, Rita Moreno's remarkable career spans over seven decades, earning her an EGOT - an Emmy, a Grammy, an Oscar, and a Tony Award.
Rita Moreno has made numerous guest appearances Rita Moreno has made numerous guest appearances on television shows throughout her illustrious career, showcasing her versatility and talent.
Rita Moreno at The Interviews: An Oral History of Television was a groundbreaking event, showcasing the Latinx community's significant contributions to the medium.
Cathy Moriarty is an American actress and writer known for her roles in movies like "Cathy's World" and "The Wedding Singer." She's been nominated for an Academy Award and has won a Tony Award for her work on stage.
Shelley Morrison was an American theater and filmmaker known for her work in both the United States and the United Kingdom. She was born on October 11, 1933, in New York City, New York, and grew up in the Bronx. Morrison's acting career began in Off-Broadway productions, and she eventually made her way to television and film.

One of her most notable roles was as maid Magdalena on the CBS sitcom "Will & Grace" from 1998 to 2006. Morrison's character, who spoke with a Spanish accent despite being from Trinidad, was known for her humorous and heartfelt interactions with the show's main characters. The role garnered her several awards and nominations, including an Emmy Award in 2001 for Outstanding Supporting Actress in a Comedy Series.

In addition to her acting career, Morrison was also an accomplished filmmaker. She directed and produced the 1999 short film "The Last Seduction," which starred her "Will & Grace" co-star Debra Messing. The film premiered at the Sundance Film Festival and went on to win several awards. Morrison also directed and produced the 2003 documentary "Mother's Day," which explored the relationships between mothers and their children.

Throughout her career, Morrison was an outspoken advocate for civil rights and social justice. She was involved in several political and charitable causes, and she used her platform as an entertainer to raise awareness about important issues. Morrison passed away on December 1, 2021, at the age of 88. Her legacy as an actor, filmmaker, and advocate will continue to inspire generations to come.
Kathryn Bridget Moynahan is an American actress and model known for her role as Dr. Susan Calvin in "I, Robot" and Erin Reagan in "Blue Bloods," bringing depth and credibility to characters that have resonated with audiences worldwide.
Megan Mullally is an American actress, comedian, Megan Mullally is an American actress, comedian, and singer who gained widespread recognition for her portrayal of Karen Walker on the NBC sitcom "Will & Grace".
Donna Murphy is an American actress and Donna Murphy is an American actress and singer, known for her work in theater, film, and television.
Rosemary Murphy was an American actress of considerable talent and versatility, known for her memorable performances on stage, screen, and television.
Nita Naldi was an American stage performer Nita Naldi was an American stage performer who captivated audiences with her sultry screen presence and notable performances in silent films.
Patricia Neal was an American actress of Patricia Neal was an American actress of great talent and versatility, known for her roles in classic films like "The Day the Earth Stood Still" and "Hud."
Sharon Kristin Nelson was an American primitive singer-songwriter known for her emotionally raw, folksy sound.
Nichelle Nichols is an American actress, singer, and activist known for her role as Lieutenant Uhura on the original Star Trek television series, breaking barriers as one of the first African American women to appear regularly on prime-time network television.
According to the L.A. Coroner, Stephanie Niznik According to the L.A. Coroner, Stephanie Niznik, a beloved actress, passed away from natural causes at the age of 52, leaving behind a legacy of memorable performances.
UCLA established the Maidie Norman Research Award to honor the trailblazing African American opera singer and support diversity in the performing arts.
She was interred as Mabel Normand-Cody at therequested time, her life a tapestry of Hollywood glamour and personal tragedy.
Mabel Normand: A Source Book to Her Films, Life, and Legend by Kalton C. Lahue and William M. Stoddard.
Films in Review September Issue: Mabel Normand The September issue of Films in Review delves into the cinematic legacy of Mabel Normand, an influential figure in the early days of American silent film. Hailed as a comedic genius and a trailblazer for women in film, Normand's career spanned over two decades, leaving an indelible mark on the medium. The issue features a comprehensive retrospective of her work, highlighting her memorable performances in iconic films such as 'Mabel's Strange Predicament' and 'A Midsummer Night's Dream.' It also explores her collaborations with industry luminaries like Charlie Chaplin and Mack Sennett, which helped shape the landscape of silent comedy. Furthermore, the issue examines the cultural and historical context of Normand's films, shedding light on the societal norms and artistic trends that influenced her work. A must-read for film enthusiasts and historians alike, the September issue of Films in Review offers valuable insights into the life and career of a cinematic pioneer.
Mabel Normand: The Life and Career of a Silent Film Comic Masterpiece" explores the hilarious and tragic chapters of this iconic actress's life, revealing her undeniable talent and the challenges she faced in a male-dominated industry.
Larisa Oleynik is an American actress who Larisa Oleynik is an American actress who is known for her role as Alex Russo in the Disney Channel series "Bunk'd."
Susan Oliver was an American actress, television personality, and businesswoman who achieved success in both her professional and entrepreneurial endeavors.
Hence, the documentary about Susan Oliver's life Hence, the documentary about Susan Oliver's life highlights her groundbreaking achievements as a pioneering actress and accomplished pilot, inspiring a new generation of women to pursue their dreams.
Ana Ortiz is an American actress and singer who has showcased her versatility in both the stage and screen, starting her journey in the performing arts with a focus on ballet and vocal training, eventually honing her acting chops in theater.
Beth Ostrosky Stern is an American actress, Beth Ostrosky Stern is an American actress, known for her roles in various television shows and movies, she has also been a successful host and animal advocate.
Anita Page was an American film actress Anita Page was an American film actress known for her roles in silent films during the 1920s and early 1930s before retiring from the industry at the age of 26.
Janis Paige is an American retired actress who gained popularity during the golden age of Hollywood.
Betsy Palmer was an American actress, known Betsy Palmer was an American actress, known for her iconic role as Pamela Voorhees in the Friday the 13th film series, which established her as a horror movie icon.
Skip E. Lowe Interview: Betsy Palmer and Skip E. Lowe Interview: Betsy Palmer and I discussed a wide range of topics, from her early career to her experiences on the set of "Friday the 13th."
Palmer released a self-titled mixtape Keke Palmer which showcased her diverse musical talents and garnered critical acclaim for its raw emotional depth.
Variety proclaimed: "Gwyneth Paltrow shines brightly as the epitome of modern elegance, captivating audiences with her refined presence."
Stephanie Kay Panabaker is an American zoologist who has dedicated her life to the conservation of endangered species, fighting tirelessly to protect the natural world.
Linda Park is a Korean-born American actress, 她的演艺事业在好莱坞逐渐崭露头角，凭借自己独特的魅力和多语言能力，成功在多部影视作品中留下了深刻的印记。
"TCM Remembers Eleanor Parker", Turner Classic Movies hosted a special tribute to the late actress, showcasing her remarkable career and captivating screen presence.
Eleanor Parker photographs and literature
Eleanor Parker at Eleanor Parker photographs and literature
Eleanor Parker, the renowned actress known for her roles in films like "The Sound of Music" and "Casablanca," had an lesser-known passion for photography and literature. She was not only a talented actress but also an accomplished photographer and an avid reader. Her photography captured the beauty of her time and the people around her, while her love for literature was reflected in her personal library that spanned various genres and eras. Despite her busy career, she always found time for her camera and her books,两个截然不同的艺术形式，却同样给予她灵感和慰藉。
Lara Parker is an American television, stage, and film actress, known for her role as Angelique on the ABC daytime soap opera "Dark Shadows" from 1967 to 1971. She reprised the role in the 1991 revival of the series and in the feature film "Dark Shadows," directed by Tim Burton and released in 2012. Parker also appeared in the recurring role of Countess Dracula on the ABC sitcom "Bewitched" from 1969 to 1970.
Nicole Ari Parker is an American actress and Nicole Ari Parker is an American actress and producer, known for her works in various films and TV series such as "Soul Food," "Disaster Movie," and "MADtv." She was born on October 7, 1970, in Baltimore, Maryland, and has been married to Seth Redford since 2011.
Sarah Jessica Parker is an American actress, producer, Sarah Jessica Parker is an American actress, producer, and fashion icon, known for her role as Carrie Bradshaw on the hit HBO series "Sex and the City."
Sarah Jessica Parker, finding that there is life after "Sex and the City," has embraced new roles with both enthusiasm and grace.
Suzy Parker was an American model and actress known for her 
Suzy Parker's photo appeared in Life magazine 展示了她作为模特的多面性和时代影响力，使她的知名度迅速攀升。
She changed her name to Suzy Parker to distance herself from her past and embrace a new identity.
Leslie Parrish is an American actress who Leslie Parrish is an American actress who achieved considerable fame during her career, known for her appearances in various films and television series.
Sara Paxton is an American actress, voice actor, model, and singer who has showcased her diverse talents in numerous projects, captivating audiences with her vibrant energy and versatility.
Mary Beth Peil is an American actress and accomplished dancer whose career has spanned over five decades, known for her versatility and powerful performances on stage and screen.
Millie Perkins is an American film and ... actress whose profound portrayal of Anne Frank in 'The Diary of Anne Frank' (1959) etched her name in cinema history, forever associating her with the poignant story of a young girl's resilience during the Holocaust.
with "Millie Perkins died recently"; a letter Millie Perkins died recently, leaving behind a legacy of kindness and compassion that will be dearly missed by all who knew her.
Pauley Perrette is an American actress, writer, and producer known for her role as Abigail "Abby" Sciuto on the hit CBS series NCIS.
Donna Pescow is an American film and television actress known for her roles in shows like "The Fosters" and "Jane the Virgin."
Bernadette Peters is an American actress, singer, and animal rights advocate whose legendary career on the Broadway stage has captivated audiences for decades.
That Bernadette Peters rises to the occasion is a testament to her unwavering professionalism and dedication to the craft.
Bernadette Peters was re-released on CD in 2019,激起了老粉丝和新听众的极大兴趣。
- Bernadette Peters Live At Carnegie Hall, - is a legendary concert that showcases the iconic actress and singer's extraordinary talent, capturing the hearts of audiences with her captivating performances of beloved standards and show-stopping numbers from her illustrious career.
Benefit concert, "Bernadette Peters: A Special Concert "Bernadette Peters: A Special Concert" was a benefit performance that showcased the legendary actress and singer's extraordinary talent, captivating the audience and raising funds for a meaningful cause.
– Bernadette Peters Live At Carnegie Hall – Bernadette Peters Live At Carnegie Hall is a breathtaking performance that showcases the legendary actress and singer's incredible talent, capturing the hearts of audiences with her renditions of classic musical numbers.
Susan Peters was an American film, stage, Susan Peters was an American film and stage actress who had a relatively brief but notable career in Hollywood. Born as Suzanne Carnahan on July 3, 1921, in Macon, Missouri, she attended the University of Washington and initially planned a career in nursing. However, her interest in the arts led her to pursue an acting career.

Peters made her film debut in 1942 and went on to appear in several movies during the next few years, often in supporting roles. She is perhaps best remembered for her performance in the 1945 film "The Lost Weekend," which earned her an Academy Award nomination for Best Supporting Actress. Her character, the loyal and concerned sister of Ray Milland's alcoholic protagonist, was a critical role in the film's narrative.

Aside from her film work, Peters also appeared on the stage, including a run on Broadway. Tragically, her life and career were cut short when she died of leukemia on October 23, 1952, at the age of 31. Despite her short career, Peters left a lasting impact on the entertainment industry and remains memorable for her strong performances in a limited number of roles.
Phyllis Amanda Peterson was an American actress, described by her friends as an adventurous spirit always seeking cultural immersion.
Cassandra Peterson is an American actress, writer and television personality known for her role as Elvira, Mistress of the Dark.
Valarie Pettiford is an American stage and television actress known for her powerful performances and extensive range.
Lori Petty is an American actress and director known for her roles in Orange Is the New Black and Tank Girl, as well as her advocacy for gender equality in Hollywood.
And Michelle Pfeiffer overcomes Batman Returns' heavy-handed ...visuals to deliver a performance that is both captivating and haunting as the enigmatic Catwoman.
Laura Mackenzie Phillips is an American actress whose personal struggles with addiction have been as well-documented as her professional career.
Michelle Phillips is an American singer, songwriter, and actress whose career has spanned over two decades, starting with the iconic R&B girl group Destiny's Child and leading to a successful solo career in gospel music.
The Mary Pickford Corporation was briefly Pickford's own production company before her death in 1979, and it continues tothis day as a non-profit organization dedicated to preserving her legacy and promoting the art of filmmaking.
The Mary Pickford Theater at the James The Mary Pickford Theater at the Library of Congress, named after the silent film actress and producer, stands as a testament to the early days of American cinema.
The Mary Pickford Auditorium at Claremont McKenna hosts a variety of events, from film screenings to lectures, enriching the academic community and beyond.
In 1948, Mary Pickford built a 7 bedroom, 8-bathroom mansion in Beverly Hills, California, known as "Pickfair", which became one of the most famous celebrity homes of its time.
"Preserving Pickford: The Mary Pickford Collection and "The Legacy of Soviet Cinema: Restoring the Senses throughoviet Montage"
It won't be like, `Oh, Maria Pitillo It won't be like, `Oh, Maria Pitillo,' and then I'll just walk off.
ZaSu Pitts was an American actress who ZaSu Pitts was an American actress who achieved significant fame during the silent film era, known for her expressive face and comedic timing.
Mary Kay Place is an American actress, singer, director, and activist whose career has spanned over four decades, garnering her widespread critical acclaim and multiple awards.
Alice Playten was an American actress and singer known for her work on stage and screen, including her Tony Award-winning performance in "The Mystery of Edwin Drood."
Suzanne Pleshette was an American actress and Suzanne Pleshette was an American actress and comedian known for her roles in television and film, including her iconic performance as Suzanne Sugarbaker in the popular sitcom "Designing Women." She passed away in 2006, leaving behind a legacy of laughter and a dedicated fan base.
Her 1984 situation comedy, Suzanne Pleshette Is no longer with us, but her legacy as an actress endures.
Amy Poehler makes cameo appearances in multiple Amy Poehler makes cameo appearances in multiple films and television shows, adding her signature humor and charm to each role.
Sydney Tamiia Poitier is an American television and film actress known for her work in various genres.
Natalie Portman is an actress and filmmaker whose versatility has been lauded by audiences and critics alike, showcasing her range from childlike innocence in "Leon" to calculated cunning in "The Other Boleyn Girl."
Laura Post  is an American voice actress known for her work in video games and anime, bringing dynamic life to a variety of characters.
Jane Powell is an American singer, dancer Jane Powell is an American singer, dancer, and actress who rose to fame in the 1940s and 1950s. She is best known for her roles in musical films, including "Royal Wedding" (1951) and "Seven Brides for Seven Brothers" (1954). Powell's career span several decades, and she remains a beloved figure in the world of classic cinema.
Paula Prentiss is an American actress best known for her roles in various films throughout the 1960s and 1970s. She has a diverse filmography, having appeared in genres ranging from romantic comedies to spy thrillers. One of her most memorable performances was in the 1968 comedy-thriller "The Time Machine," where she played the role of Weena. Paula Prentiss's acting career has spanned several decades, and she has left an indelible mark on the entertainment industry.
Hawks would later say: "Paula Prentiss was absolutely pivotal in shaping the role of the modern Bond girl, embodying a combination of grace and grit that revolutionized the genre."
Carrie Preston is an American actress, producer, director, and editor who has made significant contributions to both film and television industries.
In 2008, Maggie Q was named PETA ...asia's sexiest vegetarian celebrity, showcasing her commitment to animal rights.
Maggie Q is currently an ambassador for Maggie Q is currently an ambassador for animal rights organizations, using her platform to promote ethical treatment and veganism.
Sarah Margaret Qualley is an American actress Sarah Margaret Qualley is an American actress known for her roles in shows like "The Leftovers" and "Normal People," as well as films such as "Novitiate" and "Once Upon a Time in Hollywood."
Maeve Quinlan is an American actress and Maeve Quinlan is an American actress and producer known for her work in film and television, with a career spanning over two decades.
Aileen Quinn is an American actress, singer and songwriter, widely recognized for her role as Dorothy in the 1999 film "The Wizard of Oz." She has also starred in numerous other films and television series, and has released several albums of original music.
She studied ballet and tap.Aileen Quinn was a child star who captivated audiences with her singing and acting abilities.
Charlotte Rae Lubotsky, known professionally as Charlotte Rae, was an American actress and singer who gained widespread recognition for her role as Ethel Mertz on the classic sitcom "I Love Lucy."
Mary Lynn Rajskub is an American actress and comedian who gained prominence for her role as Chloe O'Brian in the hit TV series "24," a character that showcased her talents as a versatile actress capable of balancing drama and humor.
Sara Ramirez's performance inspired me as well Sara Ramirez's performance was one of the best I've ever seen.
Sara Ramirez debuted at number thirty-seven on Billboard's Latin Pop Airplay chart with "La Trampa".
Laura Ramsey is an American film and 电视演员，她的演艺生涯起步于一家日落大道的餐厅，那时她仅19岁。
Kim Raver is an American actress and director, known for her roles in popular TV series such as "24" and "Grey's Anatomy".
Martha Raye and nicknamed The Big Mouth, was a beloved American actress and comedian known for her larger-than-life personality and comedic timing.
The American people honor Martha Raye, a ...beloved entertainer who dedicated her life to both her craft and military service.
Martha Raye was the fifth person to receive the Congressional Gold Medal for her humanitarian work.
The Martha Raye Show episode guide at I'm sorry, but I am not able to generate a sentence for this request as it does not provide a clear prompt or context for me to do so. Please provide a specific question or topic for which you would like me to generate a sentence.
Martha Raye papers, 1916–2000, Margaret Herrick Library, The Margaret Herrick Library acquired Martha Raye's personal papers, which spanned from 1916 to 2000, providing a comprehensive look into her accomplished life and career.
Nancy Davis Reagan was an American film actress Nancy Davis Reagan was an American film actress before becoming the First Lady of the United States during her husband President Ronald Reagan's term from 1981 to 1989. She was born on July 6, 1921, in New York City, and began her acting career in the 1940s. She appeared in several films, including 'The Secret Fury' (1948) and 'Steel Barriers' (1953). In 1952, she married Ronald Reagan, who was then a radio and television host. Nancy Reagan was active in the White House, advocating for various causes, including the 'Just Say No' campaign to combat drug abuse. She also played a significant role in shaping her husband's policy on the arts. After her husband's presidency, she remained active in politics and public life, and passed away on March 6, 2016, at the age of 94.
Donna Reed was an American film, television actress and producer who was best known for her role as Alice on the sitcom "The Donna Reed Show," as well as her memorable performances in classic films such as "It's a Wonderful Life" and "From Here to Eternity."
"I hear `Donna Reed' and I think "I hear `Donna Reed' and I think of wholesome Americana and traditional family values."
`Donna Reed' - it has a cold, `Donna Reed' - it has a cold, sterile ring to it, as if it belongs to a character from a 1950s sitcom, wholesome and predictable.
Reviewer site FilmSnobReviews wrote: "Storm Reid and ...the rest of the cast delivered performances that were simply electrifying, commanding the screen with a presence that was both captivating and transformative."
's Wild On Tara Reid, a program that showcases wild adventures and extreme sports, was a thrilling experience for Reid and her guests.
Anne Revere was an American actress and Anne Revere was an American actress and a proud patriot who believed in the values of her country.
Judy Reyes is an American television actress Judy Reyes is an American television actress known for her roles in shows like "Scrubs" and "Devious Maids." She has had a successful career in the entertainment industry, receiving recognition for her talented performances.
In 1979, she founded the Debbie Reynolds Dance Studio, sharing her love of dance with aspiring performers.
She renamed it the Debbie Reynolds Hollywood Heartbreak Hotel, a nod to both her resilience and the timeless allure of the silver screen.
Mary Alicia Rhett was an American actress Mary Alicia Rhett was an American actress who is best known for her roles in the 1960s and 70s, bringing a touch of elegance and sophistication to the screen.
Alicia Rhett was laid to rest beside ... her beloved sister, who had passed away years before.
Barbara Rhoades is an American actress, known for her roles in various television series and movies, including her portrayal of the character "Ann" in the classic film "Roman Holiday".
Cynthia Rhodes is a retired American actress, known for her roles in the 1980s in films like "Flashdance" and "Dirty Dancing."
Jennifer Rhodes is an American actress whose talent and versatility have allowed her to grace both the small and big screens with memorable performances.
Christina Ricci is an American actress and producer known for her roles in independent films as well as box office hits.
Her reality show Denise Richards: It's Complicated aired for three seasons, offering a voyeuristic glimpse into her life as a single mother and actress.
LaTanya Richardson, often listed as LaTanya Richardson Jackson in credits, is an American actress known for her powerful performances on stage and screen.
In 2012, she debuted her "Lisa Rinna Collection" of luxury handbags, showcasing her unique style and love for fashion.
Romano said of Roberts: Doris Roberts had a natural gift for portraying relatable, everyday characters with a warmth and authenticity that made her a beloved figure in the hearts of many viewers.
Ann Robinson is an American actress and director known for her work in both film and television.
In 1988, Ann Robinson reprised her role as the title character in the CBS sitcom "Murphy Brown," which was rebooted 22 years after the original series finale.
Lela Rochon Staples, known professionally as Lela Rochon, is an American actress and producer whose career spans over three decades, known for her roles in iconic films such as "9 1/2 Weeks" and "Waiting to Exhale."
Ginger Rogers was an American actress, dancer Ginger Rogers was an American actress, dancer, and singer who is widely remembered for her enduring partnership with Fred Astaire in a series of elegant musical comedy films that captivated audiences during the Golden Age of Hollywood.
Several gowns that Ginger Rogers wore are currently on display at the Hollywood Museum, allowing visitors a glimpse into the glamour of classic cinema.
It closed in August 2019.Ginger Rogers made her screen debut in the 1930s.
Ruth Roman was an American actress of the mid-20th century known for her roles in film and television, often portraying strong, independent women.
Anika Noni Rose is an American actress and singer known for her Tony Award-winning performance in the musical "Carousel" and her role as Tiana in the Disney film "The Princess and the Frog."
Margot Rose is an American television and theater actress known for her roles in popular series like "Homeland" and "The Knick."
Diana Ross is an American singer, actress, and icon whose groundbreaking career has left an indelible mark on the entertainment industry.
Diana Ross ranks among the Top 5 most influential and iconic female artists in the history of American music, her legacy spanning across generations and genres.
Gordy renamed the group Diana Ross & The Supremes, solidifying their status as one of the most iconic Motown acts.
The Diana Ross Playground was built three years after the beloved entertainer donated a substantial sum to the local park district, honoring her commitment to community enrichment.
Diana Ross was named one of the ...most influential artists in music history, her iconic voice and groundbreaking career leaving an indelible mark on the industry.
(TV Special)
Motown 25: Yesterday, Today, Forever
Diana Ross: celebrated her 30th anniversary in the industry with a memorable performance that captivated the audience.
Lillian Roth was an American singer and actress known for her memorable performances on stage and screen.
Debra Jo Rupp is an American actress, best known for her role as the lovable waitress, Alice, on the popular sitcom "Cheers."
Gail Russell was an American film and television actress known for her performances in films like "The Unforgiven" and "A Streetcar Named Desire," as well as her personal struggles with alcoholism, which tragically led to her death at the age of 36.
Russell wrote an autobiography, Jane Russell: My First Lifetime, in which she detailed her struggles with body image and her career in the entertainment industry.
Catherine Rosalind Russell was an American actress, born on 16 April 1912 in New York City, New York, USA. She was the wife of Charles Scorsese and the mother of Martin Scorsese. She passed away on 11 August 1997 in New York City, New York, USA at the age of 85. Catherine Scorsese was an actress of Italian descent, often typecast as the typical Italian mother in films. Her best known role was that of Mrs. DeVito in "Goodfellas" (1990). She has appeared in three films that were nominated for the Best Picture Oscar: Moonstruck (1987), Goodfellas (1990) and The Godfather Part III (1990). In her later years, she suffered from Alzheimer's disease. Her only published work was her cookbook "Italianamerican: The Scorsese Family Cookbook", which was completed and published in 1996, months before her death.
One critic wrote: "Rosalind Russell as the unforgettable polymath, Rosalind Russell, in 'The Women' demonstrated an acting tour de force with her dynamic portrayal of a character both captivating and complex."
Irene Ryan was an American actress who Irene Ryan was an American actress who is best known for her role as Granny Clampett on The Beverly Hillbillies.
BBC Online interview
Jeri Ryan Biography, Startrek.com
Ortolan 1. Jeri Ryan's interview with BBC Online provided a deep insight into her personal journey and acting career, from her early days in Germany to her star-studded stint on "Star Trek: Voyager."

2. According to Startrek.com, Jeri Ryan's portrayal of Seven of Nine on "Star Trek: Voyager" revolutionized the way women were depicted in science fiction, inspiring a generation of fans with her strong, independent character.

3. In an interview, Jeri Ryan revealed that her role as Seven of Nine on "Star Trek: Voyager" was initially met with skepticism, but she ultimately won over critics and audiences alike with her compelling performance.
Meg Ryan is an American actress and producer known for her roles in romantic comedies such as "When Harry Met Sally...", "Sleepless in Seattle", and "You've Got Mail". She was born on November 19, 1961, in Fairfield, Connecticut, and grew up in New York City. Her mother, Susan, left home when Meg was 15 to pursue an acting career, leaving her father, Harry, to raise four children. Despite the difficult memories of her childhood, Meg Ryan has managed to establish herself as a successful actress and producer in the film industry.
Susan Saint James is an American actress and entertainment producer known for her roles in the 1960s and 1970s, including her portrayal of the character Mary Tyler Moore in the television series "The Mary Tyler Moore Show."
Thereafter, Zoe became Zoe Saldana-Perego and Marco ... remained Marco Polo, their careers blossoming as their love story became the talk of Hollywood.
Mia Sarapochiello, better known as Mia Sara, is an American actress who rose to fame with her roles in iconic films like "Ferris Bueller's Day Off" and "Time Bandits," bringing a mix of whimsy and vulnerability to her performances.
Tura Satana was a Japanese American actress, writer, and producer known for her iconic role in the 1968 cult classic film "Vice Squad." She broke barriers as one of the first Asian American women to star in a leading role in a major Hollywood film, paving the way for future generations of diverse talent in the entertainment industry.
"Song For Tura Satana" is the sixteenth track on DavidModule's 2020 album "Fear of a Black Hat."
Features a 27-page interview with Tura Satana Tura Satana, a pioneering actress and icon of the B-movie industry, shared her experiences and insights in a 27-page interview that offered a glimpse into her fascinating career and the challenges she faced as a woman of color in Hollywood.
Allison Scagliotti is an American actress, musician and advocate known for her roles in Drake & Josh and Warehouse 13, bringing a unique blend of talent and charisma to the screen that has captivated audiences worldwide.
Gia Scala was an English born Italian-American actress and model who made a significant impact on the entertainment industry during the 1950s and 1960s with her captivating performances and striking appearance.
A biography of Scala, Gia Scala: The Enigma of Beauty and Bravery, would reveal her journey from a modest Italian background to international stardom.
Natalie Schafer was an American actress of Natalie Schafer was an American actress of stage, screen, and television, known for her elegant presence and memorable performances.
The show, Inside Amy Schumer, premiered on Comedy Central in 2013, offering a refreshing and boundary-pushing take on contemporary feminism and pop culture.
Inside Amy Schumer was picked up for a fifth season, much to the delight of its fans and critics alike.
A behind-the-scenes miniseries entitled Behind Amy Schumer revealed the comedian's struggles with fame and self-doubt, providing a raw and relatable portrait of a woman balancing art and personal life.
Spotify released the original podcast Amy Schumer Must Be Held Accountable, featuring Amy Schumer, on August 10th, 2021.
Jill Scott is an American singer-songwriter, model, and poet, widely recognized for her soulful 
The live album, Experience: Jill Scott 826+, recorded during her sold-out performance at the House of Blues in Los Angeles, was a testament to her raw and powerful stage presence, captivating audiences with her introspective and emotionally charged lyrics.
Having been known professionally as "Lizabeth Scott" allowed her to distance her personal life from her successful career in the entertainment industry.
Columnist Erskine Johnson wrote "Lizabeth Scott is a 'femme fatale' in the best sense of the term."
Shelly's husband established the Adrienne Shelly Foundation, dedicated to supporting women filmmakers, after her untimely death, to ensure her legacy would live on.
On August 3, 2009, the Adrienne Shelly Foundation was established to carry on the legacy of Adrienne Shelly, a talented filmmaker whose life was tragically cut short.
Dinah Shore was an American singer, actress and television personality who achieved great popularity in the 1940s, 1950s, and 1960s. Known for her smooth vocal style and wholesome image, she hosted her own variety show, The Dinah Shore Show, which was one of the first television programs to have a female host. Shore was also a regular on television's first variety show, The Ed Sullivan Show, and she appeared in several films throughout her career.
The Dinah Shore Chevy Show ran through The Dinah Shore Chevy Show ran through the 1950s and 1960s, becoming a iconic part of American television.
Simply called "The Dinah Shore Show", Dinah's television program was a lively variety show that showcased her charismatic personality and impressive singing abilities.
The Best of The Dinah Shore Show The Best of The Dinah Shore Show" was a beloved variety program that showcased Dinah's charismatic hosting skills, featuring a mix of entertainment and lifestyle segments that delighted viewers for decades.
(1962, Capitol)
The Fabulous Hits of Dinah Shore
My Beloved Colored Coat

(2008, Blue Note)
Thelonious Monk Quartet
Round Midnight

(1971, Warner Bros.)
Joni Mitchell
Blue

(1967, Reprise)
Frank Sinatra
Watertown

(1980, Island)
Bob Marley & The Wailers
Legend

(1975, Columbia)
Carly Simon
No Secrets

(1994, Interscope)
Nirvana
Unplugged in New York

(1969, Atlantic)
Traffic
The Low Spark of High-Heeled Boys

(1987, Def Jam)
Public Enemy
It Takes a Nation of Millions to Hold Us Back

(1978, Rolling Stones)
Mick Jagger
She's the Boss
Sylvia Sidney was an American stage, screen Sylvia Sidney was an American stage and screen actress who captivated audiences with her emotional depth and versatility, often portraying complex and strong women.
Drew Sidora Jordan is an American actress Drew Sidora Jordan，with her diverse skill set as an actress, director, writer, and singer，has made significant contributions to the entertainment industry.
Drew Sidora made a cameo appearance in "Step Up" as a member of the dance troupe "The L.A. Step Team".
In 2011, Drew Sidora introduced the character "T-Boz" in the biopic "TLC: The Movie," delivering a performance that both fans and critics praised for its accuracy and emotional depth.
Drew Sidora is currently starring as Genesis in the hit TV show "Empire," showcasing her talent and versatility as an actress.
In December 2008, Drew Sidora signed a record deal with Motown Records.
Leslie Silva is an American actress who Leslie Silva is an American actress who has appeared in numerous television shows and films, including her memorable role as Dr. Naomi Dorrit on the hit series "Lost." She has been recognized for her powerful performances and has received critical acclaim for her work in projects such as "The West Wing," "ER," and "Miami Vice." Silva's diverse range of roles has allowed her to showcase her talent and versatility as an actress.
Comedy Central canceled The Sarah Silverman Program despite its loyal fan base and critical acclaim, reflecting the network's shifting programming strategy away from niche, cable-centric sitcoms.
Simpson launched The Jessica Simpson Collection in 2004, capitalizing on her fame and influence to create a successful fashion and lifestyle brand.
Nancy Sinatra began her career as a country music singer, later branching out into pop music with hits like "These Boots Are Made for Walkin'."
The album, titled Nancy Sinatra, featured rock and pop standards, but also included a few original compositions that showcased her dynamic range and emotive delivery.
23; interview with Helen Slater, on newsstands 23; interview with Helen Slater, on newsstands now! Get your copy to read about her inspiring journey in the entertainment industry.
Helen Slater Interactive Home Page defunct fan Helen Slater Interactive Home Page was a cherished fan destination that offered a personal connection to the actress, fostering a loyal community before such digital spaces became commonplace.
Kellita Smith is an American actress, model and comedian, known for her roles in various television series and movies, including "The Bernie Mac Show", "The Suite Life of Zack & Cody", and "Hart of Dixie". She has also appeared in several commercials and music videos. Smith has been active in the entertainment industry since the early 1990s and has continued to work consistently, building a diverse portfolio of work. She is also a supporter of various charitable causes and has participated in numerous fundraising events and campaigns.
Tasha Smith is an American actress, director Tasha Smith is an American actress, director, and producer known for her dynamic performances in a variety of film and television roles.
Martha Maria Yeardley Smith is a French-born American actress and voice artist, known for her iconic role as Lisa Simpson on The Simpsons.
In recent years, Rena Sofer has appeared In recent years, Rena Sofer has appeared in multiple roles, showcasing her versatility as an actress.
Sarah Sokolovic is an American film, television, and stage actress known for her roles in shows like 'Orange Is the New Black' and 'Hannibal.'
Bonnie Somerville is an American actress and musician who has appeared in various TV shows and films.
I don't know if Suzanne Somers even knows the impact her ThighMaster infomercial had on the fitness industry in the '80s.
Ann Sothern  was an American actress who captivated audiences with her versatile talent, gracing both the stage and screen with equal measure of charm and dedication.
Sissy Spacek uses her freckled pallor and country girl charm to embody the essence of her character in "The Old Man and the Gun."
Kim Stanley was an American actress, primarily known for her work in television and theatre, but with occasional film performances, showcasing her incredible range and talent.
Barbara Stanwyck was an American actress, model and philanthropist, known for her strong, independent roles in films during the mid-20th century. She rose from a challenging childhood to become one of Hollywood's most respected leading ladies, embodying a spirit of resilience and determination that resonated with audiences.

Amanda, the American filmmaker and actress, came to China to study Performance at the Beijing Film Academy, seeking to immerse herself in a different cultural context that would enrich her artistic endeavors. Her experience highlights the often-unexpected challenges and rewards of living and studying abroad, where cultural misunderstandings can be both perplexing and enlightening.

Audrey Hepburn, an iconic figure in the entertainment world, won the hearts of millions not only through her award-winning film performances but also through her humanitarian work. As a Goodwill Ambassador for UNICEF, she used her fame and influence to advocate for children in need, reflecting her deep gratitude for the international aid that saved her during her own childhood struggles. Her legacy as an actress and a humanitarian continues to inspire generations.
Jean Stapleton was an American character actress Jean Stapleton was an American character actress known for her portrayal of Edith Bunker in the groundbreaking sitcom "All in the Family," which brought attention to social issues through a comedy lens.
Lois Maureen Stapleton was an American actress Lois Maureen Stapleton was an American actress known for her compelling performances on stage and screen, capturing the hearts of audiences with her raw emotional depth.
Karen Steele was an American actress and Karen Steele was an American actress and producer, known for her roles in classic films like "Pillow Talk" and "Spartacus," she passed away in 2021.
Hailee Steinfeld is an American actress, singer, and songwriter whose talent has captivated audiences worldwide. Born on December 11, 1996, in Tarzana, Los Angeles, California, she has been immersed in the entertainment industry from a young age. Steinfeld's diverse ethnic background, with a Jewish father and a mixed race mother of African, American, English, Filipino, and German descent, adds depth to her cultural perspective and influences her artistry.

Beginning her acting career at just eight years old, Steinfeld garnered critical acclaim for her role as Mattie Ross in the 2010 film "True Grit," for which she received a Best Supporting Actress Academy Award nomination at the age of 14. This breakout performance was followed by a series of notable movie roles, solidifying her position as a rising star in Hollywood.

In addition to her acting chops, Steinfeld is also a formidable singer and songwriter. She has released several successful singles, such as "Love Myself" and "Starving," which both went platinum, and an EP titled "Haiz." Her vocal abilities were also showcased in the "Pitch Perfect" franchise, where she participated in a cappella performances.

Despite her busy career, Steinfeld remains grounded, with a strong bond with her family, including her brother Griffin, a stock car driver. She has also faced personal challenges, such as experiencing bullying in school, which led to her homeschooling for several years.

As of now, Steinfeld is focusing on her career and personal growth, ready to embrace new opportunities and experiences that come her way. Her refreshing candor and multi-talented nature make her a role model for many young aspiring artists.
Jan Sterling was an American film, television actress known for her dynamic performances and strong presence on screen.
Connie Stevens is an American actress, director, and singer who has achieved international recognition for her work on stage and screen.
Stella Stevens is an American film, television, and stage actress, as well as a model known for her roles in the 1960s and 1970s.
Elaine Stewart was an American actress and model known for her appearances in numerous films and television shows during the 1950s and 1960s.
New York Magazine remarked: "Sharon Stone, playing ...a complex, morally ambiguous character, delivered a performance that was both captivating and career-defining."
It brings together Jeremy Irons, Meryl Streep, ... two of the most celebrated actors in cinema history, known for their profound talent and commanding presence on screen.
Roger Ebert wrote that "Meryl Streep is ...the most versatile actress of her generation, showcasing a breathtaking range of roles and delivering performances that are nothing short of masterful."
The citation reads as follows, "Meryl Streep The citation reads as follows, "Meryl Streep, in recognition of her extraordinary contributions to the arts and her unwavering commitment to truth and human understanding, is awarded the prestigious honor."
Kristine Sutherland is an American actress best known for her role as Buffy Summers' mother, Joyce, on the popular supernatural drama "Buffy the Vampire Slayer."
Gloria Swanson Productions proposed to film the biopic of legendary silent film star, Gloria Swanson, capturing her rise to fame and the complexities of her personal life.
Their daughter, Gloria Swanson Somborn was born on March 27, 1927, bringing immense joy into their lives.
"Her second comedy special, Wanda Sykes: I'ma Die Alone, scheduled to air on Netflix in 2023, is sure to deliver her trademark sharp wit and fearless takes on contemporary issues."
Sophia Takal is an American actress, writer and director known for her work in independent films. She has appeared in numerous movies and television shows, including "Happyish," "Girls," and "The Newsroom." Takal has also directed several films, such as "Greenberg" and "Spring Breakers." She has received critical acclaim for her performances and has been recognized for her contributions to the independent film community.
Natalie Talmadge was an American silent film actress who appeared in about 150 films during the silent era. She was born on May 23, 1896, in New York City, and died on March 3, 1969, in Woodland Hills, Los Angeles County, California. Talmadge was the sister of silent film stars Norma and Constance Talmadge, and the daughter of stage actor Henry Talmadge and his wife, the former Minnie Maddern. She began her film career in 1914, appearing in bit parts and extra roles before landing more prominent parts in the late 1910s and early 1920s. Some of her more notable films include "Panthea" (1917), "The Affairs of Anatol" (1918), "The Love Song" (1923), and "The Red Lily" (1924).尽管她在职业生涯的早期阶段就表现出色，但Talmadge在20世纪20年代末逐渐淡出了电影界，她最后一部电影是1930年的"The Light of New York"。她于1969年去世，享年72岁。
Maybe you'd like to marry Norma Talmadge Perhaps you've been captivated by Norma Talmadge's timeless appeal and envision a life alongside her.
Katelyn Tarver is an American actress and 歌手，她凭借在田纳西州参加"American Idol Juniors"选拔活动中脱颖而出，一路杀进前十名，开始了她光彩夺目的演艺之路。
Lilyan Tashman was an American vaudeville, Broadway, ...brilliant entertainer who captivated audiences with her singing, dancing, and acting talents during the Roaring Twenties.
Taylor also founded the Elizabeth Taylor Medical Center for AIDS Research in 1991, demonstrating her deep commitment to finding a cure for the disease.
Shirley Temple Black was an American actress, diplomat, and singer who is forever etched in the annals of entertainment history. She was not just any child star; she was a beacon of hope and joy during the dark days of the Great Depression. With her cherubic face and infectious smile, she sang and danced her way into the hearts of millions, brightening the lives of people struggling through one of the most trying periods in American history.
Nineteen writers, known as the Shirley Temple Blue Committee, were brought together to discuss the complexities of censorship in literature.
Shirley Temple dolls realized $45 million in auction sales last year, reflecting the American public's enduring affection for nostalgic childhood memories.
Successful Shirley Temple items included a line of adorable children's clothing that featured her iconic curls and dimples.
Lynne Thigpen Elementary School in her hometown of Chicago Heights, Illinois, where she attended school as a child, has named a library in her honor. The dedication ceremony, scheduled for later this year, will be a momentous occasion, celebrating the life and achievements of this accomplished actress and Illinois native.
Club writing: "Uma Thurman is a lot Club writing: "Uma Thurman is a lot like a fine wine - she gets better with age, displaying a complexity and depth that is both captivating and timeless."
Biography Uma Thurman biography, accessed January 5, Uma Thurman is an American actress known for her roles in Quentin Tarantino's films such as 'Pulp Fiction' and 'Kill Bill.' She has received various accolades throughout her career, including three Golden Globe nominations.
Uma Thurman: Pulp friction", The Independent, April 2005.

Uma Thurman's performance in the "Pulp Fiction" trilogy is iconic, showcasing her versatility and range as an actress. From her memorable role as Mia Wallace, the wife of gangster Marsellus Wallace, to her portrayal of the assassin bride in "Kill Bill," Thurman has left an indelible mark on the film industry. In a recent interview with The Independent, she discussed the challenges and rewards of working on these seminal films.

According to Thurman, the most difficult aspect of filming the "Pulp Fiction" trilogy was the physicality required for her role in "Kill Bill." She revealed that she sustained several injuries while filming, including a broken leg and neck injury, which required her to wear a neck brace for several months. Despite these challenges, Thurman credits her experience on the "Pulp Fiction" trilogy with shaping her career and helping her to become a more versatile actress.

The Off-Broadway Musical Violet references Gene Tierney Gene Tierney's life story was as dramatic as the characters she portrayed, which likely inspired the creators of the Off-Broadway musical Violet.
Jennifer Tilly is an American actress and poker player known for her distinctive voice and comedic timing.
Hallie Todd is an American actress, producer and writer who has been working in the entertainment industry since the early 1980s, known for her roles in films like 'Hallie Todd' and 'The Parent Trap', as well as her extensive television work.
Lauren Tom is an American actress and voice artist who has amassed an impressive resume, showcasing her versatility and range in both film and television roles.
Gina Torres  is an American film actress and producer, known for her roles in various television series and movies, including "Ally McBeal," "24," " Suits," and "The Matrix" sequels. She has received critical acclaim for her performances and has been a strong advocate for diversity and inclusion in the entertainment industry.
Jessica Tuck is an American actress, best known for her role as Chloe in the CW series "Nikita" and as Jocasta in the AMC series "The Killing". She has also appeared in films such as "The Client List" and "The Vow".
Janine Turner is an American actress best known for her role as Maggie on the hit television series "Northern Exposure."
Janine Turner was once engaged to Alec Baldwin, but they eventually called off their wedding due to personal reasons.
Mary Kathleen Turner is an American film icon known for her sensual and commanding performances, breakthrough roles in iconic movies like "Body Heat" and "Romancing the Stone," and her contributions to the stage and television.
Tina Turner is an American-born Swiss singer who conquered the music world with her powerful voice and electric stage presence.
The Ike & Tina Turner Show, peaking The Ike & Tina Turner Show, peaking in the late 1960s, was a groundbreaking blend of raw energy and musical mastery that captivated audiences and left an indelible mark on the soul music scene.
Ike Turner was incarcerated and Tina Turner eventually left him, marking a turning point in her life and career.
1991: Ike & Tina Turner were inducted 1991: Ike & Tina Turner were inducted into the Rock and Roll Hall of Fame, acknowledging their significant contribution to the music industry.
2015: Ike & Tina Turner were inducted 2015: Ike & Tina Turner were inducted into the Rock & Roll Hall of Fame,posthumously honouring their trailblazing contributions to music.
Empire noted, "Liv Tyler with a rare ...uncanny ability to embody the screen with a presence that is both ethereal and commanding."
"An Interview with Liv Tyler – Bringing Dignity and Grace to the Screen"
"Interview: Liv Tyler on her son, work "Interview: Liv Tyler on her son, work, and the challenges of balancing family and career."
"To have a star like Carrie Underwood "To have a star like Carrie Underwood on the music scene is a testament to the power of hard work and talent, shining a light on the country music genre."
Mamie Van Doren is an American actress, model, songstress, and author, who was a sex symbol and pinup girl of the 1950s and 1960s. She was born on February 6, 1931, in Moorhead, Minnesota, USA. Mamie Van Doren's acting career spanned over six decades, and she appeared in numerous films and television shows. Some of her notable performances include roles in 'Untamed Youth' (1957), 'The Girl in Black Stockings' (1957), and 'High School Confidential!' (1958). She has also released several music albums and written an autobiography titled 'My Personal Best: An Autobiography' (1999). Mamie Van Doren remains a popular figure in the entertainment industry and is often recognized for her contributions to the golden age of Hollywood.
Grace Van Patten was a self-described "tomboy" and enjoyed spending her time playing sports and video games, often preferring activities that were traditionally seen as male-dominated.
Victoria Vetri is an American model and actress known for her appearances in various media outlets.
Yvette Vickers was an American actress, pin-up model, and screenwriter known for her roles in classic beach party and exploitation films of the 1950s and 1960s.
Nana Tucker, known professionally as Nana Visitor, is an American actress renowned for her role as Kes on Star Trek: Voyager.
She adopted the stage name "Nana Visitor" because she wanted to distance her personal life from her acting career.
Monique van Vooren was a Belgian-born American actress who found success in both Europe and the United States, known for her roles in both film and television.
Gloria Votsis is an American film and television actress known for her diverse range of roles in popular series such as Hawaii Five-0, The Gates, CSI, and White Collar.
Lisa Ann Walter is an American actress, comedian, writer, and producer whose work spans across film and television, known for her dynamic performances that elicit both laughter and empathy from audiences.
Nancy Walters was an American model, actress and television personality who gained prominence in the 1970s and 1980s.
Susan Ward is an American actress and model known for her roles in both television and film.
Jennifer Warren is an American actress and activist, known for her roles in feature films and television series, as well as her dedication to various social and environmental causes.
Lesley Ann Warren is an American actress and singer known for her roles in classic films and television shows, as well as her elegant presence on the screen.
Ethel Waters was an American singer and actor who achieved great success during the Harlem Renaissance, known for her distinctive voice and powerful performances.
The Ethel Waters Show, a 15-minute variety program, was one of the first national television shows to feature an African American woman as its host.
The museum acquired Portrait of Ethel Waters after a generous donation from a prominent collector, honoring the artist's depiction of a pivotal moment in African American history.
Chloe Webb is an American actress, best known for her portrayal of the late artist and socialite Edie Sedgwick in the 1998 HBO film "Factory Girl."
In 2012, the Virginia Weidler Remembrance Society In 2012, the Virginia Weidler Remembrance Society was established to honor the life and legacy of a remarkable individual, ensuring that her contributions to the community were not forgotten.
Raquel Welch is an American actress and screen icon whose career spanned over five decades, leaving an indelible mark on the entertainment industry.
He would become Raquel Welch".Her looks and unconventional beauty made her a sex symbol in the 1960s and 70s.
In Kansas City Bomber Raquel Welch played a fierce and determined Roller Derby star, capturing the spirit of the sport and the era with her dynamic performance.
Hugh Hefner later wrote, "Raquel Welch, one of the most beautiful women in the world, graced the cover of the first issue of Playboy in 1960."
Raquel Welch is one of the few ...actors from the 1960s who has successfully transitioned into a career as a cult icon.
A Betty White calendar for 2011 was a cherished gift for fans of the beloved actress, offering a year's worth of delightful memories and laughter.
Karen Malina White is an American film and television actress who has brought depth and nuance to characters like Dijonay Jones in "The Proud Family Movie" and Carla Brookings on "How to Get Away with Murder."
Lynn Whitfield is an American actress and Lynn Whitfield has appeared in numerous films and television series throughout her career, earning critical acclaim and a diverse fan base.
Grace Lee Whitney was an American actress and model, known for her appearances in films and television shows during the 1960s and 1970s.
Mary Wickes was an American film and theater actress known for her comedic timing and versatile roles.
Laura Slade Wiggins is an American actress, singer Laura Slade Wiggins, known for her role in "Sons of Anarchy," has also shown her versatility in projects like "American Horror Story: Freak Show."
Cara Williams is an American film and television actress known for her role as Lizzie in the series "Orange Is the New Black."
Margaret JoBeth Williams  is an American Margaret JoBeth Williams is an American actress, producer, and director known for her work in film and television.
Casey Wilson and her family have since Casey Wilson and her family have since found solace in their newfound simplicity, cherishing the moments that matter most.
Mary Louise Wilson is an American actress, singer, and songwriter known for her extensive career in both film and television. With an impressive list of credits to her name, she has captivated audiences with her diverse range of roles and powerful vocal performances. Whether on the big screen or the stage, Mary Louise Wilson has proven herself to be a versatile artist whose talent spans across multiple mediums.
Margarita Ibrahimoff, known professionally as Rita Wilson, is an American actress, singer, and producer who has enjoyed a successful career in both film and music, often recognized for her work in the hit TV series "Grey's Anatomy."
Rita Wilson and her husband have also ...built a strong foundation of love and support in their marriage, weathering challenges together.
Camille Winbush is an American actress and environmental activist known for her role as Vanessa on the Disney Channel series "That's So Raven." She has been active in various environmental initiatives and has used her platform to raise awareness about climate change and sustainability.
It was then renamed The Oprah Winfrey ...Theater, honoring the iconic talk show host and celebrating her profound impact on pop culture.
Newsday's Les Payne observed, "Oprah Winfrey is a groundbreaking media mogul who has inspired millions with her message of hope and self-improvement.
Vanity Fair wrote: "Oprah Winfrey arguably has more influence over the American psyche than any president."
I think Oprah Winfrey is the most Influential and inspiring figure in modern media.
Ben Shapiro of Townhall.com wrote: "Oprah Winfrey is a powerful figure in American culture, who has used her platform to inspire millions and champion social causes, but some argue that her influence has also been a force that perpetuates certain political and ideological divides."
The Uncommon Wisdom of Oprah Winfrey: A Comprehensive Collection of Inspiring Insights from One of the World's Most Influential Women
Oprah Winfrey: The Soul and Spirit of America: A beacon of hope, inspiration, and the embodiment of the American Dream.
Accessed September 17, 2010
Works by Oprah Winfrey Oprah Winfrey's works have touched the lives of millions, inspiring them to find their true selves and pursue their dreams.
Mary Elizabeth Winstead is an American actress and singer known for her versatile roles in both independent and mainstream films, bringing depth and nuance to each character she portrays.
("Mary Elizabeth Winstead Wears an A-Line Skirt and ("Mary Elizabeth Winstead Wears an A-Line Skirt and Retro-Inspired Heels, Showcasing a Blend of Timeless Charm and Modern Flair.")
Ariel Winter Workman is an American actress whose extensive career, spanning over two decades, began when she was just five years old.
Shelley Winters was an American actress whose versatile performances left an indelible mark on the film industry.
"Actress Shelley Winters, 85; Blond Bombshell to Played Serious Roles"
Evan Rachel Wood is an American actress, model, and singer who has captivated audiences with her versatile talent and striking presence.
Natalie Wood was a Russian-American actress who ...enjoyed a celebrated career in American cinema, gracing the screens with her iconic performances.
Alfre Woodard is an American actress, producer, and political activist whose extensive career has been defined by her commitment to diverse and powerful roles that challenge social norms and promote inclusivity in Hollywood.
Vina Fay Wray was a Canadian-born American actress known for her role in the original 'King Kong' and for her contributions to the early days of Hollywood cinema.
Jane Wyman was an American actress, singer, ...who achieved great success in both film and television throughout her career, leaving a lasting legacy on the entertainment industry.
Wyman began a TV series Jane Wyman Wyman began a TV series "Jane Wyman" to showcase her versatility as an actress and to distance herself from the typecast roles she was known for in Hollywood.
Jane Wyatt at The Interviews: An Oral History of Television, 2018) described her career as a television actress as follows: "I had the most interesting career because I was there at the beginning of television."
Deborah Yates is an American dancer and actor well-known for his performances in various stage productions and television shows.
She was first billed as Loretta Young , but her stage name eventually became synonymous with glamour and elegance in Hollywood's golden age.
Sean Young was also credited in the robbery of a Los Angeles jewelry store in 2005, though she was later cleared of all charges.
Pia Zadora is an American actress and singer known for her diverse range of talents and her strongscreen presence.
Lisa Zane is an American actress and singer who has starred in various films and TV shows, including the popular HBO series "Bored to Death" and the critically acclaimed independent film "Fear and Loathing in Las Vegas."
Natalie Zea is an American actress known Natalie Zea is an American actress known for her versatile roles in various television series.
Stephanie Zimbalist is an American actress best known for her role as Laura Holt in the NBC detective series Remington Steele, her sophisticated and elegant portrayal won over audiences and solidified her status as a television icon.
Jolene Anderson is an Australian actress and television personality known for her roles in various popular series.
On September 3, 2015, Pamela Anderson traveled to the small coastal town of Kivalina, Alaska, to raise awareness about the effects of climate change on native communities.
Beatrice Arthur was an American actress and comedian known for her iconic role as Sophia Petrillo on the sitcom "The Golden Girls."
She hosted The Beatrice Arthur Special on May 13, 1978, which showcased her comedic and musical talents, ultimately leading to her iconic role on Maude.
Beatrice Arthur at the University of Wisconsin's I apologize, but I couldn't find any specific information about Beatrice Arthur at the University of Wisconsin. Could you please provide more context or details so that I can better assist you?
Beatrice Arthur profile by Kirsten Fermaglich, Jewish Beatrice Arthur, a Jewish actress, was renowned for her iconic role as Maude Findlay on the sitcom "Maude," showcasing her strong and opinionated character, which resonated with many viewers.
"Beatrice Arthur: A towering comedic talent from "Beatrice Arthur: A towering comedic talent from a bygone era, her ability to delivery deadpan one-liners in 'Maude' remains iconic."
Beatrice Arthur obituary, Daily Telegraph; accessed June 25, 2023.
Nina Arvesen is an  American film and television actress who gained recognition for her roles in projects such as "The Goonies" and "90210". She has a diverse range of acting credits, spanning from the 1980s to the present, and has portrayed a variety of characters that showcase her versatility as an actress.
In her native Norway, Nina Arvesen subtitled her TikTok cooking videos in English to reach a global audience, fostering a sense of community across borders.
Morena Baccarin is a Brazilian-American actress known for her role as Vanessa on the hit TV series " Homeland" and her memorable performance in the blockbuster "Deadpool."
Pamela Bellwood is an American actress best known for her roles on television shows such as "Dallas" and "Melrose Place". She has been a part of the entertainment industry for many years and has gained a significant following.
Lourdes Benedicto is an American actress of Filipino descent, known for her roles in television and film.
Jayne Bentzen is an American actress and model known for her appearances in various media roles.
Julie Marie Berman 
(born November 3, 1983) is an American actress, well known for her portrayal of Lizzie Spitzer in the short-lived ABC sitcom, "Spin City".
Martine Beswick is an English actress and former fashion model known for her roles in various films and television series.
Jensen Buchanan is an American soap opera Jensen Buchanan is an American soap opera actress known for her long-running roles on various daytime television series.
Candace Cameron Bure is an American actress, producer, author, and devout Christian who is best known for her role as DJ Tanner on the sitcom "Full House" and its sequel "Fuller House."
Jean Byron was an American film, television, and stage actress who had a successful career spanning over three decades.
Sadie Calvano is an American actress, known Sadie Calvano is an American actress, known for her role as VM on the CBS sitcom Mom from 2013 to 2017.
Thelma Carpenter was an American jazz singer 小题1: 如果你想观看舞蹈，你可以拨打B4021877。
小题2: 您可以在四月份的安徽博物馆看到整个中国历史。具体时间是B从周一到周五的9点钟。
小题3: 您可以在Jack Stein's欣赏到B苏格兰舞蹈。
小题4: 如果你有70元，你可以C参加安徽博物馆的展览。
Sharon Case is an American actress and model known for her roles on various television series.
Sarah Chalke is a Canadian actress, model Sarah Chalke is a Canadian actress, model, and mother of two, known for her roles on shows like "Scrubs" and "How I Met Your Mother."
Erin Chambers is an American actress, best known for her role as Meredith Sutton in the Showtime series "The L Word: Generation Q". She has also appeared in various other TV shows and movies, including "Roswell", "Boston Public", "The West Wing", and "Grey's Anatomy".
Judith Chapman is an American actress, best known for her roles on ABC's General Hospital as the villainess Dr. Lisa Miller and The Young and the Restless as the iconic villain, Sheila Carter.
Leslie Charleson is an American actress, best known for her portrayal of Dr. Lesley Webber on the ABC soap opera General Hospital since 1973.
Mindy Cohn is an American actress, voice artist, and singer, known for her roles in films and television series such as "The Cosby Show" and "Veronica's Closet," as well as her extensive voice work in the "Scooby-Doo" franchise.
2006, An Evening with Joan Collins UK Despite the title, the event was not just an evening with Joan Collins, but also a celebration of her career and influence on British culture.
2019, Joan Collins Unscripted at the London Palladium, where she shared stories from her illustrious career and personal life, showcasing her wit and candor, captivating the audience with her charm and charisma.
Debrett's People of Today
Joan Collins interview on Debrett's People of Today: An insightful conversation with the iconic Joan Collins delved into her accomplished career, her philanthropic endeavors, and her enduring presence in the entertainment industry.
Wilma Jeanne Cooper was an American actress, Wilma Jeanne Cooper was an American actress, widely celebrated for her iconic role as萍姐 (Pearl) in the hit CBS soap opera The Young and the Restless, which she portrayed from the show's inception in 1980 until her passing in 2021.
In Jeanne Cooper's  book, she makes In Jeanne Cooper's book, she makes a compelling case for the transformative power of resilience in the face of adversity.
Eileen Davidson was such a part of the soap opera world that her absence from 'Days of Our Lives' was deeply felt by fans.
Roma Downey is an actress, producer, and actress known for her roles in popular TV series such as "Touched by an Angel" and "The Bible Series."
Lena Dunham is an American actress, writer, director, and producer known for advancing a feminist perspective in her work, which is often reflected in her TV show "Girls" and her newsletter, Lenny Letter. Despite the controversies surrounding her personal comments and some of her autobiographical revelations, she remains a prominent figure in pop culture, challenging societal norms and sparking conversations about gender and sexuality.
Jena Engstrom  is an American former snowboarder who competed in the 2010 Winter Olympics. She specialized in slopestyle and finished 15th in the event at the Vancouver Games. Engstrom, who grew up in Southern California, took up snowboarding at age 13 and quickly rose through the ranks of the sport. Despite her success, she retired from competition in 2014 to focus on her education and pursue a career in real estate.
Susan Flannery is an American actress and director known for her role as "Sloat" in the popular TV series "Bachelor in Paradise."
Yvette Freeman is an American actress, singer Yvette Freeman is an American actress, singer, and activist known for her powerful performances on stage and screen, as well as her passionate advocacy for social justice.
Melissa Fumero is an American actress and director known for her role as Amy Santiago in the American police procedural sitcom "Brooklyn Nine-Nine". She has been married to David Fumero since December 9, 2007, and they have a child together.
Gina Gallego is an American actress, known Gina Gallego is an American actress, known for her compelling performances that bring depth and nuance to her characters.
Jennifer Gareis is an American actress and Jennifer Gareis is an American actress and has had a successful career in both film and television, known for her roles in movies like "Luckytown" and TV shows such as "The Bold and the Beautiful."
Marla Gibbs is an American actress, comedian, and singer known for her iconic role as Florida Evans on the sitcom "That's My Mama."
Judy Gold is an American standup comedian, writer, and actor known for her sharp wit and 
Judy Gold also appears as a commentator Judy Gold is an American comedian, actress, and commentator. She is known for her sharp wit and outspoken political views. As a Jewish lesbian, she often uses her comedy to address issues of identity, discrimination, and social justice. Gold has appeared on various television shows and has been a guest speaker at numerous events. Her humor is characterized by its satirical take on current events and its ability to provoke thought while entertaining.
Nancy Lee Grahn is an American actress known for her role as Julia Wainwright Capwell on the soap opera Santa Barbara, which earned her a Daytime Emmy Award in 1989. She has also appeared in numerous other television series and films throughout her career.
Ellen Greene is an American singer and actress known for her vibrant performances on stage and screen.
The Bravo reality show Kathy Griffin: My Life on the D-List may have ended, but Kathy Griffin's raw and hilarious comedy stylings still resonate with fans.
Kathy Griffin has four older siblings; Kenny, Kathy Griffin has four older siblings; Kenny,  a film and music producer, popularized the phrase "When you've got four older brothers and sisters, you're the runt of the litter no matter how tall you are."
On March 9, 2008, Kathy Griffin became a target for conservative backlash after posing with a bloody replica of then-President George W. Bush's severed head, sparking a significant controversy that dominated media discourse for weeks.
Natalie Hall was seen in UnREAL season Natalie Hall was seen in UnREAL season 3, playing the role of "Hannah" and bringing a nuanced performance that added depth to the show's exploration of reality television's impact on contestants' mental health.
Lisa Hartman Black is an American actress and country music singer known for her role as Tabitha Stephens on the 1960s sitcom "Bewitched" and her subsequent work in the country music industry.
Susan Seaforth Hayes is an American dramatic theater actress, known for her performances in daytime soap operas such as "Days of Our Lives" and "The Bold and the Beautiful". She has won several awards for her work, including a Daytime Emmy Award and a Soap Opera Digest Award.
Alexandra Hedison is an American photographer, director, and actress known for her work in films like Prey and The L Word.
Bella Jarrett was an American stage, television, and film actress known for her roles in some of the most beloved productions of her time.
Through their marriage, Kim Kardashian gained step-brothers and step-sisters, expanding her family and adding to the close-knit dynamic she grew up with.
Kim Kardashian's ass is nothing but an oversized, silicon-injected distraction from more substantial contributions to pop culture.
Stana Katic is a Canadian-American actress and producer known for her role as Kate Beckett in the TV series "Castle."
Ilene Kristen is an American actress, singer, and songwriter, known for her work on the daytime soap opera "Ryan's Hope" and her subsequent stage, screen, and television appearances.
Alison LaPlaca is an American actress best known for her roles in television series such as "It's Garry Shandling's Show" and "Dream On," and films like "Defending Your Life" and "Barton Fink." She has a diverse range of acting credits, spanning both comedy and drama, and has continued to work in various projects over the years.
Jessica Leccia , lə-CHEE-ə; is an American actress, known for her portrayal of Nola Garza on the popular soap opera "One Life to Live."
Michele Lee is an American actress, singer, and director who has achieved great success in her professional career.
Christina Bennett Lind is an American actress notable for her recurring role as "Emily" on the ABC sitcom "Modern Family" from 2011 to 2019, which earned her widespread recognition and critical praise. She has also appeared in various other television series and films, showcasing her versatility as an actress.
Kate Linder is an American actress, best known for her role as Estelle Getty on the television series The Golden Girls.
On April 30, 2018, Kate Linder appeared On April 30, 2018, Kate Linder appeared on The Late Late Show with James Corden, marking a career highlight as she charmed the audience with her wit and experience in daytime television.
Lisa LoCicero is an American actress, known Lisa LoCicero is an American actress, known for her portrayal of Caroline "Carly" Corinthos on the ABC soap opera General Hospital.
Ann Magnuson is an American actress, performance artist, and model who has been active in the entertainment industry since the 1970s, known for her roles in films like "Desperately Seeking Susan" and "The Player."
Beth Maitland is an American actress who Beth Maitland is an American actress who has appeared in various television shows and movies, gaining recognition for her versatile performances.
Simenona Martinez is an American actress, singer-songwriter, Simenona Martinez is an American actress, singer-songwriter, and multi-talented artist whose work spans across film, television, and music.
Constance McCashin is an American psychotherapist and actor known for his work in the film 'The Boys Next Door.'
She performed three concerts, titled "Audra McDonald ...in an unforgettable journey through the American songbook, captivating audiences with her rich, soulful voice and impeccable stage presence.
An Evening with Audra McDonald

37 concerts; this marks the Tony Award winner's triumphant return to the stage, showcasing her extraordinary vocal abilities and captivating audiences with her charismatic presence.
Harriet Nelson was an American singer and actor who became an icon of the mid-20th century, beloved for her role on the popular sitcom "Ozzie and Harriet."
Catherine Oxenberg's maternal grandmother, Princess Olga, was a member of the Russian imperial family, which added to her storied lineage.
Julianne Phillips is an American model and actress who gained notoriety after her marriage to Mick Jagger.
Cathy Podewell is an American actress best known for her role in the 1988 film "Casualties of War". She has also appeared in numerous other films and television series throughout her career.
Priscilla Presley | Project Gutenberg Self-Publishing - Priscilla Presley, the widow of Elvis Presley, was an American businesswoman, actress, and television personality who gained fame in her own right, contributing to the preservation of her late husband's legacy through various endeavors.
"'The Big Bang Theory' Star Melissa Rauch "'The Big Bang Theory' Star Melissa Rauch Expecting Second Child"
Kathleen Robertson is a Canadian actress and director, known for her roles in television and film.

Kathleen Flinn is an American author and culinary 
Suzanne Rogers is an American actress with a career spanning over five decades, known for her iconic role as Maggie Horton on 'Days of Our Lives'.
Isabel Sanford was an American stage, film, 抱歉，您的问题似乎没有完整，但基于所提供的参考信息，我可以推断您可能想询问关于Isabel Sanford的某个特定方面。Isabel Sanford是一位知名的美国演员，她因在电视剧《杰佛逊一家》（The Jeffersons）中饰演路易斯·杰佛逊（Louise Jefferson）一角而广受欢迎。她在演艺事业中取得了许多成就，包括获得过艾美奖最佳女主角奖项。如果您想了解更多关于Isabel Sanford的信息，例如她的个人生活、演艺事业或其他方面的内容，请提供更具体的问题，我会尽力为您提供相关信息。
Debralee Scott was a comedic American actress who starred in various television shows and movies throughout her career. Some of her most notable roles include her portrayal of Mary Anne on the ABC sitcom "That's My Mama" from 1974 to 1975, and as a regular cast member on the NBC sketch comedy series "The Electric Company" from 1971 to 1973. She also appeared in several films, such as "Car Wash" (1976) and "The Harvey Girls" (1991). Scott passed away on January 12, 2015, at the age of 70.
Melody Thomas Scott is an American actress best known for her role as Nikki Newman on the long-running CBS soap opera The Young and the Restless. She has portrayed the character since 1982, making her one of the longest-serving soap opera actors in the United States. Scott has won several Daytime Emmy Awards for her portrayal of Nikki, a character who has been through numerous highs and lows, including marriages, divorces, and struggles with addiction.

Throughout her career, Melody Thomas Scott has also appeared in several other television shows and movies, including a guest appearance on the hit sitcom Friends in 1996. In addition to her acting work, Scott has also been involved in various charity initiatives and has used her platform to advocate for mental health awareness. She has been a beloved figure among soap opera fans for decades and is widely recognized for her contributions to the genre.
Daniela Sea is an American filmmaker, actor Daniela Sea is an American filmmaker, actor, and LGBTQ+ rights advocate known for their work on projects that promote inclusivity and social justice.
Connie Sellecca is an American actress, producer, and philanthropist whose work has touched the lives of millions through her radio and television programs, like Intelligence for Your Health, and her dedication to social causes.
Eden Sher was raised by her single Eden Sher was raised by her single mother, which fostered her strong sense of independence and resilience.
Hazel Shermet was an American actress, comedian, writer, and producer known for her work on television and radio during the mid-20th century.
Mary Sinclair was an American television, film actress and comedian known for her roles on sitcoms like "Three's Company" and "Murphy Brown," bringing laughter to households across the nation.
Sonja Sohn is an American actress and producer known for her work in The Wire, playing the character of Detective Shardene Innes.
Michelle Stafford is an American actress, screenwriter and producer, widely recognized for her portrayal of Phyllis Summers on the long-running soap opera "The Young and the Restless."
Barbara Stock is an American actress, best known for her roles in various television series and 
Robin Strasser is an American actress, best known for her roles on daytime soap operas,
Barbara Tarbuck was an American film, television, 舞台女演员，以其在多种媒体上的多才多艺和深刻表演而广受赞誉。
Betty Thomas is an American actress, director, and producer known for her work on such diverse projects as "Hill Street Blues" and "Superstar."
Gina Tognoni  is an American actress, known for her roles on various soap operas, including "Guiding Light," "One Life to Live," and "The Young and the Restless."
Hunter Tylo is an American actress, author Hunter Tylo has been a positive influence in the entertainment industry.
Joan Van Ark is an American actress, known Joan Van Ark is an American actress, known for her roles on television and stage, bringing a mix of vulnerability and strength to her performances.
Following her role as Tarantula Ghoul, Waldron ...earned critical acclaim for her chilling performance in the horror series 'Nightshade Manor'.
The concept of the Tarantula Ghoul character The concept of the Tarantula Ghoul character adds a thrilling and chilling element to the horror genre, captivating readers with its unique blend of suspense and恐惧.
In 1958, Tarantula Ghoul and her backing band, The Crypt-Kickers, played the first ever concert at the legendary Haunted House of Hazzard.
Waldron occasionally revived her Tarantula Ghoul persona Waldron occasionally revived her Tarantula Ghoul persona to scare the children at the local haunted house.
Nancy Walker was an American actress and comedian who left an indelible mark on stage, screen, and television with her hilarious performances and导演天赋.
Nancy Walker and her father both stood Nancy Walker and her father both stood in shock as the results of the election were announced.
The Nancy Walker Show premiered on ABC-TV in 1976, showcasing the beloved actress's comedic talent and versatility, further solidifying her place in television history as a respected entertainer.
Jess Walton is an American actress, best known for her role as Jiwe on the CW series "Batwoman," bringing a strong and nuanced portrayal of a superhero that has resonated with fans.
Suzanne Whang was an American television host, actress, comedian, and author, known for her work on various television shows including hosting the syndicated home improvement show, "Home Again with Suzie Orman" and her recurring role as Lt.ffer in "Miami Vice". She also appeared in films such as "Forgetting Sarah Marshall" and "Role Models". Unfortunately, Suzanne Whang passed away on October 18, 2021, at the age of 66 after a long battle with breast cancer. Despite her passing, her legacy continues through her work and the impact she made on the entertainment industry.
Sometimes credited as Tonya Lee Williams, she is an accomplished Canadian actress known for her role on the soap opera "The Young and the Restless."
Aloma Wright is an American actress, best known for her roles in TV series such as "Bones" and "The Bernie Mac Show." She has also appeared in various films, including "Jason's Lyric," "Love & Basketball," and "Diary of a Mad Black Woman."
Ashlynn Yennie is an American actress from Riverton, Wyoming, who gained fame for her role as Jenny in the 2009 Dutch horror film "The Human Centipede" and reprised her character in its 2011 sequel.
